 
 
Where is the US economy headed?
 
 
Harbingers of Harder Times

Published: March 12, 2005

At $58.3 billion, the United States' trade deficit for January exceeded everyone's worst expectations. The huge mismatch reported yesterday between imports and exports just missed breaking the monthly record, set last November, and is all the more remarkable for occurring in a month when the price of oil actually declined.

The trade deficit is the single most important factor in measuring the extent to which the nation lives beyond its means. As such, it should force us to own up to the dangers of rampant deficit spending. But the White House is showing no sign of action, as if doing nothing might make the problem smaller.

In response to yesterday's trade deficit figure, the dollar weakened against the euro and the yen, and traders predicted further declines in the weeks and months ahead. That, in turn, contributed to a drop in stock and bond prices. Such gyrations are certainly not unprecedented. The dollar has been on a downward trajectory for three straight years and was going into a fresh skid even before the latest trade deficit figure was released.

That slump was largely in response to recent reports, some later denied, that Asian central bankers may begin moving their huge dollar holdings into other currencies. That would mean higher interest rates in the United States because the government would need to sweeten Treasury yields, and higher interest rates imply further declines in stock and bond prices. A declining dollar also risks higher inflation; more expensive imports give domestic producers an excuse to raise prices.

There may be more trouble to come. Next week, the government will release figures showing how much capital flowed into the United States from abroad in January. Those numbers were down by nearly one-third in December. If next week's report is disappointing, the logical response from the currency markets would be to sell dollars - again raising the threat of all the possible side effects.

Since the trade deficit is intimately connected to the federal budget deficit, the best way to reduce the trade imbalance is to reduce the budget gap. But President Bush is calling for more tax cuts, politically implausible spending cuts and costly Social Security privatization. Both parties in Congress must address the twin trade and budget deficits - or risk being forced to do so by events beyond their control.

Do you believe that the US may be approaching economic disaster? If so what can or should the administration and congress do to avert it?
 
 
au, you know better than to start another thread on this subject.

You're going to have timberlandko in here singing "Happy Days Are Here Again" and blaming any bad news on the Democratic Party in three, two, one...
 
 
PDiddie
He will not be alone. With the situation rapidly progressing downward I am indeed interested in their response. It can't be "Happy days are here again." Or all we need is a good five cent cigar and a chicken in every pot.
 
 
I don't know. I personally think economics are the stupidest thing to ever be invented...

However I have heard various people who are more interested in economics than I suggesting that there have been several economic warning signs occuring within America that generally tend to come before extreme economic difficulty.

Personally I'm going to just have to wait and see, but it is certainly a worrying concern.
 
 
The current economic situation, according to experts' advice, doesn't look the prelude of disaster, while some signs are certainly worrying, mainly the apparently unstoppable "twin deficit" (both the federal budget and trade balance are in red numbers), which is responsible for the plummeting of the dollar. But the undeniable problems have risen because of an economic policy which has managed to prevent an economic crisis which could have ranked as one of the worst in US history. When the prices of telecommunications, Internet and media companies plummeted in 2000, billions of dollars were lost, a disaster easily comparable to the 1987's crash or the dramatic end of the Japanese financial bubble in 1992.

The economic consequences in Japan were deflation and the beginning of a mass unemployment problem. Very similar to which we would have faced if aggressive fiscal and monetary policies hadn't been implemented. Some points are heavily discussed, for instance the effectiveness of tax cuts( a decision, however, due to classical conservative beliefs), while everybody agrees Greenspan's determined policy of low interest rates has prevented a demand shock, reinforcing the consumers' trust, and consequently reactivating economic activity. It has been a neoconservative economic policy- there is an article by Irving Kristol defining neo-conservatism which admits the convenience of temporal budget deficits. But such measures are meant to be temporary.

But now it's time to return to fiscal austerity, by the contrary, we'll experience the negative effects of this double edged policy, depicted in AU's post. And that's the matter: I agree with SS privatization plan, but this isn't the moment to implement it, as it entails massive government borrowing. And I think that making tax cut's permanent is too risky, while there is still plenty of uncertainty about our economic future. (The secondary effects of an intervention on Iran...)
 
 
Both South Korea and Japan riled the markets when the mentioned diversification. Specifically, diversifying some of their holdings by holding debt in other than the American dollar. Thinking better of it they quickly changed course.
However, were this to happen one can only imagine what the repercussions to the American economy would be. At the very least interest rates would skyrocket and inflation would be on the gallop.
 
 
Editorial NY Times

At $58.3 billion, the U.S. trade deficit for January exceeded everyone's worst expectations. The huge mismatch reported Friday between imports and exports is all the more remarkable for occurring in a month when the price of oil actually declined..
The trade deficit is the single most important factor in measuring the extent to which the United States lives beyond its means. As such, it should force America to own up to the dangers of rampant deficit spending. But the White House is showing no sign of action, as if doing nothing might make the problem smaller..
In response to Friday's trade deficit figure, the dollar weakened against the euro and the yen, and traders predicted further declines in the weeks and months ahead. That, in turn, contributed to a drop in stock and bond prices. Such gyrations are certainly not unprecedented. The dollar has been on a downward trajectory for three straight years and was going into a fresh skid even before the latest trade deficit figure was released..
That slump was largely in response to recent reports, some later denied, that Asian central bankers may begin moving their huge dollar holdings into other currencies. That would mean higher interest rates in the United States because the government would need to sweeten Treasury yields, and higher interest rates imply further declines in stock and bond prices. A declining dollar also risks higher inflation; more expensive imports give domestic producers an excuse to raise prices..
There may be more trouble to come. Next week, the government will release figures showing how much capital flowed into the United States from abroad in January. Those numbers were down by nearly one-third in December. If next week's report is disappointing, the logical response from the currency markets would be to sell dollars - again raising the threat of all the possible side effects..
Since the trade deficit is intimately connected to the federal budget deficit, the best way to reduce the trade imbalance is to reduce the budget gap. But President George W. Bush is calling for more tax cuts, politically implausible spending cuts, and costly Social Security privatization. Both parties in Congress must address the twin trade and budget deficits - or risk being forced to do so by events beyond their control.
 
 
 
A blend of risks makes dollar's outlook grim

By Daniel Altman International Herald Tribune
Monday, March 28, 2005
Traders' pessimism could bring sell-off

Is the writing on the wall for the U.S. dollar? Researchers at one big fund manager say it is, but the markets haven't read along just yet.
.
Since the start of March, Bridgewater Associates, a manager of more than $100 billion of institutional and hedge fund money based in Westport, Connecticut, has been issuing warnings in its daily reports. One on March 11, titled "The Breakdown of the Dollar System," said, "As we often say, we've seen this movie many times, and we know the ending."
.
There is indeed a volatile blend of risks surrounding the dollar.
.
President George W. Bush's new budget proposal would substantially expand the government's debt burden in the next decade, potentially raising doubts about the desirability of its IOUs. Some Asian central banks have declared that they will diversify their reserves away from dollar-denominated assets. If China decouples the yuan from the dollar, it will not need as many dollar-denominated assets to keep its currency from gaining value, nor will its competitors for export markets. In recent times, long-term interest rates have stayed stubbornly low, making it difficult for American companies to attract new investment from abroad.
.
These ingredients may just be waiting for the right catalyst. If enough people start thinking like those at Bridgewater Associates, the dollar will lose value rapidly. There is no point in buying dollars today, after all, if everyone thinks that they will be worth less in the near future. Fundamental economic factors need not worsen any further; in currency crises, perception very quickly becomes reality.
.
Bridgewater says it believes that the dollar is already beyond the point of no return. To keep the currency at its current value, private investors will have to buy more American securities as central banks desert them, said Robert Prince, the firm's co-chief investment officer. Before private investors will act, they need to see a higher return from American assets, relative to assets carrying similar risks abroad.
.
Prince said that those higher returns had begun to arrive through lower prices for assets. If an asset comes with a fixed interest payment, say 4 percent, buying it at a lower price will offer a relatively higher return. But these higher returns could cause problems for the economy. Borrowers in the competitive market for credit will have to offer higher returns, too, and interest rates may rise.
.
"The Fed doesn't want that, because too much of a rise in interest rates will choke off the economy," Prince said.
.
The alternative is for the assets' prices to remain the same while the dollar loses value. That way, foreigners will be able to buy assets at a discount, yielding a higher return, but without putting too much upward pressure on American interest rates. (The implicit assumption here is that the assets' future returns will not be harmed too much by today's lower dollar.)
.
So, instead of allowing the economy to adjust purely through higher interest rates, perhaps causing another recession, Alan Greenspan and his colleagues at the Federal Reserve will have the luxury of allowing the dollar to do some of the heavy lifting. The numbers? Bridgewater predicts a further decline in the dollar of 30 percent, especially against Asian currencies, and a rise in American long-term rates of one-half to one full percentage point.
.
Not everyone thinks that events will play out this way. "It's really too extreme to be talking about potential crises in the dollar," said Martin Evans, a professor of economics at Georgetown University in Washington.
.
"Yes, we have seen a large movement in the dollar versus the euro in particular, but to say we're sort of on the edge of a precipice isn't really merited by the facts. The premise here - thinking that it's impossible for the dollar to come back - I also don't buy."
.
Evans said the Fed's hand would be forced by the rising tide of inflation. "The Federal Reserve cares about inflation," he said, "and they're going to be very reluctant if they start seeing the inflationary effects of the decline in the dollar to just sit by and say, 'But we need low interest rates to support exports."' He predicted that the Fed would put the clamps on credit, leading to interest rates high enough to attract foreign capital: "We are going to see quite a sharp tightening in the United States, perhaps tighter than people are expecting."
.
Drastic predictions for the government's fiscal position may not come true, either, even though the White House's budget plans would raise the debt-to-GDP ratio in 2015 to 37 percent, versus 29 percent under current law. "I don't think it's big enough to warrant the attention it's gotten," Douglas Holtz-Eakin, director of the Congressional Budget Office, said of the U.S. fiscal erosion. "A lot of the dollar's future will in fact be driven by the other determinants." That does not mean the budget can be ignored. Holtz-Eakin said he expected that the government would eventually have to move back toward a surplus.
.
"It is unavoidable that we will rein in our spending," he said, "because we are unlikely to be able to tax enough to cover it."
.
Though action by the Fed and a clampdown on government spending could spare the dollar, they would both be bad news for the economy.
.
A cutback in government spending will, at least in the short term, create slack in labor and product markets. And one of the surest forecasters of recession is a tightening of short-term credit by the Fed.
.
Congress and the White House have shown no sign that they are serious about controlling spending, but the Fed's policy-making committee may already be proving Evans right. After the committee opted to raise short-term rates another quarter of a percentage point last week, its statement acknowledged that "pressures on inflation have picked up in recent months" and asserted its willingness to act forcefully if necessary.
.
Whichever way you cut it, we're in for a bumpy ride.
 

I'm wondering if any of this has anything to do with putting a "War" person in charge of the world bank...
.
.
 
 
This guy knows more about it than I do; and he's a little worried.

 http://www.dailykos.com/story/2005/3/28/62356/8105 

 
Greenspan's bubbles. No - his 'monster' (says Morgan Stanley)

by Jerome a Paris
[Subscribe]

Mon Mar 28th, 2005 at 03:23:56 PST

The text below has been linked to by Atrios, but I'd like to bring it to your attention again.
The author, Stephen Roach, is the chief economist at Morgan Stanley, so he is one of the top economists in the world in terms of who is listened to, and he has extra credibility in that his bank presumably invests and lends after having taking his advice into consideration.

He is a known pessimist, but I cannot find good arguments against his. His message, like mine (See my previous diaries on this topic:Greenspan's bubbles - more graphs and Greenspan's bubbles - a graph) is simple:

We are in a runaway train, heading for the big crash, and it is mostly Greenspan's fault

Jump in!

The Test (Morgan Stanley Global Economic Forum):

The US Federal Reserve is behind the curve and scrambling to catch up. Inflation risks seem to be mounting at precisely the moment when America's current-account deficit is out of control. Higher real interest rates are the only answer for these twin macro problems. For an unbalanced world that has become a levered play on low real interest rates, the long-awaited test could finally be at hand.

In an era of fiscal profligacy, real interest rates are the only effective control lever of macro management.

It's all there in a few sentences:

fiscal profligacy: unrestrained government spending at the same time as taxes are brought down

current-account deficit out of control: the US consumer is gorging on imports

unbalanced world: everybody is living off that US consumer spending

low real interest rates: cheap money allow everybody to borrow and spend like crazy

inflation is picking up again (from a combination of higher asset prices and higher commodity prices, and despite the China deflationary effect)

Roach then goes on to explain that interest rates will have to increase significantly - just to get back to a neutral policy stance, and as it is "real" interest rates (i.e. those after taking into consideration inflation) that need to increase, the interest rates need to increase significantly faster than they have.

And it's become a real footrace: The Fed tightened by 25 basis points on March 22, only to find that a day later the annualized core Consumer Price Index accelerated by 10 bp. In fact, the acceleration of the core CPI from its early 2004 low of 1.1% y-o-y to 2.4% in February 2005 has offset fully 74% of the 175 bp increase in the nominal federal funds rate that has occurred during the current nine-month tightening campaign. At the same time, America's current account deficit went from 5.1% of GDP in early 2004 to a record 6.3% by the end of the year -- a deterioration that begs for both higher US real interest rates and a further weakening of the dollar. The response on both counts has paled in comparison to what might be expected in a normal current-account adjustment. Behind the curve? You bet.
So what needs to be done? And can it be done?

So let's venture an educated guess: Say, for purposes of argument, that the neutral real federal funds rate is 2%. I didn't pluck that number out of thin air: It's approximately equal to the 1.9% long-term average of the inflation-adjusted policy rate since 1960. It makes some sense -- albeit far from perfect sense -- to define this metric as the average short-term real interest rate that, by definition, would be consistent with average outcomes for growth and inflation. But there's now a problem: Neutrality no longer cuts it for a Fed that is behind the curve with respect to the twin concerns of inflation and current-account financing. Having played it cute and waited too long, the Fed must now aim for a "restrictive" target in excess of 2%. Again, for expositional purposes, put this level at 3%. Then add in some upside to the core CPI of about 2.75% and, presto, the Fed needs to be shooting for a nominal funds target of around 5.75% -- or more than double the current reading. That amounts to another 300 bp of tightening. If the Fed stays with its measured approach of doling out the tightening in 25 bp installments, then it would finally hit that target 18 months from now in September 2006. Unfortunately, given the long and variable lags of the impacts of monetary policy, the twin genies of inflation and the current-account adjustment might be well out of the bottle by then. If that were the case, the 3% target on the real funds rate would translate into something higher than 5.75% in nominal terms. Little wonder that talk is now rampant of stepping up the pace of tightening.
So far, so good. After all, the US economy is picking up again, it has a good growth rate, and there is indeed some threat from imported inflation. A little tightening will help it go through this rough patch and maintain its amazing performance, right?

Well, except for one thing...

Lacking in support from labor income generation, America's high-consumption economy has turned to asset markets as never before to sustain both spending and saving. And yet asset markets and the wealth creation they foster have long been balanced on the head of the pin of extraordinarily low real interest rates. The Fed is the architect of this New Economy, and most other central banks -- especially those in Japan and China -- have gone along for the ride. Lacking in domestic demand, Asia's externally led economies know full well what's at stake if the asset-dependent American consumer ever caves. And so they recycle their massive build-up of foreign exchange reserves into dollar-denominated assets, thereby subsidizing US rates, propping up asset markets, and keeping the magic alive for the overextended American consumer.
The current apparent health of the US economy is not coming from "labor income generation", i.e. middle class working and getting paid for that work, but from cheap money, i.e. from debt. The wealth is an illusion, created by Greenspan, and encouraged by Asian central banks who initially thought that they could ride that tiger to their own wealth.

Asset markets around the world are now quivering at just the hint of an unwinding of this house of cards. And they quiver with the real federal funds rate barely above zero. What happens to these markets and to an asset-dependent US economy should the Fed actually complete its nasty task of taking its policy rate into the restrictive zone? It wouldn't be at all pretty, in my view. The main reason is that the Fed and its reckless monetary accommodation have fueled multiple carry trades for all too long. And those trades are now starting to unwind, as spreads widen in investment-grade corporates, high-yield bonds, and emerging-market debt
Even before interest rates have gone up, the market feels that the debt burden of a number of borrowers is unsustainable, with real life consequences on industrial actors (see bonddad's recent diaries on that topic: GM Near Junk Status after GE cancels 2 billion credit line and Ford, GM and Chrysler "Lumbering Toward Failure")

What Roach is saying is that (i) interest rates need to go up by a lot more than most people still expect, and (ii) even small interest rates will have nasty consequences. Not pretty indeed. And his conclusion is quite direct: it IS Greenspan's fault:

The equity bubble of the late 1990s and the property bubble of the early 2000s -- both outgrowths of extraordinary monetary accommodation, in my view -- changed everything. Now it is a very different animal -- the Asset Economy -- that must come to grips with monetary tightening.
Largely for that reason, I still don't think America's central bank is up to the task at hand. In the face of disruptive markets or growth disappointments, this Fed has repeatedly opted to err on the side of accommodation. I suspect that deep in its heart, the Federal Reserve knows what's at stake for the US -- and for the world -- if the asset-dependent American consumer were to throw in the towel. Unfortunately, that takes us to the ultimate trap of global rebalancing -- a realignment of the world that requires both higher US real interest rates and a weaker dollar. Should the Fed fail to deliver on the interest rate front, I believe that the US current-account correction would then be forced increasingly through the dollar. And that would redirect the onus of global rebalancing away from the American consumer onto the backs of Europe, Japan, and China. Call it a "beggar-thy-neighbor" monetary policy defense -- pushing the burden of adjustment onto someone else.

It didn't have to be this way. The big mistake, in my view, came when the Fed condoned the equity bubble in the late 1990s. It has been playing post-bubble defense ever since, fostering an unusually low real interest rate climate that has led to one bubble after another. And that has given rise to the real monster -- the asset-dependent American consumer and a co-dependent global economy that can't live without excess US consumption. The real test was always the exit strategy.

Read that again:

GREENSPAN'S MONSTER -- the asset-dependent American consumer and a co-dependent global economy that can't live without excess US consumption.

History will not be kind to him.

 

Cycloptichorn
 
 
4/4/05
By David Gergen
Will America slip from No. 1?
A dozen years ago, after the Soviet Union collapsed and the United States emerged as the sole superpower, historians began a guessing game. How long had it been, they asked, since anyone enjoyed as much sway as the United States? One hundred years, back to the British Empire? Five hundred years, stretching back to Spain? Yale's Paul Kennedy soon provided the right answer: America, he said, had more economic, political, military, and cultural power than any nation since ancient Rome some 2,000 years ago.

But, Kennedy added, there were already signs of American slippage, and that warning set off another debate. For a while, those who disagreed with Kennedy--"antideclinists" like Joseph Nye--had the better case: The United States actually enhanced its leading status during much of the 1990s. In this decade, however, there is reason to ask again whether we are in danger of losing our perch.We are so mismanaging our national finances that we now borrow nearly $2 billion a day from foreigners, mostly Asians. Last week Standard & Poor's predicted that unless we change course, our debt will be downgraded to junk bonds within 25 years. Our politicians go into emergency sessions to save poor Terri Schiavo (a questionable exercise of power at best), but they cannot bestir themselves to save Medicare and Social Security. Our research universities remain the best in the world, but our share of patents is declining while Asian universities are rapidly on the rise. Despite the noble efforts of our soldiers, sailors, and pilots, and a brightening outlook for democracy overseas, the way we have conducted ourselves has so offended others that America's reputation abroad has plummeted.School for scandal. All these trends are dangerous enough, but there is another that's even more alarming: the way we are educating our young men and women. Back in 1983, a national education commission famously concluded that our schools faced a "rising tide of mediocrity." Educators, governors, and CEO s quickly swung into action, and we have been trying to improve K-12 classes ever since. The most promising reforms have revolved around standards and accountability, culminating in "No Child Left Behind" under President Bush. Despite a quarter century of effort, however, we're still making uneven progress, and other nations are moving ahead of us.When the nation's governors gathered recently for a national "education summit," their partnering organization, Achieve, presented data showing that the high school drop-out rate has actually gotten worse since 1983! Of the kids who now reach ninth grade, 32 percent disappear before high school graduation. Another third finish high school but aren't ready for college or work. Thus, about two thirds of our students are being left behind, many of them low-income and minority kids. Only the upper third leave high school ready for college, work, and citizenship.Our competitors, meanwhile, are growing stronger. On a list of 20 developed nations, America now ranks 16th in high school graduation rates and 14th in college graduation rates. But wait, it gets worse. That list of 20 doesn't even include India and China because they're officially considered "developing" countries. Yet everyone in American technology knows that India and China are rapidly becoming our most serious competitors.
Bill Gates is among a growing number of CEO s whose concern is rising. "When I compare our high schools to what I see when I'm traveling abroad," Gates told the governors, "I am terrified for our workforce of tomorrow." Gates pointed out that in 2001 India graduated a million more students from college than the United States did, while China has six times as many university students majoring in engineering. Many of those students are now staying home to work, saying no to U.S. jobs. As a result, U.S.-based companies are finding it increasingly attractive to build not only their manufacturing plants abroad but their R&D operations as well. The CEO of a major technology company says that as an executive, he is pleased-his firm will pay less in salaries--but as an American, he is deeply worried.

What's needed now is public recognition that, as Gates says, "America's high schools are obsolete." We should be not only alarmed but ashamed. Our leading figures--the presidents, for example, of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Harvard, and Yale, along with the CEO s of Microsoft, Intel, and IBM--must rally Washington and the country to a revolutionary overhaul of public education. In our founding years, Americans were among the most literate people on Earth, and that put us on an upward path. The education of our young has always been a key to our greatness. Will we now rescue the next generation or condemn it to second place?
 
 
 
It was back to a glum future for American job seekers in March, as the economy added only 110,000 new jobs, the worst monthly showing since last July and only about half the number economists had expected..
The longer-term trend is even more disturbing. In six of the past 12 months, job creation in the United States has not been strong enough to absorb the growth of the work force. In such a weak labor market, wages are stagnant or falling. Over the past year, for instance, hourly wage increases averaged only 2.6 percent for the 80 percent of the work force made up of nonmanagers in both white- and blue-collar jobs. The inflation rate for the same period has not yet been released, but it's a safe call that in March, wages failed to outpace price increases, as has happened every month since last May. That adds up to only one thing: a downturn in living standards, which will accelerate as oil prices consume an ever larger chunk of take-home pay..
In responding to the new numbers, the Bush administration chose to highlight the modest fall in the March unemployment rate. That's diversionary. Unlike the job creation number, the unemployment rate is derived from a notoriously volatile survey that almost certainly overstates March's job growth and thus understates weakness in the labor market. Other numbers in the report reveal a fuller picture. For example, the percentage of people who have been looking for jobs for at least six months ticked up in March, as did the average length of joblessness. According to the Economic Policy Institute, those factors suggest far more slack than the unemployment rate indicates. The report shows that the Bush administration has succeeded in delivering decent economic growth, but has failed to ensure that the benefits of growth are widely shared..
 
 
 
OP-ED COLUMNIST

A Whiff of Stagflation

By PAUL KRUGMAN

In the 1970's soaring prices of oil and other commodities led to stagflation - a combination of high inflation and high unemployment, which left no good policy options. If the Fed cut interest rates to create jobs, it risked causing an inflationary spiral; if it raised interest rates to bring inflation down, it would further increase unemployment.

Can it happen again?

Last week fears of a return to stagflation sent stock prices to a five-month low. What few seem to have noticed, however, is that a mild form of stagflation - rising inflation in an economy still well short of full employment - has already arrived.

True, measured unemployment isn't bad by historical standards, and inflation is in the low single digits. But inflation is creeping up, and it's doing so despite a labor market that is in worse shape than the official unemployment rate suggests.

Let's start with the jobs picture. The official unemployment rate is 5.2 percent - roughly equal to the average for the Clinton years.

But unemployment statistics only count those who are actively looking for jobs. Every other indicator shows a situation much less favorable to workers than that of the 1990's. A lower fraction of the adult population is employed; the average duration of unemployment - a rough indicator of how long it takes laid-off workers to find new jobs - is much higher than it was in the 1990's.

Above all, the weak job market leaves workers with no bargaining power, so they aren't getting ahead: wage increases have been minimal, and haven't kept up with inflation.

Underlying these disappointing numbers is sluggish job creation. Private-sector employment is still lower than it was before the 2001 recession.

Things could be, and have been, worse. But those whose standard of living depends on wages, not capital gains - in other words, the vast majority of Americans - aren't feeling particularly prosperous. By two to one, people tell pollsters that the economy is "only fair" or "poor," not "good" or "excellent."

Why, then, has the Fed been raising interest rates? Because it is worried about inflation, which has risen to the top end of the 2 to 3 percent range the Fed prefers.

What's driving inflation? Not wages: labor costs have been falling, because wages are growing less than productivity. Oil prices are a big part of the story, but not all of it. Other commodity prices are also rising; health care costs are once again on the march. And a combination of capacity shortages, rising Asian demand and a weakening dollar has given industries like cement and steel new "pricing power."

It all adds up to a mild case of stagflation: inflation is leading the Fed to tap on the brakes, even though this doesn't look or feel like a full-employment economy.

We shouldn't overstate the case: we're not back to the economic misery of the 1970's. But the fact that we're already experiencing mild stagflation means that there will be no good options if something else goes wrong.

Suppose, for example, that the consumer pullback visible in recent data turns out to be bigger than we now think, and growth stalls. (Not that long ago many economists thought that an oil price in the 50's would cause a recession.) Can the Fed stop raising interest rates and go back to rate cuts without causing the dollar to plunge and inflation to soar?

Or suppose that there's some kind of oil supply disruption - or that warnings about declining production from Saudi oil fields turn out to be right. Suppose that Asian central banks decide that they already have too many dollars. Suppose that the housing bubble bursts. Any of these events could easily turn our mild case of stagflation into something much more serious.

How do we get out of this bind? As the old joke goes, I wouldn't start from here. We should have spent the years of cheap oil encouraging conservation; we should have spent the years of modest growth in medical costs reforming our health care system. Oh, and we'd have a wider range of policy options if the budget weren't so deeply in deficit.

So if any of these things does come to pass, we'll just have to see how well an administration in which political operatives make all economic policy decisions, and the Treasury secretary is only a salesman, handles crises.
 
 
We need a businessman as president
 
 
We have a failed one in office now. That is while he got into politics where failure is the norm.
 
 
Does anyone else besides me realize that the Dow has fallen like 500 points in the last week? Not good....

Cycloptichorn
 
 
au the US has been headed towards being number 2 ever since we elected Bush the first time.
 
 
Cycloptichorn

 
Does anyone else besides me realize that the Dow has fallen like 500 points in the last week? Not good....
 

Yes and with tears in my eyes. But I not worried Bush says the economy is healthy. He must think he is president of China
 
 
Rising Consumer Prices Outpace Gains in Wages

By Nell Henderson
Washington Post Staff Writer
Thursday, April 21, 2005; Page E01

Consumer prices rose in March at the fastest rate since October, outpacing gains in most workers' wages, as households paid more for energy, clothing, hotel rooms, medical care and other items, the Labor Department reported yesterday.

The department's consumer price index, the most widely followed inflation gauge, jumped 0.6 percent last month, largely reflecting the 4 percent surge in energy costs.
Some economists were more troubled by the rise in prices after stripping out volatile food and energy costs. The so-called core CPI climbed 0.4 percent in March, the biggest increase in more than two years.

The increase in the core CPI was "worrisome," said Joseph Liro, an economist with Stone & McCarthy Research Associates. Its sustained rise "provides evidence that the spike in energy prices is beginning to pass through to other consumer prices."

Other economists cautioned against seeing the pickup in overall prices as primarily driven by energy costs. The stronger economy itself gives many companies more power to raise prices, said Robert DiClemente, chief U.S. economist at Citigroup.

"Inflation is still low, but there is some concern it's accelerating," DiClemente said.

Concerns about inflation helped drive financial markets down yesterday. The Dow Jones industrial average fell 115.05 points, or 1.1 percent, to close at 10,012.36, its lowest close since October. The average is now down 7.15 percent for the year.

Continued:
 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A6010-2005Apr20.html?referrer=email 
 
 
Good news and bad news in the stock market

The bad news is that even with todays rise, the stock market is trending down

The good news is that I dont have my social security in it.
 
 
We at least need someone as President who is able to count past ten without removing his or her shoes and socks.
 
 
 
We at least need someone as President who is able to count past ten without removing his or her shoes and socks.
 

Well, no wonder the Democrats can't find a candidate.
 
 
The crapper.
 
 
Touche', McG. That one was left wide open for you!

Is anyone listening to this?

In remarks yesterday before the Bond Market Association -- one of the hardest partying groups on the street -- Treasury Secretary John Snow explicitly linked the administration's efforts to cut the deficit to the push to partially phase-out Social Security. The logic of that statement points to only one conclusion: the deficits the administration has run up with upper-income tax cuts will be reduced by benefit cuts in Social Security.

It's not about strengthening Social Security; it's about cleaning up the mess created by the president's tax cuts.

 http://www.treas.gov/press/releases/js2399.htm 
 
 
squinney
Of course, It is a devious way of getting relief from having to pay down the IOU's owed SS by the government. Bush talks about the SS surplus going dry in 2042. The immediate problem is when the Government must make good on the notes they hold on 2018 or there about. They do not have the funds in the treasury and will have to raise taxes. General not SS taxes.
 
 
The Oblivious Right

By PAUL KRUGMAN

Published: April 25, 2005

According to John Snow, the Treasury secretary, the global economy is in a "sweet spot." Conservative pundits close to the administration talk, without irony, about a "Bush boom."

Yet two-thirds of Americans polled by Gallup say that the economy is "only fair" or "poor." And only 33 percent of those polled believe the economy is improving, while 59 percent think it's getting worse.

Is the administration's obliviousness to the public's economic anxiety just partisanship? I don't think so: President Bush and other Republican leaders honestly think that we're living in the best of times. After all, everyone they talk to says so.

Since November's election, the victors have managed to be on the wrong side of public opinion on one issue after another: the economy, Social Security privatization, Terri Schiavo, Tom DeLay. By large margins, Americans say that the country is headed in the wrong direction, and Mr. Bush is the least popular second-term president on record.

What's going on? Actually, it's quite simple: Mr. Bush and his party talk only to their base - corporate interests and the religious right - and are oblivious to everyone else's concerns.

The administration's upbeat view of the economy is a case in point. Corporate interests are doing very well. As a recent report from the Center on Budget and Policy Priorities points out, over the last three years profits grew at an annual rate of 14.5 percent after inflation, the fastest growth since World War II.

The story is very different for the great majority of Americans, who live off their wages, not dividends or capital gains, and aren't doing well at all. Over the past three years, wage and salary income grew less than in any other postwar recovery - less than a tenth as fast as profits. But wage-earning Americans aren't part of the base.

The same obliviousness explains Mr. Bush's decision to make Social Security privatization his main policy priority. He doesn't talk to anyone outside the base, so he didn't realize what he was getting into.

In retrospect, it was a terrible political blunder: the privatization campaign has quickly degenerated from juggernaut to joke. According to CBS, only 25 percent of the public have confidence in Mr. Bush's ability to make the right decisions about Social Security; 70 percent are "uneasy."

The point is that people sense, correctly, that Mr. Bush doesn't understand their concerns. He was sold on privatization by people who have made their careers in the self-referential, corporate-sponsored world of conservative think tanks. And he himself has no personal experience with the risks that working families face. He's probably never imagined what it would be like to be destitute in his old age, with no guaranteed income.

The same syndrome has been visible on cultural issues. Republican leaders in Congress, who talk only to the religious right, were shocked at the public backlash over their meddling in the Schiavo case. Did I mention that Rick Santorum is 14 points behind his likely challenger?

It all makes you wonder how these people ever ended up running the country in the first place. But remember that in 2000, Mr. Bush pretended to be a moderate, and that in the next two elections he used the Iraq war as a wedge to divide and perplex the Democrats.

In that context, it's worth noting two more poll results: in one taken before the recent resurgence of violence in Iraq, and the administration's announcement that it needs yet another $80 billion, 53 percent of Americans said that the Iraq war wasn't worth it. And 50 percent say that "the administration deliberately misled the public about whether Iraq has weapons of mass destruction."

Democracy Corps, the Democratic pollsters, say that there is a "crisis of confidence in the Republican direction for the country." As they're careful to point out, this won't necessarily translate into a surge of support for Democrats.

But Americans are feeling a sense of dread: they're worried about a weak job market, soaring health care costs, rising oil prices and a war that seems to have no end. And they're starting to notice that nobody in power is even trying to deal with these problems, because the people in charge are too busy catering to a base that has other priorities.
 
 
Day of Deficit Reckoning?

By David Ignatius

Friday, April 29, 2005; Page A23

 
The British comedy troupe "Beyond The Fringe" had a skit years ago about a group of doomsayers who huddled together on a mountaintop to await the end of the world. They sang a final dirge and waited... and waited. Finally one of them broke the silence: "Same time tomorrow, lads. We must get a winner one day."

Economists must feel a bit like the perpetual doomsayers in the British comedy skit. They have been warning about global financial imbalances for months and in some cases for years. They have described serious risks for the United States if it doesn't reduce its budget and trade deficits. And the worriers aren't flakes: They include such famous names as Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan, former Fed chairman Paul Volcker and investor Warren Buffett.

But somehow the perpetual-motion machine of the U.S. economy has kept defying predictions. And gradually people may begin to think the economic laws of gravity really have been suspended. The situation reminds me of the Internet bubble of the late 1990s. Economists had been warning that the bubble was unsustainable -- that people wouldn't keep paying absurd prices for companies just because they had an Internet "business plan" -- and yet the Nasdaq kept rising. Ordinary folks began to wonder if the economists were all wet, and they rushed to buy their piece of the Internet dream. Whereupon the bubble burst.
 

 link 
 
 
Yesterday the bond market was jolted by the news that both GM and Fords paper was downgraded to junk bond status. A move I should add was not unanticipated.
The next step in the progression would be bankruptcy. I am not suggesting or predicting the demise of these two companies. However, it is a possibility. If it should happen what do you think the effect upon the American economy would be?
 
 
 
 THE EMPLOYMENT SITUATION: APRIL 2005 

Employment rose in April, and the unemployment rate was unchanged at 5.2
percent, the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor re-
ported today. Nonfarm payroll employment increased by 274,000 over the month.
Job growth was widespread, with gains in construction, mining, and several
service-providing industries...
 

US GDP Growth: 3.5% EU GDP Growth: 2%
US Unemployment: 5.2% EU Unemployment: 9.2%

"Unexpected" $42 Billion budget surplus crops up:

 
 Tax Receipts Exceed Treasury Predictions 
Early Surge Lowers Deficit Projections

By Jonathan Weisman
Washington Post Staff Writer
Thursday, May 5, 2005; Page E01

After three years of rising federal budget deficits, a surge of April tax receipts brought unexpected good news to fiscal policymakers -- the tide of government red ink appears to be receding.

The Treasury Department this week reported there would be a $54 billion swing from projected deficit to surplus in the April-to-June quarter, after an unanticipated gush of tax payments poured into the Treasury before the April 15 deadline. That prompted private forecasters to lower their deficit projections for the fiscal year that ends in September...
... The Treasury announced this week that it will repay $42 billion in federal debt in the third April-to-June quarter, instead of borrowing $12 billion...
 

 

Yup. We're dooned.
 
 
The quality of those jobs created, Timber?

No data on how payrolls have dropped considerably, I notice. That might be a little damaging to yer stat, and your lame quip at the end....

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
The quality of those jobs created, Timber?

No data on how payrolls have dropped considerably, I notice. That might be a little damaging to yer stat, and your lame quip at the end....

Cycloptichorn
 

Some folks still don't get it.

 
 Payroll boost for dollar 

The Friday US employment report was stronger than expected with a 274,000 increase in payrolls for April while the unemployment rate held at 5.2%. The workweek rose and there were upward revisions to the previous months' data. There was also a 5 cents increase in earnings. The report will ease immediate fears over an US economic slowdown and the wages increase will ensure that the Fed continues to tighten policy.
 

 
 Americans make more, spend more
March figures show 0.5 percent increase in money earned, 0.6 percent bump in buying. 

The Associated Press

U.S. income rose by 0.5 percent in March - the best showing in three months - and consumer spending rose by 0.6 percent, the government reported Friday.

The Commerce Department said the March income gain came after a 0.4 percent rise in February and was the best since a 3.7 percent surge in December

 

Overall wages have been increasing over the past 14 months. Sorta puts the lie to the "McJob" complaint - not that facts matter to some folks.
 
 
Timber
You managed to ignore the fact that the new jobs created are just able to cover people coming into the labor market. The jobs lost since this regime has been in office have never been recouped.

Re: Ford and GM. I would suppose you are aware they are skating on thin ice. If they were unable to compete and went belly up what would the impact on the economy than be.
 
 
While job growth has not been as robust as might be hoped by some, productivity and overall business efficiency have skyrocketed, and the fact remains this Administration has recorded a net job gain accompanied by increased average wages, despite an inherited recession, 9/11, two wars, and assorted other concerns. As for Ford and GM - their current woes are not all that different than their situation 4 months into Regan's second term.

Go with your version, though - by all means. Its done The Democrats suitable service so far.
 
 
This, from yesterday's news:

 http://money.cnn.com/2005/05/04/news/fortune500/gm_kerkorian/?cnn=yes 
 
 
Search AP Story Archive May 6, 4:30 PM EDT
GM's Wagoner Needs Quick Turnaround

By JOHN PORRETTO
AP Auto Writer

DETROIT (AP) -- General Motors Corp. chairman and chief executive Rick Wagoner has little time to formulate solutions for the company's perfect storm of problems: mounting losses, rising competition, shrinking market share and increasing health care and pension costs.

Wagoner will face shareholders at GM's annual meeting June 7 in Wilmington, Del., and he'll have to say more than GM did Thursday, when the credit rating of the world's largest automaker was reduced to "junk" status. Among those shareholders is billionaire Kirk Kerkorian, who is out to increase his stake in the company and is not known for his patience with poor performance.

GM has provided little insight into how it plans to turn around its business. In a brief statement after Standard & Poor's knocked GM's $291 billion in debt to below investment grade, the company said it was "firmly committed to improving its performance as quickly as possible."

GM emphasized that S&P's downgrade will not deter the automaker from "achieving its objectives," and it noted it has adequate cash and liquidity. But the company offered no other specifics.
Now the onus is squarely on 52-year-old Wagoner, who will be expected in Wilmington to articulate a comeback strategy for an iconic company that's facing huge challenges in virtually every aspect of its global business.

"I don't know how much pressure he'll feel from shareholders, but I do think he's feeling it from his board and has been since the earnings collapse last month," said Burnham Securities analyst David Healy, referring to GM's $1.1 billion first-quarter loss reported April 19.

The news hasn't gotten much better since then, particularly in the past several days.

On Tuesday, GM reported its vehicle sales fell again in April, a downer for the company's already-slumping share price. On Wednesday, GM's value soared on news that Kerkorian wants to up his stake in the company from nearly 4 percent to roughly 9 percent. Some analysts say Kerkorian could be a distraction to Wagoner and others trying to stabilize the business.

Then, on Thursday, came the S&P blow.

If these were isolated events, investors and others might be able to look forward with a degree of optimism. But GM's situation is unlikely to improve soon, as the company wrestles with rising health care and legacy costs, sluggish demand for the company's most profitable vehicles and increasing competition from Asian rivals.

GM management has declined to offer an earnings forecast for the remainder of 2005, but some analysts say the company will likely break even at best.

"In reality, GM's conundrum is much deeper than they're letting on," said Peter Morici, an economist and professor at the University of Maryland who closely follows the automotive industry. "It's in the overhead of the company, it's in the work rules, it's in the wages they pay themselves. The company needs wholesale structural reform."

GM insists that producing "gotta-have" vehicles is the key to improving its business, but that's proven to be a significant challenge of late. The company rolled out an industry-leading 29 new vehicles in 2004, yet its U.S. sales so far this year are off nearly 5 percent.

What's more, the vehicles that generate its largest profits, big SUVs, are tough sells these days given higher gasoline prices and GM's aging lineup.

S&P cited stalling SUV sales at GM as one of the biggest factors in its downgrade decision.

GM has said it will continue to invest billions of dollars in new vehicle programs and try to get them on the market as quickly as possible. A hitch, says Morici, is it costs GM far more to develop and manufacture those vehicles than its more-efficient Asian competitors, whose labor expenses are far less.

GM has said providing health care benefits alone to its 1.1 million active employees, retirees and dependents adds about $1,400 to the sticker price of each car and truck built in the United States. Foreign competitors don't encounter the same obstacles because, for the most part, they have younger employees, fewer retirees and different systems for paying for health care.

For now, GM looks to be stuck with the costs. The United Auto Workers union has said it's not interested in reopening contract talks before 2007, when the current pact expires, to address those expenses. The UAW on Friday said it had no comment on GM's S&P downgrade.

A wild card for now is Kerkorian, the 87-year-old casino magnate, and how he might go about trying to foster change and create value at GM. His investment company, Tracinda Corp., said his proposed purchase of additional GM shares - valued at nearly $870 million - was for investment purposes only. But his motives prompted speculation on a variety of scenarios, including that he might desire a controlling stake in the automaker.

In a research note, Credit Suisse First Boston analyst Chris Ceraso said Kerkorian might push for a seat on GM's board, suggest management changes or encourage the current team to take a more aggressive stance on issues such as reducing GM's production overcapacity. Whatever route Kerkorian takes, his goal will be to unlock value at GM.

"Of course, all of this is easier said than done," Ceraso said. "We're not clear as to how Mr. Kerkorian will effect that kind of change."
 
 
I foresee no great difficulty ahead for The US Economy, nor for The Republican Party. I don't say its sugar and roses everywhere you look, but I don't see anything other than steady, continued growth for both.

But then, what do I know? After all, consider my track record as regards projections concerning both The US Economy and The Republican party, as compared to that of some on these boards. It would appear to me there has been significant misconjecture and great disappointment. Some things appear constant.
 
 
What? You don't want to listen to the harbingers of doom and get totally out of the stock market?

I see that Warren Buffett just signed on with the Kerry Camp. You remember Warren. He passed on WalMart....to the tune of $10 billion give or take.

     
 
 
What Are You Doing, Kirk?
Kirk Kerkorian is investing billions in GM. Is this genius or lunacy?
posted May 6, 2005
Daniel Gross

 http://www.slate.com/id/2118232/#ContinueArticle 
 
 
UH-OH - Looks like more bad news for those who'd prefer to see bad news for the US Economy - "Unexpected" strength and expansion continue:

 Trade Deficit narrows sharply in March - shrinks 9.2% 

 
WASHINGTON (MarketWatch) - The U.S. trade deficit narrowed unexpectedly in March as exports of capital and consumer goods and farm products surged, the Commerce Department said Wednesday.
 

This will, of course, despite rising interest rates and energy prices, bring about a significant upward revision to the already robust 3.1% 1st Quarter Economic Growth Rate assessment. This "Pretty Good and Keeps Gettin' Better" thing sure gets worse and worse for those who'd prefer to portray otherwise. Them poor folks just can't catch a break. I expect we'll see some commentary explaining why what we see isn't what we see.
 
 
And more disappointment today for the Doom & Gloom crowd:

 
 Retail Sales Climb 1.4% As Auto Demand Surges 
The Wall Street Journal
May 12, 2005

Retail sales jumped 1.4% in April, the strongest showing in six months, as consumers streamed back into auto showrooms and shopping malls, the Commerce Department reported Thursday.

Last month's increase was far better than the 0.8% gain economists polled by Dow Jones Newswires and CNBC had been expecting and represented a significant rebound from the lackluster revised 0.4% increase in March.

Soaring demand for cars led the spending surge: Auto and parts sales rose 2.5% after climbing just 0.8% in March. With more new cars on the road, gasoline-station sales climbed 1.9% as prices at the pumped remained at a high level, but the gain was slightly smaller than the 2.2% increase posted in March.

But retail strength was widespread even after stripping away the strong demand for cars and gasoline. Clothing stores posted the biggest increase in demand in more than two years, while general-merchandise stores and building-material and garden-equipment dealers posted particularly large gains...
 

 
 U.S. MBA's Index of Home Purchases Rises to a Record  (Update 1)

May 12 (Bloomberg) -- Applications filed with mortgage lenders for home purchases rose to a record last week, a sign housing is providing unwavering support for the U.S. economy.

The Mortgage Bankers Association's gauge of purchase applications increased 9.1 percent for the week to 526.2. The rise and a jump in refinancing helped boost the Washington-based group's overall applications index by 9.4 percent to 781.

The gain for all mortgage applications was the third straight and the largest since a 16 percent rise in the week ended Jan. 14. An improving labor market, stronger wage growth and the prospect of higher borrowing costs in coming months, are powering home sales that reached a record last year.

``Housing activity continues to contribute positively to overall economic growth,'' said Steven Wood, chief economist at Insight Economics LLC in Boulder, Colorado. The Federal Reserve is ``still having difficulty getting the economy to slow through monetary policy tightening because long-term interest rates refuse to climb.''
 

Its all Bush's fault.
 
 
Keep crowing, Timber.

When the whole thing starts to slide down it will be quite satisfying to link to these posts of yours.

The longer our economy delays the inevitable, the worse it will be; you'll see...

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Don't hold your breath Cyc.
 
 
I won't (it might take a while) but unless you can show me the industry or investment that's going to lift us out of the cycle, I will continue to believe that we are headed for some hard times.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
I won't (it might take a while) but unless you can show me the industry or investment that's going to lift us out of the cycle, I will continue to believe that we are headed for some hard times.

Cycloptichorn
 

Don't you know Timberlandko has a crystal ball? He even has the gall to tell me he thinks he knows what will happen in my parish church though he has never been there, lives about 1500 miles away and is not even a practicing Catholic.
 
 
Not any sorta religionist period. Done quite a bit of reading and discussing the issue though. For many years. No crystal ball, either - but years of my track record re economic and political developments is here on the boards for all to see. I haven't done badly at all. My views have drawn some heat, but events have not been inconvenient to many of the propositions I have forwarded.
 
 
Oh puhleeeze, you make general statements that can't be proven right or wrong. Where will the Dow be at the end of this calendar year?
 
 
Been there, done that  Here ... with the lookback  Here .

For this year, I don't see a whole lotta movement - I expect at year end we'll have a DOW somewhere between 10.5K - 10.75K. 11K on the upside is just possible, but I don't have much confidence in that, given current indicators. On the other hand, if we go into summer above 10.5, with declining energy prices, it could happen. I think the 10K floor has been tested well enough to be considered quite firm, and barring any unforseen calamity, there is no reason to expect it might fail to hold. In short, I expect the DOW will mostly plug along sideways for a while, with light-to-moderate uptrend.
 
 
 http://www.harpers.org/ExcerptNoneDare.html 

 
Bankruptcies in U.S. surge to record high

AUG. 24 5:03 P.M. ET The number of bankruptcies in the United States surged to an all-time high in the second quarter of this year as financially troubled consumers scrambled to file before a rewrite of bankruptcy laws takes full effect.

Bankruptcy filings to federal courts in the April-to-June quarter totaled 467,333, according to data released Wednesday from the Administrative Office of the U.S. Courts. That marked a record number of filings made in any quarter.

Of that total, most -- 458,597 -- were personal bankruptcy filings; the remaining 8,736 were businesses filing for bankruptcy, the data showed...
 
 
 
Twaddle. Whatchya got there is the last gasp of the imperilled bankruptcy industry, its bottom-feeding lawyers scambling to suck up the last of the easy legal fees by rounding up as many deadbeats as they can corral before the free ride ends.

 
 Bankruptcy Filings Up as Law Takes Effect 

By REUTERS
Filed at 11:26 a.m. ET

WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Bankruptcy filings in U.S. federal courts jumped 16 percent in the quarter ended June 30 from the previous period as individuals rushed to file before a tougher law takes effect, a report from the Administrative Office of the U.S. Court showed on Wednesday.

The quarterly total was the highest level of bankruptcy filings on record under a data series dating to the March 1995 period, the first quarter for which figures are available, a spokeswoman at the Administrative Office said.

In the April-to-June quarter, just prior to and in the three months after a new federal bankruptcy act became law, filings totaled 467,333, up 66,000 from the previous period. Compared with a year ago, filings rose 11 percent, the Administrative Office said.

Filings in the 12 months ended June 30 rose 0.1 percent to 1.64 million from the comparable period a year ago.

The Administrative Office of the U.S. Court said the overall increase in filings was primarily fueled by a surge in Chapter 7 filings, which calls for the liquidation of assets but allows filers to keep some property, such as a primary residence.

A new law passed earlier this year makes it tougher for individuals to qualify for Chapter 7 bankruptcy, forcing them instead to file under Chapter 13, which places debtors in repayment plans. The act became law on April 20, although many of its provisions will take effect on Oct. 17.

Chapter 7 filings jumped 17.7 percent to 362,481 in the quarter ended June 30, which is the Judiciary's third quarter. For the year ended June 30, Chapter 7 filings totaled 1.2 million, up 2.5 percent from the year earlier.

Chapter 13 filings totaled 103,142 in the third quarter and 433,945 in the year ended June 30. The 12-month total was down 5.1 percent from the year earlier.

In the 12-month period, business filings dropped to 32,406, down 9.3 percent from 35,739 filings reported in the previous 12-month period.
 
 
 
Gas prices at an all-time High, and going farther up.

Housing prices down 14% on average in the last three months.

Dow is basically stagnant.

October, the CC minimum payments double.

Don't expect a good Q4 this year; people are feeling the pinch.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Meanwhile, elsewhere in the real workl, a place not frequented by deadbeats, bottom-feeding lawyers, and Bushophobes:

 
 Jobless Claims Drop by 4,000 Last Week 

By Martin Crutsinger
The Associated Press

WASHINGTON (AP) - The number of Americans filing new claims for unemployment benefits declined last week with the four-week average for people receiving benefits dropping to the lowest level in more than four years.
The Labor Department reported that 315,000 newly laid off workers applied for jobless benefits, a decline of 4,000 from the previous week, providing further evidence that solid economic growth is showing up in an improving labor market.

The four-week average for the total number of people receiving benefits dipped to 2.58 million last week, the lowest level for this figure since March 2001, the month the last recession began.

The drop of 4,000 benefit applications last week was slightly better than economists had been forecasting. Since early January, claims levels have remained well below 350,000 at levels that analysts view as signaling a healthy labor market.

That improvement was shown in the total number of people receiving benefits, which dropped to 2.58 million, based on a four-week moving average, down by 312,000 from the level of a year ago.

So far this year, a strong economy has generated an average of 191,000 new jobs per month, better than last year's average of 183,000. Employers created 207,000 jobs in July, which helped to keep the unemployment rate at a low level of 5 percent.

Many analysts believe that the overall economy, which grew at an annual rate of 3.4 percent in the spring, is powering ahead at an even faster pace above 4 percent in the current July-September quarter.

Forecasters believe the labor market will continue to improve as long as soaring energy costs don't jolt business and consumer confidence and cause cutbacks in spending. On Wednesday, the price of crude oil soared to a new all-time closing high of $67.10 per barrel.

So far, surging energy prices have not spilled over into a broadbased rise in inflation. This has allowed the Federal Reserve to continue raising interest rates at a gradual pace to make sure inflation does not get out of control.

AP-ES-08-25-05 0833EDT
 
 
 
I believe the economy is going to completely go to shit very soon. In the next six to nine months, the bottom will drop out. Trust me, it will happen. I KNOW it.

I had a psychic premonitory dream about it.
 
 
 
I believe the economy is going to completely go to shit very soon. In the next six to nine months, the bottom will drop out. Trust me, it will happen. I KNOW it.

I had a psychic premonitory dream about it.
 

 Flashback , kicky, and  Redux 

Deja-vu all over again - LOL
 
 
Ha! Just for the record, the Kerry comment was true, and the other one was just me messin' with you Bushie-types.

This one, however, is a prediction that came to me from the world of the spirits...HEED THEIR WARNING, MERE MORTALS!
 
 
 
....and the fact remains this Administration has recorded a net job gain
 

A) Fer Chrissake, if you don't record a net job gain, you're doing horribly.

The population goes up every year. That's means more people require goods and services every year. So more people get hired every year. There are very, very few years since records were kept that there were no net job gains. The question is: how much? Did you keep up with the population increase? If you don't, you are doing terribly.

B) Bush has not only not kept up with population growth in the number of jobs created since he took office, there are now over 300,000 fewer people in the prime of their working lives employed than when he took over.

That's right. When Bush took over, there were over 300,000 more people in the 25-54 year old age group working then than are working now. Yet, the population growth in that same group has gone up 2.9% since Bush took over.

Why does the unemployment rate look good? Because if you were laid off three or four years ago and ran out of places to apply to, you are no longer considered "unemployed" and you don't count in the unemployment statistic.

Fact is, if Bush's job gains has been able to keep pace with inflation, 3.2 million more people in their prime working years would be employed than are employed now. In fact, if Bush's job gains were able to keep up with population growth, 3.9 million people of all ages would be employed than are working now.
 
 
Here are the numbers. Check them yourself.

Dec 2000
25-54 yrs: 98.6 million employed

June 2005
25-54 yrs: 98.3 million employed.

Meanwhile, the population of 25 to 54 year olsds increased 2.9% in that time.

Number of jobs lost due to failure to keep pace with population growth: 3.2 million.

If Timberland or someone else can explain how it is a good economy when the population goes up but the number of people working in the prime of their lives declines, I would be eternally grateful.
 
 
 
Here are the numbers. Check them yourself.

Dec 2000
25-54 yrs: 98.6 million employed

June 2005
25-54 yrs: 98.3 million employed.

Meanwhile, the population of 25 to 54 year olsds increased 2.9% in that time.

Number of jobs lost due to failure to keep pace with population growth: 3.2 million.

If Timberland or someone else can explain how it is a good economy when the population goes up but the number of people working in the prime of their lives declines, I would be eternally grateful.
 

No spin, just hard data - check it yourself:

US Civilian Labor Force (Thousands) Jan 2000-Jul 2005
 

US Employment Level (Thousands) Jan 2000-Jul 2005
 

US Unemployment Rate (%) Jan 2000-Jul 2005
 

US GDP, % Change, by Quarter, Q1 2000 - Q2 2005
 

US GDP Detail, Full Year, 2000 - 20004
 

US Personal Income Detail, Full-Year 2000-2004
 

All data:  US Dept. of Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics 

Employment, GDP, Productivity, and Personal Income up, unemployment down - amazing some folks are depressed by the fact the US Economy is robust, expanding sustainably, and the envy of the world. No wonder the Bushophobes are angry; they just can't catch a break.
 
 
OK - tomorrow is the last trading day of the year. Lets see how far off my guess was. No fair calling it 'till Market Close, now.

 
Been there, done that  Here ... with the lookback  Here .

For this year, I don't see a whole lotta movement - I expect at year end we'll have a DOW somewhere between 10.5K - 10.75K. 11K on the upside is just possible, but I don't have much confidence in that, given current indicators. On the other hand, if we go into summer above 10.5, with declining energy prices, it could happen. I think the 10K floor has been tested well enough to be considered quite firm, and barring any unforseen calamity, there is no reason to expect it might fail to hold. In short, I expect the DOW will mostly plug along sideways for a while, with light-to-moderate uptrend.
 
 
 
OK - so I pegged the Year-End Dow at 10.5 to 10.75K, the Year-End Close was 10717.50 - close enough, I'd say.
 
 
timberlandko, you seem to have a pretty good fix on the economy. Should I buy some stock? What will DJIA be at end of 2006. By the way, the economy looks good to me. I've never seen so many people Christmas shopping, and a COMPUSA I went into looked like it had been riddled in some areas almost like a flea market because of depleted stocks of equipment, digital cameras, etc. I don't know where people are making their money, but they sure seem to be spending it.
 
 
Too early yet to make a reasoned estimate for next year, but I don't see any reason to expect any sort of downturn. As ar as investing, thats up to you - watch the issues that interest you, learn about the firms behind the stocks, and make your choices. Don't play with money you can't afford to lose, spread your risk, and figure on longterm holdings, as opposed to quick profits, and you'll do fine. Just about any investing is better than no investing, but remember its a discipline, not a game. You want a money game, go to Vegas.
 
 
 

Chicago Tribune, December 31, 2005

Related online article:  Wall Street's 2005 journey: An eventful trip going nowhere 
 
 
Just my personal opinion, but I think the stock market is still correcting for the internet craze and tech bubble of the 90's, wherein people drove up internet stocks and other tech stocks based on future earnings projections, while many projections never happened, many of them lost money, never did earn anything, and many went belly up. But then I am not an economist, just an observer.

Just another observation, I wonder if some want a housing bust, they keep predicting it. I don't see it. The population continues to grow, real estate is limited, and construction of new houses cannot come down due to the high cost of materials and labor. There may be a slight correction in super inflated areas, such as in California and other high dollar spots, and in the most severely inflated areas a more severe correction, but even that remains to be seen.
 
 
We blew all that sh*t up for two years and where still in the same spot? Maybe we should start blowing up some other sh*t.
 
 
The huge deficits from the Iraq misadventure is coming home to roost. The housing market was artificially stimulated with artificial low rates and Katrina. Antipathy towards GWB, has dried the market for American goods in some parts of the globe.
 
 
marking this
 
 
Just a thought to ponder - by the doomsayer's pronouncements, The US Economy has been headed toward collapse since the end of WW II. To be considered as a likely reason for the failure of such prognostications to come to fruition is the fact The US economy is the largest, most stable, most diverse, most free-market driven, most nearly self-sufficient economy on the planet - whole buncha redundancy and self-correction capability built in there. Another note of interest is that The US simultaneously is the Largest Debtor Nation and the largest Creditor Nation on the planet; the Global Economy depends on The US Economy.

And for those who's impression includes the notion The US is globally unpopular, well, thats pretty much the way it always has been. There have been "Love the USA" spikes from time to time, but in general, The US/US Policy is complained about, opposed, distrusted, and envied as matter of course.

The US led The Global Economy out of the slump brought on by the retraction at the turn of the present century of the Pacific Rim economies. Despite the impacts of 9/11, the military actions in the Middle East and Southwest Asia, 3 hard-fought, divisive domestic elections, unprecedented natural disasters, and staggering energy cost increases, the US Economy has clipped along at a growth rate in the 4% range, the US Deficit expansion even in the face of massive military expenditure, growth of entitlement spending and broad-based tax-rate cuts continues to slow as tax revenues continue to surpass expectatons.

Perhaps the most common mistake made globally re The US is to underestimate The US. Like it or not, The US takes care of itself, and in so doing largely sees to the pace and prosperity of the planet. That's not through altruism; it just makes good economic sense, and The US is a nation built on and maintained by good economic sense. Those who think otherwise always have been with us, and always continue to be puzzled by the failure of their negative assessments to find validation as history unfolds. There may be a lesson there.
 
 
 
Just a thought to ponder - by the doomsayer's pronouncements, The US Economy has been headed toward collapse since the end of WW II.
 

I think, Timber, that that was a bit of a stretch, but it was a good opening line. You used the word "most" many times in your post. The US is the most stable, most diverse etc.
Yes, we are big and powerful but we are also vulnerable, Timber, because (1) we persist in living beyond our means and (2) because (well, I'll come back to that later).
As a country, we continue to run large budget deficits and trade deficits. Can we keep doing that endlessly? And individually, not you or me of course, we Americans are up to our eyeballs in personal debt. Credit card debt, interest only mortgage loans.
Yes, Timber, perhaps I am Chicken Little, but to me, we are headed for some tough times ahead.
And I never even got to (2).

I hope that we can keep this site civil, unlike the Spying one. I lost interest when the name-calling started. Thank you for starting this discussion. -johnboy-
 
 
Yeah, I did use the word "most" a lot; it applies where no other word will suit. I understand where you're coming from, rjb - but I submit you're coming from the same place those who continually find themselves disappointed by the US and its Economy's failure to fail come from. Meanwhile, The US and its Economy continue to stride forward.
 
 
[quote="timberlandko",rjb - but I submit you're coming from the same place those who continually find themselves disappointed by the US and its Economy's failure to fail come from.[/quote]

Enough for one day. Timber, I am not a liberal academic preaching economic theory from a tenured post at some ivy covered college. I run a small chain of retail stores (30 years). Four of them. Every two weeks each of the 32 employees gets a pay check. There is a mad rush to the bank to cash them.
And once a month I write a check for an amount that seems to get larger every month for their health insurance premiums.

I am not disappointed about the US economy, Timber. I am scared.
 
 
I hear ya, rjb, and don't mean to minimize the reality of the apprehension you feel - I just don't see much basis for it, particularly given that with 30 years of history behind it, yours apparently is a viable business model. The future usually works out best for those who plan for it, as oposed to those who fear it.
 
 
realjohnboy- I ask you to ponder these facts concerning the US economy and the future. Timberlandko has brought together an array of indisputable facts which point towards a good future. Indeed, the Unemployment Rate has fallen to 4.9%. There are loads of cites from the nineties(made by professional economists) which give 5% as the "irreducable figure for unemployment.

But-on to the deficits--

The government's ability to finance its debt is tied to the size and strength of its economy,or Gross Domestic Product. As a percentage of GDP, debt held by the public was highest at the end of World War II. It was actually higher than the GDP. It was 108% of GDP.

By 1974, debt fell to 24 % of the GDP.

Then, it rose again and now may be as much as 70% of GDP.

When we review the decline from 108% in 1945 to 24% in 1974, we find that ALTHOUGH the deficits did not stop and the total debt increased, the economy GREW FASTER.

That would mean that if we are to have a secure economic future, we must continue to keep taxes low so as to stimulate business so that the GDP can grow while simultaneously cutting as much waste in the yearly budget as possible. When all things are considered, this task may seem to be almost impossible, yet it must be done.

We now have a GDP which is over Eleven TRILLION and quickly headed for TWELVE Trillion since a 4% GDP growth per year( which is close to what we are getting) adds about 440,000 BILLION a year to our GDP.

We must somehow try to replicate the experience of the 1945-1974 era.
 
 
All agreed. Excellent information. Rather than raise taxes, the answer is to control the rate of growth of government spending. We can grow ourselves out of extreme debt. Taxing ourselves out of it would only suppress the economy and increase the debt.

Mortkat and Timberlandko, you seem to be fairly proficient on the economy, there may be others, but I am fairly new to this forum. A question I have for you. There seems to be lots of economists proclaiming their wisdom, but to this day I've not run across a subject or a point that I've been curious about for a long time. It seems like the question would lend itself to some mathematical determination if the economists would simply shed their political bias and look at the facts of history. The question is this: and I will frame it with a couple of obvious assumptions:
If the tax rate is zero, the economy is unfettered, does great, but the government takes in no tax monies to fund its bureaucracy, some of which all of us desire and want, the argument is how much. At the other extreme, a 100% tax would suppress the economy so severely because nobody would see any reason to work very much if any at all, and there would be widespread starvation along with an underfunded government to support everybody, cases in point being failed communist systems around the world. My question is, somewhere in the middle is the most efficient rate of tax, above which the total tax revenues suffer, and below which the tax revenues also suffer. It is perhaps my thesis here that the optimum rate should dictate the maximum amount of government that we can and should afford. I have not heard anybody explain the scenario in this manner and then propose what that tax rate number would be, based on historical and mathematical figures. I believe we are well above that number already. Perhaps this argument is commonly known among economists, but I haven't encountered it myself, I have only come up with this line of thinking on my own from common sense. Do you have any thoughts on this?

This question has a very pertinent real world application in politics whereby Democrats see the economy as a zero sum game, so that if the government needs more money, simply raise taxes, without considering the very real likelihood that raising tax rates may actually reduce the tax revenues, which is the very oppositie effect than expected in their simplistic minds. The other possibility is that lowering the tax rates while increasing spending faster than tax revenues is not the answer either, as some Republicans may unwittingly support. I would simply like to see our fiscal responsibility tied to real world facts rather than political rhetoric.
 
 
There has long been much conjecture - informed and otherwise - on what might constitute the "Optimum Tax Rate" - but not much in the way of meaningful conclusions. A rate which does not unduly burden business while providing government with adequate resources to perform necessay and legislated functions probably is impossible to figure out - too many variables, too many decision points, too many unknowns. However,  The Laffer Curve  demonstrates that at somewhere in the vicinity of 30%, taxation becomes counterproductive. It is not universally accepted.
 
 
The notion that cutting taxes raises federal revenue is a lie. It has been disproven by the last 25 years of history.

Also, the unemployment rate is not a true measurement of economic success; it only tracks those who are looking for work, not those who have given up looking, not those who have found lower-paying jobs than their old ones.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
Bush's Job Growth WORST in 50 Years

by bonddad
Tue Jan 03, 2006 at 06:33:32 AM PDT
Bush's giant Right Wing Noise Machine (RWNM) loves to preach about the Bush economic miracle. In fact, the RWNM's current thinking is Bush doesn't spend enough time talking about his economic triumphs. If only he did, then everyone would fall in line and believe in the great Bush economic miracle. There is one problem with this argument: it's a lie. Any way you look at the Bush economy, it comes up short. Today, I want to compare Bush's job creation record with other economic recoveries. As usual, Bush comes up way short.

The national Bureau of Economic Research has identified  8  recessions since May 1954. For comparison purposed, I only used 5 of these periods because they are longer than the current expansion. Next, I used the  total nonfarm  employment numbers from the Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS). I measured the jobs created from the trough (lowest point) to the next identified highest economic point. (The  NBER  states a "peak marks the end of an expansion and the beginning of a recession.") I compared the total number jobs created for the entire expansion as well as the total number of jobs created 49 months into the expansion (According to the NBER, the lowest point of the last trough was in November 2001, making December 2005 the 49th month of this expansion). Here's how the numbers (in millions) compare.

The expansion of 2/61 - 12/69 created 17,684 total jobs and 6,244 at 49 months.

The expansion of 3/75 - 7/80 created 13,183 total jobs and 12,831 at 49 months.

The expansion of 11/82 - 7/90 created 21,003 total jobs and 11,510 at 49 months.

The expansion of 3/91 - 3/01 created 23,969 total jobs and 8,266 at 49 months.

The current expansion which started in November 2001 has created a total of 3,410 jobs.

In other words, at 49 months into an expansion, Bush's job creation record is last. While we don't know when this expansion will end, the Bush economy would have to triple the total number of jobs created in order to get to 4th place on this list.

What's going on here? The basic problem is some areas of the economy are creating jobs. The BLS tracks 13 different job sectors. 7 (a little over half) have created jobs since November 2001 - natural resources/mining (37,000), construction (539,000), financial (550,000), professional services (238,000), education/health (2.1 million), leisure/hospitality (803,000) and governmental employees (1 million). Of all the jobs created three areas - government, education/health account for 57% of job growth. Of the jobs created outside of education, health and governmental employees (2,167,000), construction, professional services and financial services account for about 60% of the jobs created. Real estate is obviously related to all of these areas. Construction is obviously related to real estate, as are financial services (mortgage lending etc...) and professional services (real estate agents, appraisers etc...) So, real estate, governmental employees and health/education jobs are doing just fine.

6 areas - a little under half of the sectors the BLS tracks - have had a net loss in number of jobs : manufacturing (-2,800,000), information (-565,000), trade/transport/utilities (-353), whole sales trade (-107), retail (-157), and transportation/warehousing (67,000). Manufacturing and information are obviously the two biggest areas of job losses. Some of the information service jobs are the result of natural attrition from Y2K. However, I somehow doubt that is the only reason for the losses. While there is no information regarding outsourcing losses (because the government does not keep any statistics on the subject), I fell safe in assuming outsourcing is a big factor involved in the losses.

In summation, some people are doing well. They can find jobs and are probably financially somewhat secure. However, others have seen their jobs literally disappear overnight and are hurting to find new jobs that pay commensurate levels. These people are hurting from the current "expansion". Of course, Bush and the RWNM has forgotten about them.

 

 http://dailykos.com/storyonly/2006/1/3/83332/75953 

Bush's term has seen the loss of almost 3 million manufacturing jobs, and the rise of a million Gov't employees. And yet he's hailed as a conservative.

Refute the numbers, if you can.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
The notion that cutting taxes raises federal revenue is a lie. It has been disproven by the last 25 years of history.
Cycloptichorn
 

How about Reagans tax cuts? Revenues greatly expanded. The mistake was way too much expansion of government spending to go along with it.

Cycloptichorn, yep, its all Bush's fault. Thats a great analysis. I've been around since the 40's, and people are living better now than ever. As I learned long time ago, statistics don't lie but liars will figure. The reality is the economy is like a huge ocean liner. It is pretty much going to go where it goes. It does not turn on a dime, and the factors that determine where it goes are multiple and various in nature, some of which we can control and some which we can't. Some of the factors are entrenched from years ago and the president cannot change all the factors. Some factors are foreign, some are just the trend of the world, some are societal and cultural. Our education system as it is being conducted today will affect the economy many years down the road.

So if the economy booms, I do not think Bush deserves all the credit, nor did Clinton deserve all credit for the economy in the 90's. Furthermore, the economy by nature is cyclical. Compared to some European countries where tax rates are higher, their economies have higher unemployment and worse problems than ours. We are not doing badly. We can do better. And I believe the long term picture is not particularly great looking when you consider the emphasis of education these days.
 
 
I never stated that it was all Bush's fault. I believe he has gotten some very bad advice.

But I believe the policies he champions don't help anyone but the rich; they certainly haven't helped the middle class.

As for the Reagan issue, go to the CBO website. Reagan cuts taxes in 1981 and raised them in 1983. From 1981 - 1983, tax revenue was 599 billion, 617 billion and 600 billion respectively. It wasn't until 1984 - after Regan raised taxes and the economy entered an expansion - that tax revenue increased.

Here's a link:  http://www.cbo.gov/showdoc.cfm?index=1821&sequence=0 

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Do you at least see the logic that there is in fact an optimum tax rate somewhere between 0 and 100%, and if the current rate was optimum, then raising the rate would decrease revenues? We can argue what the number would be, but try to take politics blinders off and say what you believe about the math. After all, this is simple math here.
 
 
I do agree with that logical statement, but the thing that you don't realize is that the optimum tax rate is to the right, or higher, than what our current tax rate is. We have a long, long way to raise taxes (especially amongst the wealthy) before we reach the point of diminishing Revenues due to taxation.

The idea that cutting taxes spurs the economy is false. Clinton raised taxes in 1994. That was followed by 6 years of economic expansion. Reagan raised taxes in 1984. That led to 6 years of expansion. Contrast this to Bush's tax cuts.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
I do agree with that logical statement, but the thing that you don't realize is that the optimum tax rate is to the right, or higher, than what our current tax rate is. We have a long, long way to raise taxes (especially amongst the wealthy) before we reach the point of diminishing Revenues due to taxation.

The idea that cutting taxes spurs the economy is false. Clinton raised taxes in 1994. That was followed by 6 years of economic expansion. Reagan raised taxes in 1984. That led to 6 years of expansion. Contrast this to Bush's tax cuts.

Cycloptichorn
 

Okay, we've established the basic fact that cutting tax rates may not decrease revenues. The argument then becomes whether we are currently above or below the optimum rate at the present time. If we can take politics out of it, which is virtually impossible I will admit, then perhaps we could get the country's foremost economists to simply look at the numbers throughout history in an unbiased manner and come up with their best guess, but with the guess based on actual figures.

I think you also need to get rid of your bias against the "rich" and quit caring whether they are richer than you. The fact is that rich people pay by far the vast majority of all income taxes, and in fact poor people pay absolutely no income tax at all. Actually, I think this actually bodes ill because that segment of society has no vested interest at all in cutting government spending and making government efficient. They don't care and thus will vote for people that promise to increase their entitlements.

Anyway, I don't see much profit in arguing the point further. You think our tax rates are far below the optimum. We are already paying over 50% tax if you add all the taxes up, and I think this figure is well over the optimum to have the most efficient economic policy.
 
 
It is a provable fact that our tax rates are far below the optimum, ie, the place where cutting taxes raises revenues. The proof of this is in the history of revenues for the last 25 years, as I stated earlier in the thread; every time they were cut, revenues dropped. This is not opinion.

In the last 25 years, when taxes were raised, revenues rose as well. I don't see how you can look at this fact and not conclude that the tax rate, which has been cut significantly by Bush, doesn't have a lot of room to go up.

I personally don't give a damn about rich people; I'm happy with my life the way it is. But I can't stand tax breaks for them that they don't need in the slightest, when it is proven to hurt our country financially, when we are massively in debt! I can't stand the lies.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Cyc, the budget continues to fail to expand per projections and Democratic Party Supporter preferences, real income is increasing steadily in terms of dollar volume, median and average wage, and wage-per-hour, and more Americans are employed today than at any time in history. While the Budget Deficit appears historically large in absolute dollar terms, considered as a percentage of GDP it is well within norms for the entire post-WWII period, and well below the average for the term of The Previous Administration. The lower reaches of the tax-paying public now pay a lesser share of their income in Federal Taxes than prior to the tax cuts, while tose in the upper reaches pay a greater share of their income than was the pre-tax-cut-case. Likewise, those in the upper 25% of all income brackets pay overwhelmingly more of the overall tax burden than do those comprising the entire lower 50% of all income brackets.

I know you don't agree, and I know you're angry. I can understand the anger you share with Democratic Party Supporters and Bushophobes in general; frustration, failure, futility, and rejection will do that.

As I've said many times before, you guys are doing a great job; please keep it up.
 
 
Timberlandko- It appears to me that even a minimal search by Cyclo would reveal that tax cuts do indeed raise revenue. This appears to be counterintuitive but further reflection reveals that the monies saved by corporations and entrepreneurs is not, as some would have it, stuffed under the mattress but recycled into the economy to produce more goods and, of course, more jobs.

It is clear that the tax cuts of the past have resulted in more revenues. According to

 http://www.heritage.org/Research/Taxes/BG1086.cfm 

quote

"Across the board tax rate reductions in the 1920's reduced the top rate from 71 percent to 24 percent. The economy boomed, growing by 59 percent between 1921 and 1929"

"In 1930, Herbert Hoover raised tax rates from 25percent to a maximum of 63 percent, and Franklin Roosevelt boosted them to 79 percent later in the decade. The 1930's, to put it mildly, are not remembered as one of the American economy's better decades"

"Across the board tax rate reductions introduced by President John F. Kennedy reduced the top rate from 91 percent to 70 percent. These lower rates, along with substantially lower taxes on savings and investment are associated with the longest economic expansion in American history"

"The Johnson surtax, enacted in 1968 during the administration of president Lyndon Johnson, combined with the inflation-induced bracket creep of tghe 1970's, resulted in a decade of stagflation"

"Reagan's across the board tax cuts ushered in America's longest peacetime expansion, helping to create 20 million new jobs and pushing incomes and living standards to record highs"

Tax cuts have worked to improve our economy. It is irrefutable.
 
 
Good evening to yall. So far the discussion on this thread has been civil. As soon as it turns nasty...I am gone.

Mortkat: I don't claim to be an economist. I took several courses in undergrad and later in grad school. I was taught that an unemployment rate of 5% or so meant, pretty much, that everyone was working except for some folks who, for one reason or another, were temporarily out of work, 5% is good,

But then I read about companies like GM and Ford etc eliminating thousands of jobs. Those folks did what? Not, apparently, going on unemployment. Underemployment, They went to work for Wal-Mart (a cheap shot, I would admit. Perhaps we will get into talking about wages at a later time).
 
 
Can't believe I'm breaking my personal rule against responding to you, Chiczaira.

The reason I don't trust your article is because it contains false information. Specifically,

"Reagan's across the board tax cuts ushered in America's longest peacetime expansion, helping to create 20 million new jobs and pushing incomes and living standards to record highs"

 http://www.cbo.gov/showdoc.cfm?index=1821&sequence=0 

It wasn't until 1984, when Reagan raised taxes, that federal revenues began to rise. It wasn't his tax cuts.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Nevermind Reagan. Here's a look at the Clintoon administration's employment and wage performance across its entire tenure from 1993 through 2000 and the performance of Bush The Greater's Administration from 2001 onwards.
 
 
 
Good evening to yall. So far the discussion on this thread has been civil. As soon as it turns nasty...I am gone.

Mortkat: I don't claim to be an economist. I took several courses in undergrad and later in grad school. I was taught that an unemployment rate of 5% or so meant, pretty much, that everyone was working except for some folks who, for one reason or another, were temporarily out of work, 5% is good,

But then I read about companies like GM and Ford etc eliminating thousands of jobs. Those folks did what? Not, apparently, going on unemployment. Underemployment, They went to work for Wal-Mart (a cheap shot, I would admit. Perhaps we will get into talking about wages at a later time).
 

Everyone must keep in mind here that the face of the American economy has been changing long before Bush, whether Democrat or Republican, with world market factors driving the change. Manufacturing has been moving overseas for decades. Virtually everything in Walmart was made in China or some other country. Not Bush's fault. Not Clinton's fault. Not Reagan's fault, and not Carter's fault either. Probably all of our faults, starting with Unions decades ago maybe having at least something to do with it. I think we're lucky to be as well off as we are.
 
 
 And here are your "Tax Cuts For The Rich" 

Just who pays taxes anyway? Those in the top 20% of income level pay 80% of all Income Tax, while those in the lower 60% of income brackets pay 4.1% of Income Tax collected, and the top 1% of earners alone chip in 31.6% of all Income Taxes paid. In terms of overall Federal Tax burden, the top 20% pay 64.3% of all Federal Taxes, the top 1% accounting for 21.5% by itself, while the lower 60% account for 16.5% of Federal Tax Revenue.

 
The share of the reduced overall burden has indeed gone down (again, on average) for the most affluent groups, mainly as a result of cutting the top rates and reducing taxes on income from dividends and capital gains.

Furthermore, the middle 20% pays a bit higher share, and the next-highest 20% saw their share of the total burden to up by seven-tenths of one percent... the share of total federal taxes paid by the least affluent Americans -- those in the bottom 40% of earners -- has also decreased a bit... the overall system remains progressive, with upper-income groups paying significantly both higher rates and a higher share of the overall burden than lower-income groups.
 
 
 
Thank goodness for rich people or we'd all be in terrible shape.
 
 
Do you have any stats on the percentage of the country's wealth that top 20% controls.

The % of wealth that lower 60% produces for the top 20%.
 
 
 
Do you have any stats on the percentage of the country's wealth that top 20% controls.

The % of wealth that lower 60% produces for the top 20%.
 

Straw Man, Amigo. Without the top 20% the bottom 80% would have no jobs with which to produce anything.
 
 
The top 20% can go without a source of production?

We would hardly miss the boss nor do we need him like he needs us. I don't believe in myths.

I notice you don't answer my first questions
 
 
Well at least I know one of them 20% is Irish, ay buddy.

Till next time.
 
 
 
The top 20% can go without a source of production?

We would hardly miss the boss nor do we need him like he needs us. I don't believe in myths.

I notice you don't answer my first questions
 

Without one another neither component have much to look forward to. It ain't a competition, its a team effort. for your First question, dignifying it with a response, I offer the following:

The lower 40% of US households control approxomately 1% of the National Wealth, while the top 1% of US households control a bit less than 30% of the National Wealth. The upper 20% of households, those which pay 80% of the taxes, hold 80% of the National Wealth. Largely, Business Ownership - Enteprenurialism - is the chief driver of this disparity; it takes money to make money. A surprisingly small proportion of US wealth is "Inherited", less, in fact than is common in the rest of the "Western World"; by far the bulk of it is "Earned". Notable also is that what would be a poverty-level income in the US (defined by the UN's WHO as below 50% of a nation's median income) would rank that income within the "well-to-do" categories in around 60% of the rest of the world by population. The US "poor" on average are better off than any other "poor" on the planet.
 Primary Source  (Note: 15 page.pdf document)

From another source, a  1998 US Wealth Distribution Chart 

That aside, nearly 70% of US households live in their own homes, a higher home-ownership rate than will be found elsewhere. Residential structures and real estate account for over half the Real National Wealth of the US. Nowhere else on the planet is the populace of a nation so broadly invested in the actual real wealth of that nation - Americans invest in themselves.

A paper you may find interesting:  Housing, Portfolio Choice and the Macroeconomy  (Note: 45 page.pdf document)
Silos, P., PhD, Research Economist and Assistant Policy Adviser, Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta
Presented March, 2005, University of Maryland.

Now of course it isn't all milk and honey and luxury SUVs - Utopia simply is not acheiveable. That is no reason to shy from striving for improvement, but heaven ain't on earth. There will be inequity, there will be tragedy, there will be pain. Some places of less of those than do others, and the US share of that sorry list is such that among the greatest problems facing the US is illegal immigration; folks hate America and its system so much - want so little to do with The US and its policies and economy - that we as a nation find ourselves seriously talking of building fences to keep them out.
 
 
A fine post, Timberlandko. And to add to that, according to THE WORLD FACTBOOK, the USA is No. 2 in the world in GDP Per Capita. The USA has a GDP per capita of $40,100 in 2004 second only to Luxembourg who ranks No. 1 with a per capita GDP of $58,900.

Some of the countries whose citizens snipe at the USA( ENVY?) have a far lower GDP per capita--

Canada--$31,500

Australia--$30,700

U K--------$29.600

Netherlands--$29,500

France-------$28,700

Germany----$28,700

Some of those anemic GDP per capita numbers are doubtlessly due to the countries' unfortunate philosophical and political alliance with the putative advantages of Socialism.
 
 
 
. I was taught that an unemployment rate of 5% or so meant, pretty much, that everyone was working except for some folks who, for one reason or another, were temporarily out of work, 5% is good,

But then I read about companies like GM and Ford etc eliminating thousands of jobs. Those folks did what? Not, apparently, going on unemployment. Underemployment, They went to work for Wal-Mart (a cheap shot, I would admit. Perhaps we will get into talking about wages at a later time).
 

Just what is the "base rate" of unemployment as you describred it is the subject of a good deal of inquiry among economists. There is reason to believe that the 5% base rate you describe in the United States has decreased somewhat in recent years. Conversely in other countries with very generous and long-lasting unemployment benefits (susch as Germany until recently) the base rate appears to be a good deal hiugher. No surpriise here as the incentive to work is reduced.

The layoffs at Ford and GM are a result of their declining sales. Some say the causes are a lack of innovation and product improvement on theoir parts: others note the several thousand dollars per vehicle of extra cost they must pay to meet the requirements of their agreements with the United Auto Workers Union. (It is noiteworthy that the Tyotas, Hondas, Volvos and other msakes taking market share from them are assembled in the US in non-union shops.)

It is likely that both factors are operating to some degree. Bottom line - there is no free lunch. The job security and retirement medical benefits enjoyed by senior UAW auto workers come at the expense of lost job opportunities for younger workers,, and, ultimately for the senior workers as well.
 
 
GM is losing market share. One of the most cogent reasons is that robots do not require Health Insurance or Sick Day Pay. Thomas Friedman, in his fine book-"The Lexus and the Olive Tree" illustrates that perfectly when he reports his visit to a Lexus Plant in South Tokyo. Friedman reports that he asked the output of the plant. He was told that the plant made 300 Lexus Autos a day. When he asked about the number of employees he was told there were about 60. Upon inspection, he found that the 60 were mainly supervisors who merely oversaw the work of the untiring ROBOTS.

The world of automation has arrived. The Luddites have lost and the solution, according to Friedman, is for us to specialize in the areas in which we are best.
 
 
At the risk of going a bit off topic, but I think one solution to this problem of manufacturing going overseas is to enact the retail sales tax to replace the income tax, which of course would do away with corporate income tax as well. Everybody knows that corporations don't pay tax anyway, they just pass the cost of business to the consumer, and if it was done at the end of the chain, then the same tax would apply to all products regardless of where made. It would lessen the incentive to go offshore to avoid taxes, which I think is perhaps one factor, not the total reasons I am sure for going overseas. I would only be in favor of such a move if the income tax was totally eliminated without the possibility of rejuvenating it, so that we would end up with both taxes. That would be worse.
 
 
 
Everybody knows that corporations don't pay tax anyway, they just pass the cost of business to the consumer...
 

This, quite simply, is false. If it were true, then companies wouldn't be so eager to avoid paying the tax.
 
 
Duh! Sure they try to avoid paying tax, as everyone does, which of course is perfectly proper and legal. They do it in an effort to compete with their competition to stay in business. My point is that business should be making business decisions based on good business reasons rather than tax reasons. Tortuous tax laws only end up hindering the most efficient business activity, and often cause companies to do things not in the best interest of consumers. The market should be dictating good business decisions, not politicians sitting in Washington.
 
 
 
Duh! Sure they try to avoid paying tax, as everyone does, which of course is perfectly proper and legal. They do it in an effort to compete with their competition to stay in business.
 

Only if your original assertion is false. If, as you claimed, corporations don't pay taxes but merely collect them, then there would be no advantage to avoiding the tax -- it would simply be passed on to consumers. If, on the other hand, corporations actually pay the tax, then there would be an advantage to avoiding it.

Your evident confusion on this point is understandable, and, to a certain extent, excusable. The notion that corporations only collect taxes is what I call a "George Will-ism," the kind of statement mindlessly repeated by conservatives that, upon first hearing, sounds profound and true but, upon further consideration, turns out to be banal and false.

 
My point is that business should be making business decisions based on good business reasons rather than tax reasons. Tortuous tax laws only end up hindering the most efficient business activity, and often cause companies to do things not in the best interest of consumers. The market should be dictating good business decisions, not politicians sitting in Washington.
 

If corporations merely passed on taxes to their customers, then they wouldn't make any decisions based on tax reasons. For them, the tax would, in effect, be invisible, a debit balanced out exactly by a credit in their ledger books. Your point, then, is only as defensible as your original assertion is meritless.
 
 
I would like to note that it isn't perfectly proper to dodge taxes. Loopholes exist, but that doesn't make what they are doing moral or right.

When it is taken to the extent that Big Business has taken it today - namely, they buy congressmen to keep real tax reform (which would close their loopholes) from happening - it is most certainly not perfectly proper, but a subjugation of our democratic system and downright despicable.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Joe from Chicago, to go back to basic logic here, taxes are simply another cost of doing business. To say it isn't passed on is sort of a weird argument. If businesses did not pass on the cost of doing business, then everything would of course be free. If they weren't required to pay income tax, competition and lower cost would bring consumer prices down. Its called Economics 101. So, obviously George Will is perfectly correct.

And Cycloptichorn, the fact that businesses have to constantly lobby Congress does not indicate something they should not be doing. Instead it is an indication that Congress is far more involved than what they should be doing. A big part of lobbying is actually educating Congressmen that otherwise have no knowledge or clue about industries they are trying to regulate. They are mostly a bunch of lawyers. They generally do not have an educated background about oil and gas production, utility operations, agriculture, any activity for that matter. So lobbying is good and proper, and if not done, we would have alot more stupider laws than we have now.

P. S. One man's "loophole" is another man's "incentive." In fact, that is often why they are created, to create an incentive for businesses to do certain things that are perceived to be good for the consumer or the country.
 
 
I think you guys are talking past each other a bit. Taxes are a cost of doing business and a Corporation that doesn't either recover its costs in its prices or reduce those costs isn't long for the business.

That said, corporations do indeed consider (for example) the local tax structure when considering where to locate facilities and staff. They also consider liability law and the behavior of state courts.

Many labor-intensive businesses have left California for this reason. Hawaii imposes a gross receipts tax on services - a powerful disincentive for the location of any consulting or service business there if there is an option to locate elsewhere. There are many other like examples.

The complexities of Federal tax law have created a huge industry of accounting and other consultants dedicated to the creation of structurtes for the evasion of taxes. I don't see any particular moral issues here as long as fraud is not involved. The government knowingly uses taxes to induce certain desired behaviors on the part of individuals and corporations. Those taxed have the right to adapt their behaviors accordingly to minimize their tax burden.
 
 
<bm>
 
 
Uh Oh... now you guys have gone and done it; Thomas is here  
 
 
 
Joe from Chicago, to go back to basic logic here, taxes are simply another cost of doing business.
 

Quite true, and I never said otherwise.

 
To say it isn't passed on is sort of a weird argument.
 

I said it wasn't merely passed on. If every dollar of tax paid by a corporation was matched by a dollar increase in the price of the corporation's product, then you and George Will would be right: corporations don't pay taxes, they merely collect them. But just as a dollar's increase in the cost energy, or raw products, or labor to the corporation is not automatically passed on as a dollar's increase in price to the consumer, so too the cost of taxes is not necessarily passed on intact to the consumer.

 
If businesses did not pass on the cost of doing business, then everything would of course be free. If they weren't required to pay income tax, competition and lower cost would bring consumer prices down. Its called Economics 101. So, obviously George Will is perfectly correct.
 

Assuming conditions of perfect competition. That's economics 102.
 
 
Corporations pass expenses, including taxes, on to their customers. All else being equal, those which have the least to pass on are the most competitive. Obviously.
 
 
At root, all tax revenue derives from the wage earner.
 
 
 
At root, all tax revenue derives from the wage earner.
 

Thus George Will is correct, people pay taxes, corporations do not. I agree.
 
 
 
At root, all tax revenue derives from the wage earner.
 

The problem is that the economy is a cyclical flow of funds, so there really is no "root" for the tax revenue to derive from. It's analogous to saying: "At root, all blood derives from the heart." This statement makes no sense because blood circulates. Similar logic applies to tax money.

 
Thus George Will is correct, people pay taxes, corporations do not. I agree.
 

I agree with your conclusion, but not with your reasoning.

If you own a corporation, it makes no conceptual difference whether its profits are taxed as a corporate income tax on it, or as an individual income tax on you. There is a practical difference if corporate income is taxed at a different rate than individual income. There is a practical difference when the corporation resides in a different country than the individual owning it. There is a practical difference when the corporation, but not its owners, is on the verge of bankruptcy, or vice versa. But in principle, there is no difference. This does not depend on the company operating under perfect competition. It only depends on the ownership relation between the corporation and its owners.

But that wasn't your argument. Your argument was that corporation pass on the tax to consumers -- and, after Timber mentioned it, workers. This is generally untrue. What econ 101 tells you here is something different: For both workers and consumers, the outcome depends on the elasticity of supply and demand -- of products as well as the labor and capital that produces them. The more easily a party can adapt its supply or demand to a price change -- in other words, the more elastic its supply or demand is -- the smaller is the share of the tax burden it has to bear. Berkeley's Christina Romer explains the logic behind this in  this Econ 101 slide. (PDF) 

This point, like the previous, does not depend on competition being perfect or not. The difference between taxing a competitive and a monopolistic market is that the latter can be a net efficiency gain for society while the former cannot. But under competition and monopoly, which side of the transaction you tax has no distributional effect between the firm on the one hand, its customers, workers, creditors and investors on the other.
 
 
I think you are splitting hairs. I realize businesses do not make a copy of their tax payments and tack it onto their products as some sort of surcharge or something. I also realize there are variations and nuances involved depending on many factors. But bottom line, taxes are part of the cost of doing business and must be incorporated into what their products can be sold for to make a profit. Thus, tax costs are passed on to the consumer, if you follow the money far enough to the ultimate source regardless of which path you follow. What are we arguing about here?

The same principle would apply to employees pay checks. If they did not have to pay income tax, social security, and all the rest, their wage scales could be reduced by business, and the businesses could provide products at a lower cost. Thus, who is ultimately paying for the tax, answer being the consumer? Its all of us paying the taxes. Businesses do not. They are only agents of ours in name only. Common Sense 101.
 
 
 
I think you are splitting hairs.
 

You say this as if it was a bad thing.

 
What are we arguing about here?
 

We are arguing about the mistaken reasoning that led you to your correct conclusion. If all that matters to you is the bottom line, and if you regard it as hair splitting when people argue about the part above the bottom line, I can live with that.
 
 
 
 
At root, all tax revenue derives from the wage earner.
 

The problem is that the economy is a cyclical flow of funds, so there really is no "root" for the tax revenue to derive from. It's analogous to saying: "At root, all blood derives from the heart." This statement makes no sense because blood circulates. Similar logic applies to tax money.
 

Got me there; can't argue with that.
 
 
 
 
I think you are splitting hairs.
 

You say this as if it was a bad thing.
 

Were... as if it were a bad thing... the subjunctive you know. Just because most of these yobs wouldn't know the subjunctive if it bit them in the @ss is no reason for an intelligent and well-educated person to ignore it... or you, for that matter.

Anyway, i'd not insulted you recently, and am reduced to this.
 
 
 
Anyway, i'd not insulted you recently, and am reduced to this.
 

Happy new year to you too, Setanta.  

Since were busy hairsplitting anyway, I have to correct myself: taxing a monopolist does have a redistributional effect. If the government gets the size of the tax right, its effect is that the government takes away the monopoly profit from the monopolist, with no change for the consumer. Because the monopolist loses something, the consumer does not, and the services bought with the tax presumably benefit both, this works out as a redistribution from monopolist to consumer.
 
 
You mean like all those governors who get elected by promising to build more roads over the dead bank accounts of their campaign contributors.

(insert appropriate rolly-eyed emoticon here)

Happy new year to you, too, you crypto-liberal...
 
 
 
You mean like all those governors who get elected by promising to build more roads over the dead bank accounts of their campaign contributors.
 

I said "if" the government gets the tax right. I didn't say the government will ever get the size of a tax right.

 
Happy new year to you, too, you crypto-liberal...
 

Ah, now you're getting insulting again. I will have to report your post to the moderators, but it's nice to see your fastball coming back.
 
 
 
The problem is that the economy is a cyclical flow of funds, so there really is no "root" for the tax revenue to derive from. It's analogous to saying: "At root, all blood derives from the heart." This statement makes no sense because blood circulates. Similar logic applies to tax money.
 

I'm not sure what your political philosophy is, being new here, but my thought is that everytime the "blood" circulates through the federal government, much of the nutrients, oxygen, etc. are siphoned off, expended if you will on wasted exertion applied to meaningless activities, so when the "blood" circulates back through the citizenry on meaningful wealth producing activities, much of its benefit is depleted. The government of course expends alot of this energy attempting to channel the blood to the arteries it deems appropriate, even creating additional arteries all the time, so that there is not enough blood for the most important arteries. The citizenry of course must produce more blood to mix with the existing blood, but question is, will the citizenry get sick and become anemic if the system becomes overloaded? How many leaches can the body stand?

And, what makes you think that if blood flows through something that it has anything to do with producing the blood?
 
 
Our government is constantly expanding toi meet the needs of an ever-expanding government...

While it is true we have the best politicians money can buy, the thing for which we should be most eternally grateful is that we get nowhere near the government we pay for

<rimshot>

Gotta love Will Rogers.

One more - just can't resiist:

I belong to no organized political party; I'm a Democrat

<rimshot + cymbal clang>
 
 
 
The problem is that the economy is a cyclical flow of funds, so there really is no "root" for the tax revenue to derive from. It's analogous to saying: "At root, all blood derives from the heart." This statement makes no sense because blood circulates. Similar logic applies to tax money.
 

timberlandko, you said a while back in response to the above that Thomas got you with the above, implying you agreed. I would suggest you rethink your answer. Does Thomas and you actually believe the government produces wealth, commensurate with the money they spend? All blood goes through the heart, but what we are talking about is what produces blood? One could argue whether the government is even the heart, or if it is, should it be? Even if it is, if the body does not ingest food and water, it won't be long before the body starts shriveling up pretty rapidly. So my point is that the blood is produced by the digestive system, started in motion by a proper diet and exercise. The digestive system is made up mostly by private enterprise, which creates the vast majority of the wealth in this country, namely food, clothing, shelter, and most of the rest. If you wish to call police and fire protection and other things the government does as creation of wealth, I would concede that point to a minor extent, but even those are spinoffs from the original creation of the materials by private enterprise to provide those services, example a fire truck is produced by private enterprise.

I would indeed possibly agree to the idea that the heart could be likened to the government, which helps "regulate" the flow of blood to all parts of the body. But I think the heart would also include the economy in general, including banks and the federal reserve. Perhaps the government would be more like a pacemaker?
 
 
I think circulatory system migh be a more apt anology than pacemaker, okie; that firetruck rolls up to your house on a road government built, is crewed by government paid firefighters (unless they're volunteers, in which case still there's significant governmental aid and support) and puts out your fire with water pumped from the government-provided water supply. Its all one organism, each subsystem dependent upon and supportive of all the others, the way I figure it.
 
 
 
I think circulatory system migh be a more apt anology than pacemaker, okie; that firetruck rolls up to your house on a road government built, is crewed by government paid firefighters (unless they're volunteers, in which case still there's significant governmental aid and support) and puts out your fire with water pumped from the government-provided water supply. Its all one organism, each subsystem dependent upon and supportive of all the others, the way I figure it.
 

Good point, but as I conceded in earlier post, government may produce some wealth, but that is peripheral to the primary economic production of basics, such as food, clothing, and shelter, virtually all produced by private enterprise. And even where government provides a service, it is done via tax monies generated by private enterprise. The proof that government is not a primary blood producer is the history of countries wherein all economic activity is totally governed by government, the economic system generally shrivels and only exists in a very starved state, and may eventually die out if not reinvigorated by the incentive of profit.

So as I said before, the blood may go to some parts of the body through the heart, and so the blood may appear to have come from the heart, but the original source of production or strength of the body is food and water through the digestive system, which is private enterprise, the engine of profit and wealth. Without it, the heart shrivels and dies.

Sorry to get carried away with the body analogy, borrowed from Thomas, but I think its rather fascinating. I think it sort of fits. A very good and effective way to argue our beliefs about the economy and how it should work in a healthy manner.
 
 
2006 recall:

 
 
 
 
I think circulatory system migh be a more apt anology than pacemaker, okie; that firetruck rolls up to your house on a road government built, is crewed by government paid firefighters (unless they're volunteers, in which case still there's significant governmental aid and support) and puts out your fire with water pumped from the government-provided water supply. Its all one organism, each subsystem dependent upon and supportive of all the others, the way I figure it.
 

What we say over here is "Money is made round, to go round"
 
 
....and from another part of Europe, the Greeks have a saying.....

"A fish always goes rotten from the head first"
 
 
 
Sorry to get carried away with the body analogy, borrowed from Thomas, but I think its rather fascinating. I think it sort of fits. A very good and effective way to argue our beliefs about the economy and how it should work in a healthy manner.
 

If you are interested in the model, you may find it worth Googling for "circular flow of funds", which will yield a lot of macroeconomics websites. Here is a reasonably realistic diagram from the first hit.

 
 Source  (a lecture note from a course at the University of Rhode Island.)

For a more literal account of the analogy between societies and biological organisms, I found Herbert Spencer's 1860 essay,   The Social Organism  interesting and insightful. I should caution you that Spencer has a bad reputation for inventing the concept of Social Darwinism. But in my personal view, academia in general greatly over-vilifies and underreads Spencers work, and The Social Organism in particular.
 
 
 
For a more literal account of the analogy between societies and biological organisms, I found Herbert Spencer's 1860 essay,   The Social Organism  interesting and insightful. I should caution you that Spencer has a bad reputation for inventing the concept of Social Darwinism. But in my personal view, academia in general greatly over-vilifies and underreads Spencers work, and The Social Organism in particular.
 

Thanks Thomas. I will admit I am not studied up on economics as a textbook subject. My discipline was geology and mathematics in college. As I get older, some of these other things become more interesting. I've worked around an economist in my old corporation job. I've listened to the ideas of many. I have not studied it. Laugh if you wish, but I've always viewed some economists as trying to complicate the simple, by making common sense into a science. They come up with graphs and theories, then apply strange names to all of the effects, ratios, and whatever, and by doing so, they place themselves on a more learned plateau than simple common sense, which I think would go a long way in figuring out the problems we have. Don't get me wrong. I fully believe we need the advanced study of economics, and we need economists. Unfortunately however, from what I've observed, many economists study economics from a particular political bias built in, so that their conclusions end up being rendered political rather than based on reality. This has lowered the validity of their opinions in my opinion.

But back to your analogy if you wish to discuss it any more. I realize these are my ideas, untainted by book learning, but common sense tells me that our society enjoys only as much wealth as it can produce or trade for in kind. Wealth would be the health of the body. The basic raw materials to produce this wealth are extremely important. I would judge these to be plants, in the way of food crops, other crops, and naturally growing plants such as timber, and very important would be oil, natural gas, and minerals. Boil it down and we have agriculture, timber industry, and the energy / mining industries. These basic industries would be like the food and water we add to our bodies to keep it going as we burn off the calories. I realize it takes machinery already manufactured to do the mining, the agriculture, etc. This could be likened to the fact that the body needs energy from past strength gained in order to consume the additional food and water, which in turn feeds the system for the future.

Bottom line of the analogy though is the main point that unless the system is fed with new energy in the way of food and water, it will not survive. Main point being that the body cannot continue to simply circulate the same blood over and over. It must be fed with new.

Now, getting back to the tax analogy, this is important because as a free enterprise guy, I do not believe the government can efficiently produce any new blood. It is us, the people, through free enterprise, that produces it and supplies the original source of the wealth that creates the tax money. So the main problem I see with your little flow diagram is that it needs to show an arrow coming from an outside source to partially feed the system as it goes. This would not be government. It would be the earth / raw materials production and extraction.

Now, I realize there are countries, such as Japan, that have done quite nicely without being a huge source of raw materials. However, they have accomplished much by being very big into the process of manufacturing and production, which is the next most essential building block of a healthy economy, which they trade for to obtain the raw materials needed to feed their economy.

Bottom line, if we simply become a bunch of "consumers," our economy will eventually burn itself out. We must be involved in the production of the wealth at some point. Now, our emphasis is shifting more into the technology or the know-how instead of the actual production and manufacturing. That may work until other countries overtake us in the technology and know-how. Then what would we have of any value to trade for the wealth that we are accustomed to enjoying? And where would we go to try to find that wealth? The government? I think not. If anybody thinks so, they are in for a very rude awakening. We know that other countries are ahead of us in producing scientists and mathematicians. To me, that is worrisome. Personally, I do not think it bodes well when some of our biggest stocks are epitomized by the Walmarts of the world instead of steel companies for example.

Sorry to bore you with these okie observations that never came from a text book, but personally, I think they make as much sense as some of the economists I've heard.
 
 
okie dokie, Thomas is an econ prof.
 
 
 
okie dokie, Thomas is an econ prof.
 

Neither econ nor prof. I'm a physicist by training.
 
 
I am delighted to learn that Thomas is an Economics Professor---My favorite professors. I wonder if Professor Thomas would be so good as to comment on the veracity or empirical integrity of one of my favorite themes which may correspond with some of Okie's concerns.

"The government's ability to finance its debt is tied to the size and strength of the economy or GDP"

If this is not a viable concept, a good deal of my thinking on economics as related to the USA will be in error.

Thank You, Professor Thomas.
 
 
 
Neither econ nor prof. I'm a physicist by training.
 

 
I am delighted to learn that Thomas is an Economics Professor
 

I'm not at all questioning at all your eyesight or your reading capabilities.

So perhaps, Morkat, you better adjust your monitor's settings, make some changes to your videocard or other hardware, clean the monitor screen or something like that.
 
 
To clarify, being new to this forum, I thought Thomas seemed reasonably informed and I was frankly kind of complimenting him in hopes he would impart some wisdom to the subject of the economy. Even if he isn't an economist, maybe if he's done alot of reading on the subject, he could fill me in with the party line on the subject, or at least his party line. Oh well, if he's only a physicist, maybe my interpretation of economics as a geologist is just as good. But I am still interested in what he or any of you have to say. At least this thread seems to be avoiding the hatred and name calling of all the leftists out there. They seem to find threads like "Bush Lied," "Impeach Bush," "Bush caused global warming,", subjects like that, so they are all over there on those threads throwing insults at any conservative that dares to make any comment of logic to rain on their victory parade and lynching party.

And Thomas still hasn't tackled my rejection of his closed system economics diagram and my rejection of his suggested notion that government actually generates any significant portion of the wealth in this country.
 
 
His excellent diagram, Okie, is one of the reasons I asked him the question about GDP!!
 
 
Excellent question. We will await his great reservoir of knowledge to answer the question for us.
 
 
 
Laugh if you wish, but I've always viewed some economists as trying to complicate the simple, by making common sense into a science.
 

If "comparative advantage" is a common sense concept, why are there so many protectionists, left and right? If "supply and demand" is a common sense concept, why do 75% of Americans believe in raising the minimum wage? Why have 2000 years of Judeo-Christian tradition consistently supported laws against usury? Why is rent control so popular? I think the contrary of what you say is true: Most findings of economics that economists agree about are counter-intuitive and unpopular, but correct. And herein lies the value of economics as a science.

 
Unfortunately however, from what I've observed, many economists study economics from a particular political bias built in, so that their conclusions end up being rendered political rather than based on reality. This has lowered the validity of their opinions in my opinion.
 

Karl Marx said the same thing. I invite you to compare his  Kapital  with John Stuart Mill's  Principles of Political Economy , which was written around the same time. You can then decide which book has withstood the test of time better. Of course, for all we know, the present critics of economics may do better. But I am not holding my breath, given the critics' record so far, and given that most 'criticism of economics' consists of fallacies debunked centuries ago.

 
Bottom line of the analogy though is the main point that unless the system is fed with new energy in the way of food and water, it will not survive. Main point being that the body cannot continue to simply circulate the same blood over and over. It must be fed with new.
 

I agree that neither a human body nor an economy is a closed system energywise. The former runs on energy from food and air. The latter runs on the work, thrift, and risk-taking of the people, plus natural resources. I don't think that blood and money have anything to do with it. They are both media of exchange, but buth make up only a minor part of what bodies and economies produce.

 
So the main problem I see with your little flow diagram is that it needs to show an arrow coming from an outside source to partially feed the system as it goes. This would not be government. It would be the earth / raw materials production and extraction.
 

The world economy as a whole is a closed system. There is no "outside."

 
Bottom line, if we simply become a bunch of "consumers," our economy will eventually burn itself out. We must be involved in the production of the wealth at some point.
 

You are. The USA is the second most productive nation in the world. (The most productive is Luxemburg. Luxemburg is tiny, and I'm sure one can cut a Luxemburg-sized chunk out of the US that is even more productive than Luxemburg. Long Island and the Bay Area seem like good candidates.)

 
Now, our emphasis is shifting more into the technology or the know-how instead of the actual production and manufacturing. That may work until other countries overtake us in the technology and know-how. Then what would we have of any value to trade for the wealth that we are accustomed to enjoying? And where would we go to try to find that wealth? The government? I think not.
 

Investors regard America's secure property rights as a major reason to invest in your country. They regard Zimbabwe's insecure property rights as a major reason not to invest there. Secure property rights are an important factor in creating wealth, and they are supplied by governments. As to your point about competing nations, economists have been debunking your argument since  David Hume (1752) . The debunking of your argument has been completed in  Ricardo (1817) . More evidence, I believe, that economics is not just a simple application of common sense, as you thought it is.

 
The government's ability to finance its debt is tied to the size and strength of the economy or GDP
 

It is tied to that. It is also tied to investors' trust that the government actually intends to pay up. Argentinia's debt, measured as a share of GDP, was much lower than that of the US in 2001, when it defaulted on its debt. America and Europe haven't had a balance of payment crisis yet, not because their debt-to-GDP ratio is better than Argentina's, but because financial markets trust our governments more than they trust Argentina's government.
 
 
Thank You, Thomas.( I wish we were on a Physics site since there are a few questions I have after TRYING to read and understand Hawking). I must point out, with regard to the question of growing ourselves out of the debt that the USA has always been in debt. Sometimes, as in the last year of World War II, the deficit was larger than the GDP.

Perhaps, I am too optomistic but I do believe that if we allow the entrepreneurs to keep more of thier money to invest, thereby creating jobs and raising the GDP by 4%( I know that is a little bit over our past history), Our GDP which is, at this time, close to 11,500,000,000,000 will( given the 4% a year rise in GDP above) will be an amazing 23,000,000,000,000( Twenty three TRILLION ) by the year 2023.

It has been announced that this year, our deficit is about 333,000,000 Billion. That is a little less than 3% of our GDP.

If the USA can simultaneously cut spending or, at the very least, change the idiotic baseline parameters that are used and switch to actual cost of living figures, and continue to allow business to grow by keeping the tax load down( it has not, as most people know, cut revenues when the taxes were cut--Your comment about counter-intuitivity fits well here, Thomas). we can grow ourselves out of any fiscal problems.

333,000,000,000 is 2% of our present GDP but would be only less than one and a half percent of the propsosed 23 Trillion in 2023.

It would take, of course, a great deal of discipline from everyone, but we have no choice.
 
 
Mortkat, it has been observed that the only person on the planet who truly understands Hawking is Hawking himself... and Hawking himself has said he thinks perhaps that estimation sets the count at one more than can be justified :wink:
 
 
 
If the USA can simultaneously cut spending or, at the very least, change the idiotic baseline parameters that are used and switch to actual cost of living figures, and continue to allow business to grow by keeping the tax load down( it has not, as most people know, cut revenues when the taxes were cut--Your comment about counter-intuitivity fits well here, Thomas). we can grow ourselves out of any fiscal problems.
 

Interesting Mortkat, because it has been my suspicion that the politicians know a dirty littly secret, not the least of which would include the Democrats and Clinton in the 90's, that if you lower the perceived rate of inflation, you can dampen the rate of increase of the entitlements, and by doing so over a period of years, you magicly grow your way out of the annual deficits. You simply tweak the way inflation figures are derived. Even one tenth of a percent inflation makes a huge difference in Social Security increases. Another slick way the Clintons raised revenues was to drasticly increase the ceiling on the annual income from which social security and medicare deductions are taken. Clinton did this, and of course the MSM did not publicize it, and of course no stink was raised over it because it was a Democrat that did it.

Actually, don't get me wrong folks, I actually think such measures are effective and appropriate. The humorous part of it is the press and the politicians constantly debate income tax, pros and cons, and how this rate or that rate is good or bad, but seldom do they talk about social security and medicare deductions, which are by far the most severe in terms of taxing most lower to even middle income Americans.

Williams, I will get to the reply of your points when I can.
 
 
It is a good thing that the US is in such great financial shape. These predictions would be serious for the US economy if they were in any trouble at the moment.
...............................
Iraq war could cost US over $2 trillion, says Nobel prize-winning economist

Saturday January 7, 2006

The real cost to the US of the Iraq war is likely to be between $1 trillion and $2 trillion (1.1 trillion), up to 10 times more than previously thought, according to a report written by a Nobel prize-winning economist and a Harvard budget expert.

The study, which expanded on traditional estimates by including such costs as lifetime disability and healthcare for troops injured in the conflict as well as the impact on the American economy, concluded that the US government is continuing to underestimate the cost of the war.

The report came during one of the most deadly periods in Iraq since the invasion, with the US military yesterday revising upwards to 11 the number of its troops killed during a wave of insurgent attacks on Thursday. More than 130 civilians were also killed.

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/Iraq/Story/0,2763,1681119,00.html 
 
 
 
If "comparative advantage" is a common sense concept, why are there so many protectionists, left and right? If "supply and demand" is a common sense concept, why do 75% of Americans believe in raising the minimum wage? Why have 2000 years of Judeo-Christian tradition consistently supported laws against usury? Why is rent control so popular? I think the contrary of what you say is true: Most findings of economics that economists agree about are counter-intuitive and unpopular, but correct. And herein lies the value of economics as a science.
 

Maybe common sense is not that common. Nixon of course tried price controls on gasoline during the embargo, and you guessed it, it had the opposite long term effect. Artificially lower prices dampened exploration and new production coming on line, which produced further tightening of supplies, which produced higher prices once the controls were lifted. The same may apply to rent control. If being a landlord is not particularly lucrative because of artificially setting rent charges, then nobody builds more rental units, thus perpetuating higher prices. Another good example is minimum wage. If no minimum wage was kept, the very low skilled jobs would probably go to their natural level of worth to society, thus driving many people to seek higher skills that demand a higher wage. If minimum wage is set too high, not only does it raise everybody's living cost, but it causes more workers to actually believe they can make a living and support a family on such wages, thus perpetuating an oversupply of workers at that wage and causing a dampening effect on more technological advancement in society. Free enterprise has been shown to work, and we must simply have the courage to believe in it because we all end up better off in the long run. Concerning usery, my interpretation on that is a voluntary thing; we should not take advantage of someone in need; I'm not sure how well it works to legislate people being fair to each other. Credit card companies don't commit usery with me because I alway pay the balance so they don't charge me 20% or whatever.

 
Karl Marx said the same thing. I invite you to compare his  Kapital  with John Stuart Mill's  Principles of Political Economy , which was written around the same time. You can then decide which book has withstood the test of time better. Of course, for all we know, the present critics of economics may do better. But I am not holding my breath, given the critics' record so far, and given that most 'criticism of economics' consists of fallacies debunked centuries ago.
 

Karl Marx can say what he wants, but I would suggest we simply look at the results of his system versus free enterprise and forget what the advocates say. The proof is in the track record.

 
I agree that neither a human body nor an economy is a closed system energywise. The former runs on energy from food and air. The latter runs on the work, thrift, and risk-taking of the people, plus natural resources. I don't think that blood and money have anything to do with it. They are both media of exchange, but buth make up only a minor part of what bodies and economies produce.
 

Okay

 
The world economy as a whole is a closed system. There is no "outside."
 

If you include the physical untouched earth as part of the economy, I guess you could look at that way, but I would prefer that nature untouched is not part of the economy, so I would argue that there is indeed an outside source of wealth that must be extracted, captured if you will by work and ingenuity, to bring into the system all the time. This is the food, water, and air that the body needs to survive. Without it, the body dies, and likewise our economy. I do not believe our economy stays healthy by simply trading with each other the wealth that we've already created. So, my point is that opening more Walmarts is not the road to prosperity, it is only a symptom of prosperity.

 
You are. The USA is the second most productive nation in the world. (The most productive is Luxemburg. Luxemburg is tiny, and I'm sure one can cut a Luxemburg-sized chunk out of the US that is even more productive than Luxemburg. Long Island and the Bay Area seem like good candidates.)
 

Where does the money come from that makes it so prosperous?

 
Investors regard America's secure property rights as a major reason to invest in your country. They regard Zimbabwe's insecure property rights as a major reason not to invest there. Secure property rights are an important factor in creating wealth, and they are supplied by governments. As to your point about competing nations, economists have been debunking your argument since  David Hume (1752) . The debunking of your argument has been completed in  Ricardo (1817) . More evidence, I believe, that economics is not just a simple application of common sense, as you thought it is.
 

Agreed for sure on the stable and secure property rights, which is a cornerstone of a free enterprise system to be successful. As to competition of nations, I am not sure whats been debunked there, you will need to explain further. Perhaps I don't understand your argument, but it seems your USA / Zimbabwe comparison proves that competition does exist and it does matter, and as the world gets smaller through enhanced communication and transportation, I think it is only going to grow in importance.
 
 
The economy in the US is not really 'free market' as envisioned by Adam Smith, it is an oligopoly where large multi-national corporations, huge unions and big government account for most of the economic activities.
 
 
Cool word there, "oligopoly!" Still alot more competition than none at all. I think there are some industries that simply require a pooling of resources to accomplish because things like building refineries for example generally requires alot more than one individual could do. And I far prefer a corporation to a government. For example if you think oil companies are making too much money, simply buy some stock in them to reap some of the rewards. And if you think some industries are not competitive, maybe you need to be involved in the industry to find out the truth, because they are very likely much more competitive than you think. Look at auto manufacturing. Not many manufacturers, but GM and Ford especially are fighting for their very lives. I call that very intense competition whether you believe it or not. I do not think your statement is supported by facts at all.
 
 
 
Where does the money come from that es it so prosperous?
 

Luxemburg's wealth comes from an efficient banking system, plus other service industries, and the lack of a rust belt due to historical chance.

 
As to competition of nations, I am not sure whats been debunked there, you will need to explain further. Perhaps I don't understand your argument, but it seems your USA / Zimbabwe comparison proves that competition does exist and it does matter, and as the world gets smaller through enhanced communication and transportation, I think it is only going to grow in importance.
 

How does a tyrannical Zimbabwe makes the US better off? Suppose for a moment that Zimbabwe started protecting human rights again, including private property and freedom of contract. This would clearly benefit the people of Zimbabwe. But how would it harm the United States? The point of these rhetorical questions is that enforcing human rights is a positive-sum game, not of competition. Every nation is well off or not according to its government's own performance, pretty much regardless of what other nations' governments are doing.
 
 
I see what you mean, and I can't disagree altogether. I think your point has a parallel in terms of people wishing to tax the rich to help the poor. The way to prosperity is not by taxing the rich and bringing them down to your level. Same principle would apply to the classroom. Dumbing down the high achievers is not the way to bring up the failures. The way to prosperity is to raise the expectations for everybody, and without wealthy people, who is there to offer jobs to the poor?

However, I still think competition does exist. My analogy would be the fact that McDonalds, Wendys, and all the rest seem to congregate in one area. They are competing, but they also are helping each other have a better business by locating their business adjacent to each other. So countries compete, but they help each other by creating the favorable policies in their own countries, thus bringing up the standard of living for everybody. I think our inflation rates would be greater here in the U.S. without the existence of economical products being shipped from China and other places around the world, and we also profit by shipping our areas of expertise to other countries. Competition is a "win - win" situation, as I do not believe the goal of any business should be that of putting their competition out of business. I have never seen that strategy ever work. Improving ones own products does seem to work, and then the competition improves theirs as well, and everybody benefits.
I simply do not see the goal of competition as being that of harming your competitor.

As far as Zimbabwe making the U.S. better off, the point is more accurate by pointing out that a more stable Zimbabwe would make Zimbabwe better off because it could compete better in the world market of outside investment, which would bring about a better economy in Zimbabwe. It would have a more competitive advantage in the world market. The same principle applies between states in the U.S. High tax states tend to drive business to states that have a more favorable tax and business policy. It is only one factor of many factors, but nevertheless it is a factor.
 
 
Okay, this is double plus not good.

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2006/01/09/AR2006010901042_pf.html 

 
China Set To Reduce Exposure To Dollar
Move Would Probably Push Currency Down

By Peter S. Goodman
Washington Post Foreign Service
Tuesday, January 10, 2006; D01

SHANGHAI, Jan. 9 -- China has resolved to shift some of its foreign exchange reserves -- now in excess of $800 billion -- away from the U.S. dollar and into other world currencies in a move likely to push down the value of the greenback, a high-level state economist who advises the nation's economic policymakers said in an interview Monday.

As China's manufacturing industries flood the world with cheap goods, the Chinese central bank has invested roughly three-fourths of its growing foreign currency reserves in U.S. Treasury bills and other dollar-denominated assets. The new policy reflects China's fears that too much of its savings is tied up in the dollar, a currency widely expected to drop in value as the U.S. trade and fiscal deficits climb.

China now boasts the world's second-largest cache of foreign exchange -- behind only Japan -- and is on pace to see its reserves climb past $1 trillion later this year. Even a slight diminishing of the dollar as a percentage of those holdings could exert significant pressure on the U.S. currency, many economists assert.

In recent years, the value of the dollar has been buoyed by major purchases of U.S. Treasury bills by Japan, China and oil-exporting countries -- a flow of capital that has kept interests rates relatively low in the United States and allowed Americans to keep spending even as debts mount. Some economists have long warned that if foreigners lose their appetite for American debt, the dollar would fall, interest rates would rise and the housing boom could burst, sending real estate prices lower.

The comments of the Chinese senior economist, made on the condition of anonymity because the government disciplines those who speak to the press without express authorization, confirmed an analysis in Monday's Shanghai Securities News stating that China is inclined to shift some its savings into other currencies such as the euro and the yen, or into major purchases of commodities such as oil for a long-discussed strategic energy reserve.

In a report circulated this week, Stephen Green, senior economist with the bank Standard Chartered PLC in Shanghai, identified several signals that China is intent on limiting its exposure to the dollar -- not least, a recent pledge from the State Administration of Foreign Exchange to "actively explore more efficient use of our foreign exchange reserves."

"We believe this adds to the downside pressure the USD [U.S. dollar] is currently facing," Green wrote. "It is the first official expression from SAFE that they are looking at switching away" from the dollar.

The comments on SAFE's Web site reinforced earlier public warnings from Yu Yongding, an economist on the monetary policy committee of China's central bank, that the country's reserves are now vulnerable to a drop in the value of the dollar.

"The general trend for the U.S. dollar is continuously weakening," Yu said, speaking to reporters at a conference in Beijing last month. "Countries with huge foreign-exchange reserves will have their assets shrunken."

Last week, Hu Xiaolian, director of the foreign exchange administration, said China plans to "optimize the structure" of its reserves. Analysts took that to mean China would pursue a higher return than it can get from holding dollars by diversifying its reserves.

Not all economists anticipate negative repercussions for the U.S. economy. Were China and Japan to engineer a significant fall in the dollar, those nations also would suffer the consequences -- sharply diminished exports as Americans lose spending power, plus a drop in the value of their dollar assets.

"It is thus extremely unlikely that China would do anything to harm its own balance sheet," wrote Stephen Jen, an economist with Morgan Stanley, in a research note distributed Monday.

In 2005, the dollar rebounded against major foreign currencies as the Federal Reserve raised short-term interest rates -- making dollar assets relatively more attractive than others -- but has slid a bit early this year. Meanwhile, China continues to amass foreign-exchange reserves at a pace of roughly $15 billion per month.

Warnings about an impending Chinese sell-off in dollars emerged in July, as China slightly altered the way it sets the value of its currency, the yuan, bumping it up against the dollar by about 2 percent. At the time, China announced that it would gradually allow greater movement in the exchange rate -- something that has yet to materialize -- while also shifting from a system in which the yuan moves with changes in the dollar to one where it tracks a basket of currencies including the yen, the euro, the Hong Kong dollar and the South Korean won.

The move temporarily muted criticism on Capitol Hill from those who accuse China of currency manipulation, asserting that an artificially low yuan has made China's goods unfairly cheap on world markets. But as the implications of the new currency policy rippled out, some analysts suggested that China would thereafter have less need for dollars and greater need for the other currencies in the new basket, sending the greenback down and risking higher U.S. interest rates that would dampen economic growth.

China sought to quash such talk. In September, a senior central bank official told a ballroom full of international executives gathered in Beijing that China would not sell significant quantities of U.S. bonds, cognizant that such a move would "cause the price to plunge."

Even if a Chinese shift away from the dollar weakened the currency, that would probably not soothe tensions with those in Washington calling for an increase in the value of the yuan to help U.S. manufacturers. Unless China severs the link between the value of its currency and the dollar -- a move Beijing says could destabilize its economy -- then a weaker dollar would simply mean a weaker yuan as well, leaving in place the current debate over whether China's export earnings are being netted unfairly.

Special correspondent Eva Woo contributed to this report.
 

Bad bad bad! For us, that is.

I can't see this not leading to devaluation of the dollar, and a rise in interest rates. It will be a painful year for a lot of folks.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
The USPTO (United States Patent and Trademark Office) has released a  list of the top 10 companies receiving the most US patents for 2005 .

In announcing the list, Under Secretary of Commerce for Intellectual Property Jon Dudas had this to say:

 
America's technological and economic strength is the result of its tremendous ingenuity. The USPTO has taken and will continue to take aggressive steps that will enhance quality and improve productivity to ensure that U.S. intellectual property protection remains the best in the world, protecting American innovation and sustaining economic growth.
 

U.S. intellectual property protection... protecting American innovation - the only problem is: 6 out of the 10 companies on the list are non-US companies: Canon, Matsushita, Samsung, Hitachi, Toshiba, and Fujitsu.
 
 
I think its a little premature to predict the demise of U.S. dominance, but I think it is in jeopardy. We need to turn around our educational system, but I don't look for it to happen when other things take priority over math and science. We created the most advanced industrialized society ever, following WWII, completely without a federal Department of Education. We've been reaping the benefits of this inertia for quite a number of years, but how long can we do that?
 
 
okie

The plutocracy of CEOs who sit on each other's boards don't quite invite confidence. I have bought shares and found CEOs write golden parachutes forthemselves while running the corporation to the ground. There need to be a reform in forbidding CEOs from being members in other corporate boards.
 
 
 
okie

The plutocracy of CEOs who sit on each other's boards don't quite invite confidence. I have bought shares and found CEOs write golden parachutes forthemselves while running the corporation to the ground. There need to be a reform in forbidding CEOs from being members in other corporate boards.
 

There, perhaps a huge agreement between conservatives and liberals. I once worked for a corporation and saw the exact thing you speak of. Its been going on for a long long time, but I think we need some drastic reform in how corporations are overseen by boards, and how the boards operate, or something along that line. I am not anti-corporation at all. I just think boards of directors are not performing their jobs because they often are all the same people serving on each others boards, and the "if you scratch my back, I'll scratch yours" philosophy predominates. CEO's are way overrated, and are being paid way too much. Perhaps tax laws would be a way to attack the problem, or perhaps some other avenue would be effective. I have not thought about possible solutions enough to have an opinion on the best solution. Perhaps somebody needs to start a movement for some type of reform, so that it could become part of somebody's campaign platform, and maybe something could be done. I really do think it is one of the things that is a drag on the efficiency of business.
 
 
 Europe's record on innovation '50 years behind US' 

By Tobias Buck in Brussels
Published: January 12 2006 17:13 | Last updated: January 12 2006 17:13

The Innovation Scoreboard compares the performance of the 25 EU countries with the US, Japan and several other nations, and ranks them according to factors such as the number of science and engineering graduates, patents, research and development spending and exports of high-tech products. The survey finds that only four EU countries - Sweden, Finland, Denmark and Germany - can compete with the US and Japan in terms of their innovative abilities.

"The innovation gap between the EU25 and Japan is increasing and the one between EU and US is close to stable," the report notes. It adds that it would take more than 50 years to close the gap between the average EU performance and the current US level.

Commission officials said the innovation ranking was important because it looked beyond R&D spending to analyse the ability to transform basic research into marketable products - and therefore into jobs and economic growth.

Gnter Verheugen, the EU industry commissioner, said: "The Innovation Scoreboard clearly shows that we have to do more for innovation. There is clear evidence that more innovative sectors tend to have higher productivity growth rates."

The EU's "disappointing" performance masks striking differences between the 25 member states: the Commission ranks Sweden, Finland, Denmark and Germany as "leading countries" and states including the UK, France and Italy as "average performers".

Portugal, the Czech Republic, Greece and others are "catching up", while states Spain and Poland are "losing ground".

Switzerland, which is not an EU member, comes second overall - ahead of both Japan and the US.

The UK and Ireland - which have recently boasted high economic growth rates, low unemployment and which regularly score highly in surveys examining countries' economic competitiveness - have both performed worse than in previous scoreboards. "The UK faces major challenges for knowledge creation. The slow improvement in the R&D base could be a cause for the negative trends for high-tech exports and employment in medium-high and high-tech manufacturing," the Commission writes.

Ireland, meanwhile, is told that it "must make the transition from an economy where foreign investment played a large role...to an economy based on innovation".

Dublin must, in particular, find ways to reverse the "consistent decline in business R&D spending".

Germany, despite its status as an "innovation leader", and a strong record for lifelong learning receives poor marks for its dearth of science and engineering students and for its comparatively poor levels of youth education.

The EU's largest economy is also chided for its population's reluctance to embrace innovative products and services.

The study can be found on  http://www.trendchart.org/scoreboards/scoreboard2005/index.cfm 
 
 
Thanks for the FT link, JW.

You are kindly invited to join us on the  European Union thread  !
 
 
The CEOs do not innovate. It is the foreigners in the universities and research centers that do the actual R&D.
 
 
Not to change the subject but I see where Chinese automobiles will enter the U.S. market in 2008. Personally, I think U.S. carmakers better kick their unions out pretty fast, re-negotiate pension plans, anything they can think of to streamline their companies, NOW, or they can kiss their companies goodbye by a few years down the road.
 
 
Bush's terrible economy is breaking records on Wall Street.

 http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,217766,00.html 
 
 
 
Bush's terrible economy is breaking records on Wall Street.

 http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,217766,00.html 
 

Just for context: How long into the presidencies of Clinton, Bush I, and Reagan did it take until the Dow first broke its previous record? Without having looked at the data, I'd bet it took much less than six years for each of them.
 
 
 
Bush's terrible economy is breaking records on Wall Street.

 

Talk about economic ignorance. As the chart below illustrates, until Bush Jr got in office, the Dow Jones did nothing BUT break records every few weeks, since it was in a continuous process of going up almost all the time.

The fact that it took Bush's economy six years to go up from where it started is a disgrace.

 
 
 
 
Talk about economic ignorance. As the chart below illustrates, until Bush Jr got in office, the Dow Jones did nothing BUT break records every few weeks, since it was in a continuous process of going up almost all the time.

The fact that it took Bush's economy six years to go up from where it started is a disgrace.

 

Yeah, like I haven't been around for a while watching this stuff. My parents lived through the depression, keltic, so if you want to listen to how virtually everybody lives now compared to then, you need to listen to somebody that knows what they are talking about like them and remedy your own ignorance. By the way, how come your graph does not show the last month?
 
 
 
 
Bush's terrible economy is breaking records on Wall Street.

 http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,217766,00.html 
 

Just for context: How long into the presidencies of Clinton, Bush I, and Reagan did it take until the Dow first broke its previous record? Without having looked at the data, I'd bet it took much less than six years for each of them.
 

The point is, Thomas, that the Democrats cannot run against the economy because it isn't too bad, and the stock market is looking fairly good now. Some other sectors have looked good for a long while, and more people own their own homes in America than ever before. That is the American dream.
 
 
Probably because it was made before the data came out.

It's sort of a misnomer to refer to these 'broken records' as a source of pride. The stock market hitting a new record used to be no big deal.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
I thought it was worth noting because good economies are not always about breaking all records, its about basic stability and continuity, and I think that is what we have. Too much growth can be detrimental, and there was no way to duplicate the 90s, which was in part fueled by the internet stock bubble, unless you want a huge crash at the end. We were very fortunate that Bush's tax policies averted that.
 
 
 
The point is, Thomas, that the Democrats cannot run against the economy because it isn't too bad, and the stock market is looking fairly good now.
 

If that was your point, kelticwizard's graph disproves it as well. As you can see, the Dow hit a record in 1992. Nevertheless, the Democrats did, in your words, "run against the economy" in 1992 -- and they won.
 
 
 
 
Bush's terrible economy is breaking records on Wall Street.

 http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,217766,00.html 
 

Just for context: How long into the presidencies of Clinton, Bush I, and Reagan did it take until the Dow first broke its previous record? Without having looked at the data, I'd bet it took much less than six years for each of them.
 

I think Thomas' comment here is just as misleading as oakie's earlier claim.

In the first place Presidents and Legislatures don't create economic activity. They certainly have the ability to harm or misdirect it, but they don't create it. Secondly there is a considerable time lag between the application of government economic policy and the effects it yields on economic performance. Politicians generally assume the lag is zero when the news is good and they are in office. Oddly this zero lag view seems to have substantial public currency as well.

The U.S. economy was already in a recession when Bush took office. Current indicators were still good, but the underlying trends - and the forces behind them - were inexorably at work. Given the magnitude of the bursting dot comm bubble, we had a reasonably soft landing, due in part to the Bush tax cuts. We would also had been better off had he the wisdom, political courage and will to restrain government spending.

A broad economic expansion, begun during the Reagan years was still underway when Clinton began his first term. He was wise enough to do nothing to harm it and the good news continued. One can make a fairly good case that the division of power between a Republican Congress and a Democrat President in those years yielded a paralysis of major government initiatives that prevented the politicians (of both parties) from screwing up a good thing.
 
 
I agree with all you say, except my earlier statements have not been misleading. All I said was "Bush's terrible economy was breaking records on Wall Street," which is true. It was a sarcastic statement, and I did not say breaking records indicated everything was booming. As you pointed out, which says the same thing I said earlier, the booming stock market during the 90's could no way be sustained in any real world, and some of that was the phony dot.com boom, so we've had a period of correction for growth to catch up with inflated stock prices. The truth is the economy is steady and pretty good, not great, but it is not nearly as bad as the Democrats would love people to believe.
 
 
 

 
Yeah, like I haven't been around for a while watching this stuff.
 

Too bad you didn't pay attention while you were watching. For if you paid attention, you would see that the stock market's performance under Bush is terrible compared to his two predecessors. When previous presidents see relatively steady stock market growth, when the stock market under previous presidents is largely a series of new "records", then to keep the stock market flat or worse for six years is a disgrace.

And don't give me any 9/11 baloney. As the chart indicates, the fallout from 9/11 was all over in a couple of months-the stock market returned to what it was.
 
 
 
My parents lived through the depression, keltic, so if you want to listen to how virtually everybody lives now compared to then, you need to listen to somebody that knows what they are talking about like them and remedy your own ignorance.
 

So THAT'S your defense of Bush's economy? It was better under Bush than it was during the Great Depression????

I know you Republicans are experts at lowering the bar for Bush, so that if he achieves mediocrity in any area it is supposed to be cause for joyous celebration and hosannas. But you have really outdone yourselves this time.

Don't complain about Bush-things are better under him than they were during the Great Depression. That's a riot.    
 
 
 
 
My parents lived through the depression, keltic, so if you want to listen to how virtually everybody lives now compared to then, you need to listen to somebody that knows what they are talking about like them and remedy your own ignorance.
 

So THAT'S your defense of Bush's economy? It was better under Bush than it was during the Great Depression????

I know you Republicans are experts at lowering the bar for Bush, so that if he achieves mediocrity in any area it is supposed to be cause for joyous celebration and hosannas. But you have really outdone yourselves this time.

Don't complain about Bush-things are better under him than they were during the Great Depression. That's a riot.    
 

Keltic, if you would apply just the slightest historical analysis to this subject, then Bush is not performing badly at all. The stock market has always performed in fits and starts, in other words, periods of growth followed by relatively flat performance, and possibly even drops if you look at it in constant dollars. This is well illustrated by the graphs in the following links.

 http://www.signaltrend.com/DJIA.html 

 http://bigpicture.typepad.com/comments/2005/12/100_year_bull_b.html 

The following site shows growth rates, and the second chart is the one to look at because the first one does not account for inflation so it gives a distorted picture.

 http://www.lowrisk.com/djia100year.htm 

This last chart I will show below because it really shows the best picture in my opinion, in inflation adjusted dollars. The commentary accompanying this graph says: "Adjusting for inflation puts the Bull and Bear periods into even sharper relief. It also shows how totally bubblicious the late 1990s were, and why many strategists and technicians started pulling in their horns in the mid-1990s."

I interpret the "bubblicious" late 90s as reflecting the phony dot com bubble. In other words, there was no possible way this could sustain itself no matter who was president, and in fact, it was peaked out and headed down by the time Clinton left office. And this is consistent with historical cycles of the market.

The other observation one should note in the following graph is the earnings now as compared to the 90's, on this graph they look as good or better. The truth is this economy is not bad and the stock market is performing very good when measured against historical cycles and trends. With the bubble of the 90's, we are fortunate to sustain as much value of the market that we did. And remember the bubble did not accurately reflect profits, so the market became inflated. When something becomes inflated, it must come back to reality. To explain better, profits were there, but stock prices were much higher compared to profits than commonly seen at other times in the market.

Edit [Moderator]: Image converted to a link:
 http://bigpicture.typepad.com/comments/files/modifiedshiller.jpg 

P.S. The graph by itself clearly dispels Clinton's contention during that campaign with Bush I, including the debate I remember in particular, that Bush was presiding over "the worst economy since the great depression." That was enough to convince me Clinton was a bald faced liar from Arkansas, and nothing ever happened since to disprove that.
 
 
Thanks for stretching the whole screen out so that
nobody can read any posts on the whole page,
Bubblehead.

Now, not only are your own posts entirely unreadable,
so are the messages of everyone else who took the time
and effort to post on this page.

You have been on this forum less than a year,
and you have more posts than I have,
and I've been here three years.

Yet, am I supposed to believe that you still can't
post a damn graph without ruining the screen?

Why don't you screw up the whole page while
you are at it? Oh wait, you just

DID!!!
 
 
Enhance your calm...

Job creation in September:

 
September job growth below expectations

By David Lawder 1 hour, 9 minutes ago

WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. employers added a scant 51,000 jobs in September, far below market expectations, according to a government report on Friday that showed broad weakness in the manufacturing and retail sectors.
 

That's 100k below what is neccessary just to keep up.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Keltic, calm down. I've run into the stretching screen problem because of other people, and I thought the graph was worth it to stare you in the face, as I did not know whether you would take the trouble to click the link. Hey, my sincere apologies for committing a very bad sin here, judging from the size of your fonts.

Anyway, the graphs I dug up were enlightening to me, and I hope they were to others.
 
 
 
Keltic, calm down. I've run into the stretching screen problem because of other people, and I thought the graph was worth it to stare you in the face, as I did not know whether you would take the trouble to click the link.
 

That's just my point. You knew the screen stretching problem was happening, and you decided your graph was so important that you were perfectly willing to sacrifice the readability of everyone else's posts on the page just so that you can get your graph in.

Beautiful.

For the record, there are ways to resize an image so that it fits on the screen without bollixing up the whole works. I suggest you learn them before posting any more large images. You have posted over 2,000 messages on this forum-it is not asking too much to expect you to take a little time to learn how to avoid abusing it.
 
 
bm
 
 
 
September job growth below expectations

By David Lawder 1 hour, 9 minutes ago

WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. employers added a scant 51,000 jobs in September, far below market expectations, according to a government report on Friday that showed broad weakness in the manufacturing and retail sectors.
 

 
That's 100k below what is neccessary just to keep up.

Cycloptichorn
 

Indeed it is. Fact is, bush's job creation has not kept up with population growth for his entire term.

Below is Bush's job creation for people between 25 and 54 year old-people in the prime of their earning years. Notice how under Clinton, in that age group the job creation far exceeded the population growth. Note how under Bush it has lagged behind.

 
 
 
 
Below is Bush's job creation for people between 25 and 54 year old-people in the prime of their earning years.
 

Just for reference, can you tell us the source of your numbers?
 
 
Be glad to. The Bureau of Labor Statistics, from the Current Population Survey, (CPS).
 
 
 
Be glad to. The Bureau of Labor Statistics, from the Current Population Survey, (CPS).
 

Thanks!
 
 
There is something in that graph, kelticwizard, that seems questionable. But I can't think of what it is!

Meanwhile, on a somewhat but not completely unrelated note is this.

The Nobel prize in Economics ("The dismal science") went to an American this year, it was announced over the weekend, for research he had done in the area of unemployment rates and the inflation rate.

Without getting too balled up in this, the conventional wisdom has long been that, when the level of unemployment gets "too" low, employers have to increase wages to compete for workers. The higher costs get passed on to consumers in the form of higher prices; i.e. inflation.
The Nobel laureate's research seems to show that that may be true in the short-term but the inflationary wave disappears over time.
 
 
a canadian prime-minister (good old john diefenbaker) when at one time questioned about the high rate of unemployment, replied :
"we want people to have more holidays !". (that was in the 'good old days' - late 50's).
hbg
 
 
 
There is something in that graph, kelticwizard, that seems questionable. But I can't think of what it is!

 

The huge decline of population entering the target age group in the Bush administration?
 
 
 
Below is Bush's job creation for people between 25 and 54 year old-people in the prime of their earning years. Notice how under Clinton, in that age group the job creation far exceeded the population growth. Note how under Bush it has lagged behind.
 

Your post begs the question, why single out 25 to 54 year olds instead of the entire work force? Was that a way to get the most impressive looking graph to support your bias against Bush? Maybe not but just a suspicion?
 
 
 
Was that a way to get the most impressive looking graph to support your bias against Bush?
 

If by "bias against Bush" you mean I selected the group which Bush apologists such as yourself would have the least excuses for, you are on the right track.

If I included the 16 to 18 year old age group, Bush supporters might say, "What do you expect-they're high school dropouts. Everyone knows the workforce requires people with skills-this is merely a trend which has been going on for quite awhile. The only thing wrong with this economy is that dropouts are finding it harder to find jobs".

Similar arguments can be said for 18 to 20 year olds. While many have already started families, many in this age group are doing things such as working a low wage job because they plan to start college next year, etc.

So I felt the best basis for comparison was the 25 to 54 age group. This is the age group where people are basically on their career track, their education is over or at least is now a part time activity, they are paying mortgages and supporting children, etc. And by and large, not many in this group are retiring voluntarily yet.

This age group is the heart of the serious workforce. That is why I selected it.
 
 
 
 
Was that a way to get the most impressive looking graph to support your bias against Bush?
 

If by "bias against Bush" you mean I selected the group which Bush apologists such as yourself would have the least excuses for, you are on the right track.

If I included the 16 to 18 year old age group, Bush supporters might say, "What do you expect-they're high school dropouts. Everyone knows the workforce requires people with skills-this is merely a trend which has been going on for quite awhile. The only thing wrong with this economy is that dropouts are finding it harder to find jobs".
 

The Census Bureau defines "working age population" as ages 16-64, judging by a quick Google on the term at census.gov. Since you cite the Census Bureau as the source of your data, it's a fair question why you didn't use their definition. After all, the thrust of your thesis is that Bush is a much inferior president for workers than Clinton was. So why did you roll with your own definition of which workers matter rather than just relying on the Census Bureau's -- whose competence and neutrality are much better established than yours? While the suspicious undertone in okie's question may have been unnecessary, its factual part was fair. And your answer, that ages 16-18 and 54-64 aren't "seriously" part of the workforce, is unconvincing.

If you cite data as objective support for your conclusions, it's better to rely on standard terms such as "working age population", and on statistical standard definitions of those terms.
 
 
Thomas, I am not suggesting that a 17 year old working in his first full time job is employed any less than a 35 year old with 8 years on the job.

Nor am I suggesting the Census Bureau change it's definitions, or anything like that. That is why I clearly labelled the graph as being for 25 to 54 year olds.

I might point out that the Census Burequ itself keeps statistics for various age groups, and this is one of them. So I am not going against Census Bureau groupings, in fact I am using them.

But realistically, Thomas, when somebody single and 17 can't find a job, that is normally less of a life crisis than when somebody 34, with kids and a mortgage can't find a job. And the 17 year old is probably a dropout, which will give the Bush apologists something else to try to dodge around with for a few pages.

As I stated before, and I will state again, the 25 to 54 year old age group are your "core" workers, in the sense that they have gotten their full time education behind them, they are working on the career track they plan to remain on, and they mostly have the responsibilities we associate with working people. The younger age groups mostly do not.

I am not advocating abandoning study of the younger age groups, of course. Only that in presenting the employment situation, I choose to present the age group who can be expected to have accumulated most of the education they will ever get, who have accumulated job skills, who don't have early retirement issues clouding the picture and who have the most responsibilities for people other than themselves.
 
 
Keltic, how would your comparison if you did include the whole working age population?

In presenting the statistics you presented, you presumably tried to persuade people who might disagree with your politics. These people won't necessarily trust your cherrypicking choices. Even if you had good reasons for these choices, you won't persuade anyone by giving them. Your only shot at persuading opponents is to abstain from picking cherries, instead presenting numbers that everyone agrees are representative.
 
 
Thomas, when you hear on the radio that a company such as Ford plans to get rid of tens of thousands of workers, the first thing which flashes in most people's mind is how those people are going to pay the mortgage and take care of their kids.

The people who have to take care of these things are mostly in the 25 to 54 year old age group.

The 17 year old who just started work six months ago can take his pink slip and decide to take off to California to see what the surfing life is like. There is likely not much preventing him from doing that. The man or woman who has a stack of bills and mortagage payments is in a different situation altogether, not to mention the necessity of getting a job with health insurance for the children.

I am comparing the population growth versus job growth for the 25 to 54 year old age group for both Presidents. That is a fair and valid comparison. The Census Bureau gives the statistics for that grouping, and I am using it. I see nothing unfair about it at all, and for the reasons given, I think it provides a most accurate picture of the employment picture in the USA.
 
 
 
The people who have to take care of these things are mostly in the 25 to 54 year old age group.
 

Yes -- just as the people who vote are mostly non-poor. If okie said the Republican push for voter IDs disenfranchizes practically no middle class Americans and therefore is just, would you stand for it? Of course not. You would dismiss it as self-serving cherry picking by a Republican. You would have been right. And Okie is right for exactly the same reason now. (For the record, I never saw Okie make that claim about disenfranchisement.)

I'm still curious how the comparison would be different if you included the whole working age population, meaning age 16-64.
 
 
But Thomas, we are not talking about taking away a Cosntitutional right, or making it harder to exercise, are we? We are talking about a statistic, a snapshot of the economic situation.

I'm quite satisfied with my selection of the 25 to 54 year old age group because I think this group has fewer side issues than others complicating the picture. I really don't care to go over the litany of reasons in every post, but just to hit the high points, this group has gotten it's education over, (except as a part-time activity), are settled on their career path, have houses, mortgages and children to raise and obtain health insurance for. Other age groups, by and large, do not.

I really don't care to read Okie or other Bush supporters dodge around for several pages about how it's the personal responsibility of high schoolers to finish school so they can be suitable for the work force and how any inability to get started in the workforce cannot be laid to the government, etc, etc. Maybe you do, but I don't.

The 25 to 54 year old age group provides the best comparison overall for the employment situation overall. It's the largest working age group out there, and everyone passes through it at one time or another, so I felt it bears examination.
 
 
 
I'm quite satisfied with my selection of the 25 to 54 year old age group
 

Well good for you. Just don't be surprised that okie and I are not.
 
 
Thomas:

The attention in domestic affairs generally focuses on how American families are doing. And rightfully so.

The purpose of the graph is to give to a snapshot of how those who are in the age group to raise families are doing. We rightfully concentrate on the family in other areas in public discourse, I think it is more than appropriate that we do so in the economic and employment area.
 
 
i don't see anything wrong with kw's stats ; imo he clearly labelled it.
of course, if you think his information is wrong, i assume you would show where it is misleading a reader and what the true stats are.
i thought that was part of why we are participating on a2k ; if we find mislaeding or erroneus information being posted, we show would we think is correct.
btw i doubt that there is any poster here who hasn't done some 'cherry-picking', as you call it.
now, if kw had mislabeled his info, that would be a different matter - but has he ?
hbg
 
 
Point well taken, Hamburger. Far be it for Johnboy to agree with Okie on much of anything. My initial reaction was, something doesn't look right here.

Time for some sleuthing through the stats. The time frame KWiz chose was the first 68 months of each President's term. What is the specific 68 months for each that we are focusing on? As an aside, why 68 months?
 
 
 
As an aside, why 68 months?
 

Most likely, it's how long Bush has been in office.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Sorry, I knew that. So we are talking about February, 1993 through September, 1998 vs February 2001, through September, 2006?
 
 
 
But Thomas, we are not talking about taking away a Cosntitutional right, or making it harder to exercise, are we? We are talking about a statistic, a snapshot of the economic situation.

I'm quite satisfied with my selection of the 25 to 54 year old age group because I think this group has fewer side issues than others complicating the picture. I really don't care to go over the litany of reasons in every post, but just to hit the high points, this group has gotten it's education over, (except as a part-time activity), are settled on their career path, have houses, mortgages and children to raise and obtain health insurance for. Other age groups, by and large, do not.

I really don't care to read Okie or other Bush supporters dodge around for several pages about how it's the personal responsibility of high schoolers to finish school so they can be suitable for the work force and how any inability to get started in the workforce cannot be laid to the government, etc, etc. Maybe you do, but I don't.

The 25 to 54 year old age group provides the best comparison overall for the employment situation overall. It's the largest working age group out there, and everyone passes through it at one time or another, so I felt it bears examination.
 

Not much time today to read all of the posts, but this one caught my eye. Keltic, it does not surprise me that you wish to remove all personal responsibility from things like getting an education or providing proof of citizenship before voting. That is typical liberal thinking. Everything is the government's fault. There is such a thing as "citizenship" that I would remind you here that has a just a "tiny bit" of responsibility.

More on the unemployment later.

Not to change the subject, but I think one of the big reasons Democrats are not in favor of ID's for voting is it removes much support in the way of illegals votes, double voting, etc. I see no reason why a citizen can't muster at least enough smarts to have a valid ID, after all you need one for virtually everything else you do.
 
 
 
Keltic, it does not surprise me that you wish to remove all personal responsibility from things like getting an education.......... That is typical liberal thinking. Everything is the government's fault.
 

Well, Thomas, are you STILL suspicious why I chose the age group I did?

Vintage Okie. When you're nailed, try to talk about anything but the subject at hand, and make every sentence a commercial for the idea that Republicans are the party of morality, (not an easy thing to do these days).
 
 
 
 
Keltic, it does not surprise me that you wish to remove all personal responsibility from things like getting an education.......... That is typical liberal thinking. Everything is the government's fault.
 

Well, Thomas, are you STILL suspicious why I chose the age group I did?

Vintage Okie. When you're nailed, try to talk about anything but the subject at hand, and make every sentence a commercial for the idea that Republicans are the party of morality, (not an easy thing to do these days).
 

I'm learning from you, keltic. When I posted historical graphs for the stock market to prove a point, you complained about the size of the graph and my posting ability and dropped the subject to instead switch to another hill to argue on, that of employment. Not only that, you cherry pick the data. The following is a simple unemployment chart, which shows Bush not doing bad, but of course I predict you will come up with all kinds of reasons why things are alot worse than it shows.

 http://www.economagic.com/em-cgi/charter.exe/fedstl/unrate+1969+2006+0+0+0+400+800++0 

The Republican party is not a party of morality. Neither is the Democrats. Both parties have their crooks and scumbags, which I have always asserted. And there are decent men in both parties but Democrats have a distinct edge in corruption in my opinion. At least when found out, the Republicans apologize and resign. Democrats deny, deny, deny, until some other news happens and they are forgotten. Jefferson still sits in office, keltic. Foley is gone. Clinton was impeached, lied before the grand jury, and had all kinds of other scumbag things happen, and he is still hailed as a hero to Democrats.
 
 
 
I'm learning from you, keltic. When I posted historical graphs for the stock market to prove a point, you complained about the size of the graph and my posting ability and dropped the subject to instead switch to another hill to argue on, that of employment.
 

You're darn right I complained about your huge graph making everyone else's post on the page unreadable. And during your alleged "apology" for it, you revealed that you did it purposely because you wanted to get the graph in. It's the typical, political non-apology in action, which takes the following form: "Yes I did it, I had my reasons for doing it and I would do it again, but I do think it is too bad other people had to suffer in the process". In a real apology-apparently something you are entirely unfamiliar with-you tell people that you would not do it again.

On the basis of your previous posts, I don't expect you to comprehend the difference.

A newcomer to the forum making that mistake is one thing. A person with over 2,000 posts is something else. If you can come onto this forum and use it's facilities to tell the world your view of things, you have the time to take a moment or two learning how not to abuse it with oversize
graphs which RUIN everyone else's efforts on the page!
 
 
 
Well, Thomas, are you STILL suspicious why I chose the age group I did?
 

I never suspected any evil motives behind your choice. I just thought it was an unpersuasive choice -- and I still do.
 
 
 
Not only that, you cherry pick the data.
 

 
I just thought it [the selection of the 25 to 54 year old age group] was an unpersuasive choice -- and I still do.
 

I don't cherry pick the data. Out of the economic data available, I select the one which illustrates my point about the family raising age group.

I have already outlined numerous times the reasons I used for selecting the 25 to 54 year old age group. One of the reasons has already been illustrated by Okie himself-his interjection about how we shouldn't "blame the government" if high school dropouts have trouble finding a job. Nothing to do with economics, everything to do with trying to portray the Republican Party as the party of morality-the only reason Okie is on A2K.

The second reason I will repeat yet again. Domestic political discourse in this country centers on the family. How are faimilies doing, how can a family make it, etc etc. It is impossible to miss this, Thomas.

Yet, when I simply post a graph illustrating that job growth in the family-raising age group, (25 to 54) is not keeping up with population growth, there are complaints.

I really don't know why. My graph speaks to the ongoing issue about how hard or easy it is for families to financially make it in America. About the only point which might be raised is that it includes people in the 25 to 54 year old age group who are not raising faimilies. To which I answer, until such time as someone comes up with convincing evidence that people 25 to 54 without families are hired at a different rate from people 25 to 54 with families, it is a moot question.
 
 
 
Sorry, I knew that. So we are talking about February, 1993 through September, 1998 vs February 2001, through September, 2006?
 

Realjohnboy:

January through August of those years.

The Presideint takes office in late January, but the January figure is for the last day of the month, so I counted it.

I created the graph on September 16 for another thread and then never got around to using it. So August were the last figures available. I doubt the numbers would change much if the period was shifted a month from Feb. to Sept.  
 
 
 
 
I'm learning from you, keltic. When I posted historical graphs for the stock market to prove a point, you complained about the size of the graph and my posting ability and dropped the subject to instead switch to another hill to argue on, that of employment.
 

You're darn right I complained about your huge graph making everyone else's post on the page unreadable. And during your alleged "apology" for it, you revealed that you did it purposely because you wanted to get the graph in. It's the typical, political non-apology in action, which takes the following form: "Yes I did it, I had my reasons for doing it and I would do it again, but I do think it is too bad other people had to suffer in the process". In a real apology-apparently something you are entirely unfamiliar with-you tell people that you would not do it again.

On the basis of your previous posts, I don't expect you to comprehend the difference.

A newcomer to the forum making that mistake is one thing. A person with over 2,000 posts is something else. If you can come onto this forum and use it's facilities to tell the world your view of things, you have the time to take a moment or two learning how not to abuse it with oversize
graphs which RUIN everyone else's efforts on the page!
 

What is your obsession with the oversized graph, keltic? To correct the record, it did not make everybody's post unreadible. It simply required them to scroll sideways to read the post, for that page only. My apologies, and to also correct the record, I probably would not do it again. You would think I had just slapped everybody around here by posting an enlarged graph! At least I don't call other people barnyard names as some other people do here, and get away with it by the way. I guess posting an enlarged graph is the cardinal sin here?
 
 
Yeah, enhance your calm

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
I have already outlined numerous times the reasons I used for selecting the 25 to 54 year old age group. One of the reasons has already been illustrated by Okie himself-his interjection about how we shouldn't "blame the government" if high school dropouts have trouble finding a job. Nothing to do with economics, everything to do with trying to portray the Republican Party as the party of morality-the only reason Okie is on A2K.

The second reason I will repeat yet again. Domestic political discourse in this country centers on the family. How are faimilies doing, how can a family make it, etc etc. It is impossible to miss this, Thomas.

......
 

So keltic, if I am a teenage girl and quit high school, go sleep around, have 3 children, bing bing bing, get no education, have no responsible husband, no responsible boyfriend, smoke 2 packs a day, party, and then wonder why I am broke, then you are telling me that is government's fault?

In fact, LBJ's Great Society probably encouraged more of the above scenario, because people found out that having more children and not having husbands enabled them to get more welfare from the government. The decline of stable families is one important reason for many of the societal problems. Maybe you need to blame that as much as the evil corporations? One thing you can bank on, if you reward a behavior, it will increase.

I would need to check the statistics, but I would bet you that there are far less intact families now, percentage wise, than 50 years ago.

P.S. This addition. The only graph online I can find so far (seems to be a lack of interest in this....hmmmm) is the following, which shows an increase from 24% to 28% from 1990 to 2001:

 http://www.aecf.org/cgi-bin/kc.cgi?action=graph&area=United%20States&variable=fsp&year=1990&year=2001 
 
 
 
A newcomer to the forum making that mistake is one thing. A person with over 2,000 posts is something else. If you can come onto this forum and use it's facilities to tell the world your view of things, you have the time to take a moment or two learning how not to abuse it with oversize
graphs which RUIN everyone else's efforts on the page!
 

Well, if its that big a deal to you, there are proactively remedial options available to you beyond mere complaining - you might install a current browser, such as Firefox or IE7, which, either natively or via plugin, conveniently permit you to resize your page display to suit your preferences, globally or instance-by-instance, or you could increase your monitor's screen resolution, or you could get yourself a more capable monitor, for instance. I'll note for record that with a current browser, "screen stretching" need not be evident even on a 12.1" screen tablet set to 1280x768/32 Bit Color, and just about regardless of browser, rarely if ever occurs on a 24" 16:9 display monitor set to 1600x1200/32 Bit Color.
 
 
OK, I'll bite. How do you use Firefox to resize the page display to avoid the problem of page stretching?
 
 
 
 
 

I am going to take at shot at this, but I suspect it will end up muddying the water even more.
I wandered around the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics (bls.gov) for a while and came up with this for starters: Civilian Non-instititional Population Levels by month since 1993 (Glossary: not inmates of jails or homes for the aged and not on active military service)

January 1993: Age 20 and Over- 180,129,000
August 1998: Age 20 and Over- 189,790,000 An increase of 5.4%

January 2001: Age 20 and Over- 197,955,000
August 2006: Age 20 and Over- 212,442,000 An Increase of 7.3%

I could not find a breakout of 25-54 year olds in the population. In fact I had to start with 16 and older and then subtract numbers from another table of 16 to 19 year olds.

And that is when I had the "aha" sensation---or what I think is "aha" sensation. In 1996 or so, the children of the post war baby-boomers hit the 25-54 year old work force that was the bone of contention here for awhile. And they got jobs, perhaps menial but perhaps in the rapture of the dot.com craze that burst in 2000.
And now, or in say 2000, us "old farts" are falling out of the 25-54 group.

So the term "full time employed" excludes the entire baby boom generation.

Did that put EVERYONE to sleep?
 
 
Wow. I sure can kill a thread. Ignore my last post and go back to whatever yall were bickering about.
 
 
Work is a good thing is it? That's news to me. I bloody hate it.

The Protestant ethic and all that.

Good old Bill. He got their noses to the grindstone goodstyle.
 
 
 
Wow. I sure can kill a thread. Ignore my last post and go back to whatever yall were bickering about.
 

I read your post, realjohnboy, and found it interesting. I did not do the research you did, but have no reason to doubt it, and if I am interpreting it correctly, it blows keltic's argument completely out of the water. In other words, it depends on what portion of the population is of working age, or in keltic's case - how many percentagewise was in his cherrypicked bracket of 25-54, proving once again that figures don't lie, but liars will figure. That is why I went back to the most simple analysis in my debate with keltic and used the unemployment rates starting before Clinton and extending into the current administration, and it showed we are doing pretty good now as compared to historical cycles. I see no compelling reason to muddy the water by placing customized conditions on which portion of the population to do an analysis.
 
 
 
January 1993: Age 20 and Over- 180,129,000
August 1998: Age 20 and Over- 189,790,000 An increase of 5.4%

January 2001: Age 20 and Over- 197,955,000
August 2006: Age 20 and Over- 212,442,000 An Increase of 7.3%
 

So you found out that the population over 20 is increasing year from year. Okay. Now consider this: The population UNDER 20 is also increasing year to year. That's because the population of the United States is increasing, period. It has been ever since the first census.

America's population has been going up, up, up since Colonial times.

 
I could not find a breakout of 25-54 year olds in the population. In fact I had to start with 16 and older and then subtract numbers from another table of 16 to 19 year olds.
 

I'm sorry you could not, because it is there.
 
 
 
And that is when I had the "aha" sensation---or what I think is "aha" sensation. In 1996 or so, the children of the post war baby-boomers hit the 25-54 year old work force that was the bone of contention here for awhile......And now, or in say 2000, us "old farts" are falling out of the 25-54 group.
 

Yes, some of the people who were in the 25-54 year old age group in the nineties were no longer in it when we passed 2000. And some of the people who were NOT in the 25-54 year old age group yet in the nineties entered it after 2000.

Isn't that normal?

As I stated before, I selected the 25-54 year old age group for a variety of reasons. A 20 year old working full time might be a fairly recent high school dropout whose work situation reflects that fact more than his age, or if he is a high school grad he might be working an easy-to-get job, rather than a job with a future, because he plans on entering college in the next year or two. I know several people in that age group who are doing that-they are not going after their career yet, they are just bringing in an income until they start college.

And for the over 55 age group, there is the matter of voluntary retirement complicating things.

The people 25 to 54 years old, however, are the people who by and large are on their career track, who have their education behind them except as a part time endeavor, who are raising kids, buying houses and paying off mortgages. If an economy is going to be said to be doing well, people who are in this age group must be doing well.

The people who are younger than this or older than this by and large do not have these responsibilities, as well as further complications I mentioned earlier.

By contrast, the people who are 25-54 are on their career track, and pursuing it for all it's worth.

 
So the term "full time employed" excludes the entire baby boom generation.
 

Oh, no, not at all. I never, ever tried to give the impression that to be full time employed, you have to be between 25 and 54. I only wanted to vive a picture of the employment situation for people who, I am sure most would agree, were in the "heart" of their working careers.
 
 
To the folks who still question the choice of the 25 to 54 year old age group, I offer the following comparison.

Suppose we have two different countries with equal populations and equal working populations,.

However, we find that full time employed are growing faster than the population for people 16 to 25 years old and people 55 to 64 years old, but that full time employed people are growing slower than populatin growth for people 25 to 54 years old.

In country B, it is the reverse. 25 to 54 year olds are getting jobs faster than their population growth, but full time employed people are growing slower than population for 16 to 25 year olds and 55 to 64 year olds.

Which country has the better economic situation?

Rather obvious, isn't it? Country B, with the people 25 to 54 years old getting jobs more readily than the older and younger group is in much, much better shape.

In Country B, the younger group might have a little harder time entering the wrkforce, but once they are in there, the opportunites are great indeed. By contrast, in Country A the younger group can enter the workforce easily but once they are in there for a few years, things start getting rough for a long, long time. Who the heck wants that for a future?

In Country B, the employeds in the 55-64 year old group are not keeping pace with the population. This might well be because they did so well during the previous thirty years of working they decided to retire before 65. But even if that is not the case, at least this group had three decades of expanding opportunities to get themselves set up. In country A, people have decreasing opportunites for thirty years, then finally things get better when they hit 55. That is not everyone's idea of a great working career.

Would you rather live in a country where it might take you a few years to get started, but once you get your foot in the door the opportunities multiply, or would you like to live in a country where you can get started easily enough, but once you do you get stuck in a track that doesn't pay off much for three decades, and then things get better?

I think most people would prefer to take a few years to get started, then enjoy the better opportunities.

That is why I focused on the 25 to 54 year old age group. I think tracking this group gives a better picture of what people's working careers are really like than a mere snapshot of all age groups.
 
 
President of fantasyland

Bush is blind and deaf to growing middle class anxiety

BY ANDREA BATISTA SCHLESINGER

If you want to learn about the state of America today, you're better off turning to The Donald than to The President.
Donald Trump said last week that "The middle class is disappearing and America is becoming a two-class society. Soon you will be either rich or poor."

This isn't news to squeezed middle-class Americans. But when even Donald Trump is warning about the death of the American Dream, isn't it time for our nation's leader to pay attention?

Apparently not. The cheerleader-in-chief has been traveling the country talking up the strength of the economy. In every official statement President Bush has made about the economy over the last six months, he has been relentlessly sunny, touting the falling deficit and rising Dow. Meantime, under his nose, everything that defines the American Dream of a middle-class lifestyle is at risk.

Sending your kids to college? Tuition has shot up at least 40% for public four-year schools over the last five years.

Owning your own home? Foreclosure rates have increased, new Census Bureau data show that the burden of housing costs has grown significantly since 2000, and with the boom cooling, who knows how many will suffer because they put everything into their homes.

The security of a dignified retirement? With union membership at its lowest, companies defaulting on pensions and personal saving at an all-time low, it's a mirage.

In the face of all this, Bush remains in a state of utter economic denial. At a recent visit to the Meyer Tool factory in Ohio, a state where wages are lower and jobs are fewer than in 2000, he proclaimed that "This economy of ours is strong. And one of the main reasons it's strong is because of the tax cuts that we passed."

Maybe it's strong for corporate America, but not for my dad. Like lots of New Yorkers, he's saddled with skyrocketing fuel bills, an expensive health insurance plan and out-of-pocket prescription and dental costs that are approaching the budget of a small nation.

Even Treasury Secretary Hank Paulson acknowledged that "Many Americans simply aren't feeling the benefits. Many aren't seeing significant increases in their take-home pay."

So Donald Trump, famous for living in the lap of luxury, and Paulson, former CEO of Goldman Sachs with a net worth of $700 million, are more attuned to middle-class economic anxiety than a self-styled populist President?

Bush's bubble isn't just a political problem. You can't create urgency to address our health care crisis without first acknowledging that almost one in two working-age Americans with moderate to middle incomes lacked health insurance for at least part of the year in 2005.

Here in New York, the consequences are even greater. Middle-class neighborhoods are disappearing, and thanks to the high cost of living here, one in two renters spend at least a third of their gross income on housing.

If the President's optimism paid the bills, we'd all be fine. But it doesn't. So it's time that he spend a little less time smiling, and a little more time listening - if not to American families, than at least to Donald Trump.
 
 
Unemployment down. Democrats hate this news.

 http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,227282,00.html 
 
 
Hmm, and what about the US labour costs which are said "to provide further disturbing evidence that inflation is back as a serious threat to the world's largest economy"?
 
 
 
Unemployment down. Democrats hate this news.

 http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,227282,00.html 
 

News flash. Unemployment figures only reflect the people who lost their jobs six months ago or less. After that, the government considers you as no longer looking for work.

Republicans won't mention that.

What about the people who lost their jobs a few years ago and still haven't found their way back into the work force?

We know there are plenty still out there, because the growth in jobs has not kept pace with population growth among people 25 to 54 years old-the heart of the workforce.

Anyway you look at it, the jobs versus population growth for the people in the heart of the workforce is as shown below.

 
 
 
You tried the 25 to 54 garbage before, Keltic, so do you have anything pertinent for a change?
 
 
It's not garbage. It most certainly is pertinent. And it sheds light on your supposedly "great" unemployment news.

The unemployment figure you quote reflects only the people who have been laid off in the last six months. After the unemployment benefits expire, in most cases the individual is no longer included in that statistic. So if a great many people were laid off a couple of years ago and still haven't found their way back into the work force, it will never be reflected in your figures.

As far as the 25 to 54 year old age group goes, it is simply the heart of the workforce, the age at which individuals raise children and buy houses. You might think that if a 34 year old parent of three children loses his/her $20/hour job at an auto plant the same month a 17 year old starts his first job at Taco Bell that we have an even swap. I do not. Hence, the importance of the examining the employment situation of those in heart of the workforce, that is, the 25 to 54 year old age group.

The fact is, employment in this group has not kept pace with the population growth-it is falling behind. That is a far more accurate picture of the employment situation than your statistic, where people laid off more than six months ago simply no longer count as unemployed if they haven't found a job yet.
 
 
Why not simply use the most accurate statistic as it applies to the entire population? No need to skew the result by choosing some arbitrary age window. As for people that are unemployed past the time limit and aren't counted, this has always been true has it not? As for people that give up on employment, there have always been a percentage of those. And job outlooks for college graduates and skilled people are pretty good right now.

No matter how good the economy is during a Republican administration, Democrats will dig up the worst figures they can possibly find. The fact is the economy is pretty good. And besides, the president is not the only factor in the economy, far from it.

 http://www.economagic.com/em-cgi/daychart.exe/form 

P.S. I can't think of anybody I know of that is unemployed right now, and I know alot of people. If I think hard, I might think of somebody, but honestly, people that have skills, even in the trades, are all employed with pretty good paying jobs, or I know a few people that are self employed and doing fine.
 
 
Good link, okie, I get a blank.

FYI, what keltic has posted is not garbage. The overriding information on all these numbers is very simply that under Bush, job creation has been the worst since Herbert Hoover. Job creation must keep up with those entering the work force, which all major economists say is about 150,000 per month. As keltic has said, the government's unemployment rates excludes those no longer looking for jobs. That your personal observations says otherwise means nothing. You must look at the "big" picture concerning the US 1) monthly creation of new jobs, 2) where most new employment is being created (mostly service industry), 3) if wages have kept up with inflation, 4) why industry continues to cut health insurance and 401k benefits from more employees every year, and 5) how the middle class is supposed to pay for the increasing cost of college education, higher fuel costs, and medical care.

You probably haven't noticed, but the biggest auto makers in the US are laying off workers by the thousands. Many factories in the US have been offshored to Asia and other countries. Many high tech jobs have been offshored to India and China; they're growing while we reduce ours.

Many new college grads are having difficulty finding jobs.

Most consumer's debt are at its highest ever.

The federal deficit is being funded by China and Japan.

Our trade deficit is also unmanageable; this only exacerbates the value of the US dollar, because there's too much dollars trasnferred overseas for which there is not enough US production to support. They will begin to buy our assets, and the US will lose control of our productive capacity and real estate.

You think the US economy is good, just because the US government says our unemployment is 4.4 percent? You have much learning to do about macro and micro economics.
 
 
Taken from boston.com.

The revisions for the prior two months added 139,000 jobs to payroll growth, and come after the government in October said the economy gained 810,000 more jobs than previously estimated in the year ended in March. Increased job growth will fuel wage gains, keeping consumers spending and providing a lift for an economy that faltered last quarter, economists said.

Workers' average hourly earnings rose 0.4 percent after increasing 0.2 percent the previous month.

"The Fed is going to say this is an economy that has legs to it," said John Silvia, chief economist at Wachovia Corp. in Charlotte, N.C.

The revisions added jobs in finance, education, healthcare, and leisure and hospitality.

Manufacturers shed 39,000 jobs last month, the biggest drop since July 2003, after cutting 12,000 jobs in September

Builders shed 26,000 jobs, the most since February 2003, after adding 5,000 jobs in the prior month.

This is from government reports; I have difficulty understanding and reconciling how our economy grew jobs when manufacturers shed 39,000 jobs, and builders shed 26,000 jobs. You can't add jobs in health care and education when there's a shortage of teachers and nurses. Many schools are using unlicensed teachers, and many hospitals are paying premium for nurses, because they can't find any.
 
 
 
Good link, okie, I get a blank.
 

Try this. You can then plug in the years and adjust the chart as you wish for your liking.

 http://www.economagic.com/em-cgi/charter.exe/fedstl/unrate 

I agree manufacturing jobs, such as the auto industry is suffering. It would not matter whether the president or Congress were Democrat or Republican. This trend has been occurring for a long time. I think it is due to our inflated wages and lifestyle here compared to other countries. Its about competition, and the people in China for example are happy to work for lower wages and a lower standard of living to produce the same products that we have traditionally produced. I don't think this can be fixed without eliminating the minimum wage law along with lots of other benefits provided by businesses, and reprogramming our citizens to live on less.

Jobs are evolving into the service industry, and I agree I do not like this trend for the long term, as I think it spells problems in my view. I think we need more creation of wealth lower down in the economic tree, and I believe this is best done in manufacturing and other basic industries. I am not an economist, but a healthy tree has a healthy root system. But as I said, I think this trend is inevitable, given the world economic system we are participating in, unless some fairly drastic earthshaking cultural changes are made.

It is my personal opinion that this country is at its pinnacle, and could continue the pinnacle for a while, I am not sure, but we could soon be outdone by the Chinas, the Indias, and perhaps other countries if we do not do a better job of education and staying at the forefront of technological advancement. But again, given the context of the system we have going for us during the current culture and generation, the economy is doing fairly well. The problems you speak of, and which I have discussed, are generational and cultural, and do not change overnight.
 
 
The 810,000 more jobs that our government bandies about for the year ended March is only 67,500 new jobs per month; far short of the 150,000 jobs needed in the US. How can they reconcile their 4.4 percent jobless rate? It's a miracle!
 
 
I haven't spent the time adding the numbers as you have attempted, but I think there is a good chance you are missing something in your figuring. I don't think the government could lie that much about the rate. Also, I am guessing the bureaus that compile these numbers are mostly Democratic leaning bureaucrats, and would like to see numbers to be negative, so I doubt very seriously the government would lie in Bush's favor.
 
 
 
The 810,000 more jobs that our government bandies about for the year ended March is only 67,500 new jobs per month; far short of the 150,000 jobs needed in the US. How can they reconcile their 4.4 percent jobless rate? It's a miracle!
 

One of the factors you may be ignoring is the many jobs that do not show up in their job creation statistics, but do have an effect on unemployment if the people are employed and therefore not applying for unemployment.
 
 
okie, Good point about competiveness; I agree. However, the US has up to now been very competitive in many fields, especially high tech and biotech where the future ecoomy will grow.

There's nothing wrong with my numbers. Here's a sampling of the 2004-2005 academic year college graduates:
Associate degree......668,000
Bachelor dgree......1,416,000
Masters degree........562,000
Professoinal...............85,000
doctors.....................47,200
.......total................ 2,778,200

If we divide this number by 12(months) to average it, the number shows our country must create 231,517 jobs every month. If our country is growing new jobs at less than 70,000 jobs every month, the unemployment rate should show a greater number than 4.4 percent. Don't forget, the above college graduates don't include all those high school graduates also looking for "new" jobs.
 
 
Another issue that exacerbates job creation is the simple fact that more Americans are keeping their jobs past their retirement age. As our country's population grows, more young people will be finishing school, and begin looking for jobs. The low job creation rate for the US will continue to grow. I just hate to see our government get away with half-truths just before the elections. I've been retired from work since 1998, and have no desire to seek a "job." I'm just angry that our government is doing so little for the American People while spending billions in Iraq.
 
 
cicerone, why don't you go to work for the bureau of labor and statistics because if you can crunch all the numbers on your calculator in a few minutes, we are wasting an awful lot of money on thousands of employees to come up with these numbers?
 
 
okie, They crunched the numbers; I just "borrowed" them.
 
 
Well, thats fine, but the point you need to look at is that the unemployment figure is likely more accurate than the job creation numbers. I have not researched it recently, but I recall hearing that many jobs simply are not accurately reported for various and sundry reasons.
 
 
 
Why not simply use the most accurate statistic as it applies to the entire population?
 
That is precisely what I did. I compared the growth of people employed in the main part of their working lives with the population growth of the same age. And found that the working population was not keeping up with population growth.

 
No need to skew the result by choosing some arbitrary age window.
 
That "age window" is the main part of their working life! As for skewed results, the statistic YOU present gives the most skewed result possible-if you haven't found a job in six months you no longer count as unemployed. That's ridiculous.

 
As for people that are unemployed past the time limit and aren't counted, this has always been true has it not?
 
Yes, it has. Which is why that statistic is very misleading, and always has been. That is why I didn't use it.

 
As for people that give up on employment, there have always been a percentage of those.
 
That's funny, that didn't happen under Bill Clinton. Instead, the opposite happened. For instance, from March through July of of 1996-four months-over 1.2 million jobs were added. Over 300,000 jobs a month. Yet, the unemployment rate did not change at all. All the economists were astounded. Why? Because all the people who had been laid off years ago under Bush I were now coming back to take all the new jobs that were available under Clinton. Sure there were plenty of new jobs-but the unemployment rate didn't change because many of the new jobs were being taken by people who had not counted on the unemployment rate statistics for years. Which is why I don't use the unemployment rate statistics.

 
No matter how good the economy is during a Republican administration, Democrats will dig up the worst figures they can possibly find.
 
On the contrary, we use the most simple, direct figures possible to arrive at a clear picture. YOU can quote statistics where people who are unemployed for over six months no longer count as unemployed if you wish. Just don't try to fool anyone into thinking it presents the real picture.
 
 
Your claim that some new jobs aren't being reported is the same tactic our government seems to be using, but that's also a no brainer. All employers must report all employees for income tax purposes. If you have found a way to not report new employees, I'm sure many businesses would love to hear about it. What's your next straw?

If we have over two miilion new college grads every year, and our country reports only 70,000 jobs every month, it's impossible to have a 4.4 unemployment rate. Are you that dense?
 
 
Just noticing no Bush opponents are posting bad economic news here, probably because there is little to report. The economy keeps humming along, and Bush's tax cuts produce higher tax revenues and lower deficits, as things improve following the effects of 911. Maybe if Bill had gotten OBL when he had the chance, we would not have had to suffer the setback and the war we are in now? Wonder why the 911 Commission didn't discuss that subject a bit more in their conclusions?

No doubt when Hillary starts running harder, she will again probably claim, as Bill did, that the economy is the worst since the Great Depression. The rich are getting richer and the poor getting poorer mantra again. Maybe she can borrow Edward's Two Americas speech that he repeated hundreds of times?
 
 
okie, You're either very wealthy or very dumb; take your pick.

There are more than 6 million more Americans without health insurance since Bush took over the white house.

The savings rate in our country is the worst since the depression.

Wages have not kept up with inflation, and most families are now earning less based on the loss from inflation vs wage increases.

Consumer debt is double now compared to when Bush took over the white house.

Our country lost over three million factory jobs during Bush's tenure. Those were mostly middle-class families.

Bush makes the claim that during his tenure 2.6 million new jobs were created. That averages out to 36,111 jobs per month. Our country needs between 150,000 to 200,000 new jobs every month just to keep up with those graduating from high school and college. If you believe that our unemployment rate that the government puts out is true, you don't understand anything about the job market or our economy.
Bush continues to claim that his tax cuts (for the rich) will create jobs. Where are they?

Most jobs today do not provide 401Ks or fully paid health insurance benefits. Most workers now pay a portion of their health insurance benefits; that was not true before Bush took over the white house.

Most jobs today start at lower pay, and pay increases are fewer than before Bush took over the white house.
 
 
cicerone, I would wager that for every family in America that was low income and / or in debt with no savings, if you gave them or some of us 50 grand at the beginning of the year for doing absolutely nothing, at least half of us would have it spent in 6 months.

Much of what you mention is a problem of personal responsibility. Here we sit in the most prosperous country in the history of the world, houses are getting bigger, we are getting fatter, people are beating the door down to get here, and you can do no better than paint the dire picture you did. Furthermore, if the president was a Democrat right now, you would be singing a different tune.
 
 
Here ya go Okie.

 Bombardier could build airplanes in Mexico[/u] 
 
 
Ask and ye shall receive, Okie.

I'm going to post a link to this article, because there are about ten graphs which I'm not going to go to the effort to repost here:

 http://www.dailykos.com/story/2007/2/13/75459/5050 

Okay, here's a couple to tease ya:

US Interest payments on debt are the highest ever:
 

Household Debt Service payments are the highest percentage ever:
 

Savings rate is lowest since the Depression:
 

You say that

 
The economy keeps humming along, and Bush's tax cuts produce higher tax revenues and lower deficits
 

But that just isn't true. Our economy has been sustained by the massive levels of debt that we have accrued over the last 6 years, not by any great amount of prosperity on our part.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Cyclo, Thank you for those graphs. It contradicts everything okie tells us about our "great' economy.
 
 
From what I read, the economy, for the past 4 years, has done exceptionally well but only for the top 1/3 of the population while the bottom 2/3 has seen flat or often negative growth.
 
 
dys, As I've said, okie is probably very rich or a damn fool. There's no way he can refute the facts from Cyclo's graphs/link. He's living in la-la land where neocons have become deaf, blind, and dumb to the realities of our country's economy. I guess he's not in that group of over six million that lost their health insurance during the past six years of Bush's tenure.
 
 
EXTRA! There's now a report that says Chyrsler is going to be laying off 10,000 workers from their plants to downsize. I guess okie doesn't work in those plants. That's going to add to those that have lost their health insurance benefits, and add to the unemployment ranks.
 
 
Later that same evening, ci, I wrote a pretty long editorial (in my own words, not a cut and paste thing) about health care insurance in the US. Just as I hit submit, the dreaded Critical Error message came up. I will have to start over.
 
 
rjb, Subsequent to the report about the 10,000 getting their pink slips, the following report said they're laying off 13,000.

I've spent many minutes often to respond to some posters, and a2k just wiped it out! The best way to save yourself that trouble is to use your word processor page, then transfer it to a2k. That way, if it doesn't take, you can try again.
 
 
I was going to say something along the same lines, cicerone.
 
 
How many times have you been asked to re-enter your screen name and password? Realjohnboy and Cicererone Imposter are bad enough. Guswhatever must be a real challenge. I envy RJB.
 
 
Regularly, but my screen name pops up by clicking on the ID box.
 
 
Where is the ID box?
 
 
Do you guys have any idea what you are talking about?
 
 
I meant the Username box. ;*
 
 
gus, rjb is usually on the ball, but I can be out in left field.
 
 
 
Do you guys have any idea what you are talking about?
 

No, I don't. I am just a dumb redneck from the red clay country of Virginia.
 
 
 
Later that same evening, ci, I wrote a pretty long editorial (in my own words, not a cut and paste thing) about health care insurance in the US. Just as I hit submit, the dreaded Critical Error message came up. I will have to start over.
 

Try hitting the back button, then copy all of your text. After you get the site to work again and verify your post did not post, as I think it might sometimes even when the Critical Error appears, then just paste what you copied into a new post. That way, no need to rewrite the whole thing again.
 
 
 
dys, As I've said, okie is probably very rich or a damn fool. There's no way he can refute the facts from Cyclo's graphs/link. He's living in la-la land where neocons have become deaf, blind, and dumb to the realities of our country's economy. I guess he's not in that group of over six million that lost their health insurance during the past six years of Bush's tenure.
 

No, I'm not rich and never was. I've had to work for everything I've ever done, including paying for every dime of college.

I've been around long enough to see the difference of how people live now as compared to the 50's, and my parents told me alot about the depression. The average new single family home size in this country has grown from 983 square feet in 1950 to 2,349 square feet in 2004. And the percentage of Americans owning their home, the American dream, has grown from about 44% in 1940 to about 69% in 2005. Does that sound like we are living worse in this country?

 http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=5525283 
 http://www.census.gov/hhes/www/housing/census/historic/owner.html 
 http://www.census.gov/hhes/www/housing/hvs/annual05/ann05t13.html 

cicerone, go to England or Europe and see how people live in tiny flats, and drive roller skates down narrow roads, then come back here and tell me with a straight face how bad off we are here.
 
 
Hey, okie, Your trying to compare our life today to the fifties isn't even relative. I "lived" during the depression and all during WWII. The real comparison is between now and before Bush took over the white house; that's less than a decade ago.

We have six million more Americans without health insurance - since Bush took over the white house. We've lost over three million factory jobs since Bush took over the white house. Most middle class families lost buying power since Bush took over the white house. Most American's debt doubled since Bush took over the white house. The savings rate for Americans is the lowest since the depression. Job creation is the lowest since Hoover.

These are real comparisons that makes sense. Try to live in the "real" world of today; not half a century ago - or the 19th century.
 
 
Another "good" old American company on the move.

Hershey sends jobs south

Pennsylvania chocolate maker Hershey is moving a bigger chunk of its production to Mexico, officials said yesterday. The company said it will cut 1,500 jobs and close some plants.

Hershey currently employs about 13,000 people at 20 plants in the U.S., Canada, Mexico and Brazil. The planned cuts amount to 11.5% of the workforce.

"Whenever they move something out the country, that's not good news," said Dennis Bomberger, of Chocolate Workers Local 464, which represents Hershey workers.
 
 
hershey is packing it in in eastern ontario too. there is a hershey plant in a small community (smiths falls - about 20,000 inhabitants) nearby. plant will be closed by year-end - going to mexico.

and look at chrysler - they are hanging in the ropes.
a/t german news sources, daimler will have no choice but to bite the bullit ; that is, to "divest" itself of chrysler.
they have been trying to sell chrysler cars in europe but europeans are just not buying. the big cars (chrysler 300 etc) are gas guzzlers and the smaller cars (chrysler PT) are outdated by european standards.
apparently china's largest automotive manufacturer might be willing to pick ov the carcass and see if there is any meat left on the bones.

meanwhile, toyata is building another plant in ontario/canada.
hbg
 
 
 
Hey, okie, Your trying to compare our life today to the fifties isn't even relative.
 

Why not? You are bellyachin about how bad it is and I was simply injecting some reality into it. Jobs going out of country started long before Bush took office. It has happened, it is happening, and it will continue to happen because people in other countries are more willing to work for less. Reality, cicerone, is that this is a world market. We are not insulated from the rest of the world, and we cannot expect to live like kings here while the third world lives in mud huts. Such a mindset is not only unrealistic, but arrogant.

To continue to be the richest country in the world, we cannot rest on our laurels and act like spoiled brats, learn nothing in school, expect luxurious wages while working at McDonalds, go home from school or work and stop and buy a half dozen lottery tickets, cigarettes, and beer at the local convenience store, then pick up a movie at Blockbuster, and then go home and lounge on the couch eating expensive junk food and watching stupid movies.

Another question, where did people work before Henry Ford started assembly lines? Your posting of car companies laying off people is nothing new. What do you expect when everyone is buying Toyotas? What kind of cars do you own? Industries shift. Some scale back or go out of business, and others start up. This is nothing new. You need to look at total jobs and unemployment figures in this country instead of worrying about one particular company. The only thing that stays the same in a free market is change. Things will always change. You can count on it.
 
 
 
Things will always change. You can count on it.
 

You're right about that.

 http://www.dailykos.com/story/2007/2/16/8349/97267 

 
Prices slumped 2.7 percent in the fourth quarter compared to the fourth quarter a year earlier, according to the report from the National Association of Realtors (NAR). That's the biggest year-over-year drop on record and follows a 1.0 percent year-over-year decline in the third quarter.
 

 
the largest percentage of areas showing price declines in the 27-year history of the Realtors' price survey.
 

 
U.S. home builders started the fewest homes in nearly a decade last month, as housing starts plunged 14.3% to a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 1.408 million, the Commerce Department reported Friday.

January's rate was the lowest for housing starts since August 1997. Starts were down 37.8% compared with January 2006.
 

Where is our economy going? Downward.

The housing market is only just beginning to show the effect of hyper-inflation of home values. This year and next year, millions of families will have their adjustable rate mortgages interest rates go up significantly; a large percentage are going to lose their house to the bank. This will mean an even larger glut of houses entering a market which is already overcrowded. Prices will continue to plummet.

Over half of the jobs created in Bush's 'job expansion' have been in the housing and residential construction markets. You can say 'buhbye' to a lot of those jobs this year.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie wrote: cicerone, go to England or Europe and see how people live in tiny flats, and drive roller skates down narrow roads, then come back here and tell me with a straight face how bad off we are here.

okie, How many times do we need to spell it out for you? We're talking about what Bush did to our economy - not compared to other times (half a century ago) or other countries (all third world countries).

FYI, Japan is the second largest economy in the world. They also live in very small homes. What does that prove?
 
 
Updated:2007-02-16 13:41:53
Is GM Readying to Scoop Up Rival Chrysler?
By Megan Davies and Kevin Krolicki
Reuters
NEW YORK/DETROIT (Feb. 16) - General Motors Corp. is in preliminary talks to buy Chrysler, a source familiar with the situation said on Friday.

The talks were first reported by the trade journal Automotive News. GM and Chrysler parent DaimlerChrysler AG declined to comment on the report.

Shares of DaimlerChrysler rose in reaction to the report. GM shares slipped at first but then moved higher.

Automotive News, citing unnamed sources in Germany and the United States, said the companies were engaged in high-level talks about GM buying Chrysler Group in its entirety.

The source who spoke to Reuters, however, said it was questionable whether GM would want Chrysler's finance business, having recently sold its own finance arm.

Speculation surrounding a possible sale or spinoff of Chrysler has built since DaimlerChrysler Chief Executive Dieter Zetsche said earlier this week that all options were open for its struggling North American unit.

DaimlerChrysler shares were up 3.5 percent to $72.72 in midday trading on the New York Stock Exchange. GM shares were up 19 cents at $36.63.

Analysts have questioned whether GM would benefit from a merger with Chrysler, since both automakers are struggling with excess production capacity, sliding sales and a heavy exposure to trucks and sport utility vehicles.

David Feinman, a fund manager who specializes in distressed debt with Havens Advisors, said he doubted that GM would complete a deal to buy Chrysler.

Feinman, who does not own GM debt, said both GM and Chrysler have too many overlapping models, and any merger would have to result in even deeper cuts to jobs and output.

"If they do merge, there would have to be massive streamlining and there would be hundreds of thousands of more jobs loss," he said.

He added, "The only one to benefit would be Daimler because they would get rid of Chrysler

Regardless of the outcome. Chrysler is a dead duck. And mosty if not all it's workers will soon be among the ranks of the unemployed. That is an economic disaster in the making.
 
 
 
Regardless of the outcome. Chrysler is a dead duck. And mosty if not all it's workers will soon be among the ranks of the unemployed. That is an economic disaster in the making.
 

"what about the workers losing their jobs, you say ? ".
"let them eat cake while working at macdonalds", i say.

 
To continue to be the richest country in the world, we cannot rest on our laurels and act like spoiled brats, learn nothing in school, expect luxurious wages while working at McDonalds, go home from school or work and stop and buy a half dozen lottery tickets, cigarettes, and beer at the local convenience store, then pick up a movie at Blockbuster, and then go home and lounge on the couch eating expensive junk food and watching stupid movies. [CODE]

hbg
 
 
 
 
okie, How many times do we need to spell it out for you? We're talking about what Bush did to our economy - not compared to other times (half a century ago) or other countries (all third world countries).

FYI, Japan is the second largest economy in the world. They also live in very small homes. What does that prove?
 

So, what did Bush do that destroyed the economy? It doesn't tell anybody here anything to claim that, cicerone, you have to have something to back it up other than a company or companies scaling back or moving manufacturing overseas. I remember this happening almost every day or every week since I was old enough to follow the news in the 50's. As far as Japan, it proves they are frugal and work hard. What else do you need to know?

P. S. A comparison to the 50's is valid, because it puts things into perspective, and other countries are pertinent because this is a world market and that is the arena we now operate in. We haven't awakened to that fact yet and Democrats especially pretend they can saddle all our economy with everything imaginable and we can still compete. Also, I still remember Clinton accusing Bush I of having the worst economy since the Great Depression, which was probably the biggest lie since the Great Depression. My parents lived through that period and they were quite un-amused by the politician from Arkansas. This country does not exist in a vacuum.

By the way, I have never purchased a foreign made car, have you?
 
 
Okie said:

 
By the way, I have never purchased a foreign made car, have you?

 

Not me, I drive a Toyota. a really good american truck.
 
 
Good evening from Johnboy in Virginia. I am going to try again to post something about the topic of Health Insurance in the US. It may be a bit long. All I can say is that these are my own thoughts. There is no cutting and pasting. I may, to try to avoid the "Critical Errors," do this in two or three successive posts. You might want to wait to see the whole thing before responding. I have numbered the paragraphs for easier refenence.

1) Last week, the leader of Wal-Mart and the leader of a labor union normally battling Wal-Mart appeared together and suggested that the notion of employer-paid health insurance was dooming American competitiveness versus foreign competitors as the globalization of the economy continues.

2) I have been in a Wal-Mart twice, and this company, the largest employer in the US, is much vilified for its employment practices. The union chief who appeared with the Wal-Mart guy has also been criticized by other unions. So be it. I would prefer that this not become a Wal-Mart bashing thread, but I can't control that.

3) I am in the retail trade, and the health insurance premiums I pay as the employer amount to some $30,000 per year. That is a big chunk of money but it buys employee loyalty. And with that comes a certain longevity of employment. That leads to what I consider to be crucial in the management of any business: Institutional Memory. I watched one of my employees think on her feet the other day with a customer who came in thinking he might have a problem. But she had been here long enough. She resolved it quickly because she knew how I would have resolved it. But I digress.

4) Debate #1 Question is this: Is the Employer-based Health-Care Insurance crippling US companies' ability to compete?

5) Debate #2 Question is this: Is the rising cost of health care and the declining numbers of people (through jobs that don't offer health insurance) or through shut-downs and lay-offs going to bankrupt our system?

I realize the last two questions are worded awkwardly. I am sure someone can do better.

Anyway, that is my start at this. -rjb-
 
 
rjb, Let my try to answer your two debate items.

4) Debate #1 Question is this: Is the Employer-based Health-Care Insurance crippling US companies' ability to compete?

Yes, especially in the auto industry. Americans now have the most expensive health care system in the world, but continue to increase the number of the uninsured while costs escalate by double-digits almost every year. The cost to produce a car by the old car manufactures in the US is multiple times more expensive than the new-comers like Toyota, Honda, and other European-based companies, because of the union-contracted health plans that's been negotiated before world competition made it no longer viable. That's the reason American car manufacturers lost by both price and quality.

5) Debate #2 Question is this: Is the rising cost of health care and the declining numbers of people (through jobs that don't offer health insurance) or through shut-downs and lay-offs going to bankrupt our system.

I'm not sure about "bankrupt our system," but it's up to our government to make sure all citizens have health insurance like most developed countries. The unfortunate part of our current system is the simple fact that nobody can be turned away from the emergency room of any hospital whether they have insurance or not. That's the mose inefficient way to care for those uninsured individuals, and the hospitals costs skyrocket out of control. Those who are paying the bill also pay for the uninsured. The whole system is broken, and it's up to our government to develop a universal health care system that will reduce the cost for the uninsured by making it a one-payer system. The US now spends more on health care than any other country. It's only a matter of streamlining the system to cut out all the middle-men of the insurance companies. Doctors should be making the decision on what care each patient requires; not somebody sitting at a insurance company desk.
 
 
That makes a lot of sense, CI, but no politician is willing to touch this issue. It is too complicated to explain in 30-second sound bytes. So nothing is going to get done while the baby-boomers, many under-insured or un-insured, end up on the door steps of our hospitals in the next few years.

"Bankrupt our economy" may have seemed a bit strong. But combine that with the cost of the war and the globalization of jobs (ie, loss of jobs here) and we may come close.

By the way, I did not mean to imply that I am "against" globalization. It is going to happen because the laws of economics really can't be changed. Production will move to where the resources (labor, land, raw materials) are cheapest. We can take steps to stop explotation of, say, the labor component (child-labor, slavery) or degradation of the environment (over-grazing, clear cutting) but beyond that, steps such as tarriffs against imports or subsidies to local producers is spitting in the wind.
 
 
WHERE IS THE U.S. ECONOMY HEADING? Just ask johnboy.

Yall might find this amusing. My business gets selected with a certain amount of frequency to participate in various kinds of government surveys. Many of them are mandatory and require my participation. Most are a royal pain in the butt and I put minimal effort into actually researching the information they are asking about.
I think I get selected as often as I do because I fit some business demographic profile: bigger than a mom and pop retailer but smaller than a large chain store.

A few days ago I got a call from an economist at the Federal Reserve Bank of Richmond. She was very nice, very professional, and, when she found out I had an interest and a background in economics, she was eager to send me a letter regarding what she wanted me to do. It arrived today.

There are, as I recall 11 Federal Reserve Districts. I may be wrong about that. The 5th District includes Washington DC, Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina, South Carolina and most of West Virginia. Each month I will get a survey form which is due to be responded to by the 21st. About 190 other businesses in the District are sent the same survey. In January, 107 responded. Two or 3 days later, the Richmond District and, I assume, the other Districts, publish a "Sector Report-Retail Businesses."

I am asked, by the 21st of February to indicate how things look so far this month with a comparable period last month:
UP/DOWN/NO CHANGE in these categories:
Sales, Number of Employees, Average Wages, Shopper Traffic, Inventory.

I am asked to project how I feel things will look six months from now in those categories.

And, finally, price trends for the current month and what I think will happen over the next six months.

I have spent the afternoon pondering what buttons to push that would accurately answer those questions without a great deal of research on my part--particularly in mid month. Damn, I found data that I can use.
 
 
realjohnboy :
i read your comments with a great deal of interest.
it occured to me that when i watch CNBC next week your survey input will no doubt be reflected in the movement of shares on NYSE - it'll be either up or down or unchanged :wink:.
have a good weekend !
hbg
 
 
Buy low---Sell high.
Hi, Hamburger. I don't think I know you. Pleased to meet you.

When I talked to the lady from the Federal Reserve Bank of Richmond, I mused that the sample size was very, very small and the credibilility of the responses was suspect. She assured me that there were adjustments made to account for various things.
But, on the back of the one page newsletter from the Richmond Federal Reserve dated January 23, 2007 and headlined "Retail Sales Fall Sharply In January..." is data from "107 of 190 firms surveyed."

This is, I guess, a very quick snapshot of what might be going on in the economy. Perhaps people much smarter than us can discern a trend. I am, at this point, going to be one of the reporters of data.
 
 
rjb, I'm a skeptic when it comes to government statistics on almost everything. The worst one put out by our government is the "unemployment" rate. There is no way that our unemployment rate is below five (5) percent when the creation of new jobs doesn't meet the demand for jobs by high school and college grads, and those losing jobs in manufacturing. I see new jobs created way below the 200,000 per month needed to just meet those coming into the work force after graduating from school. I never see any report of job replacements for those losing jobs by the thousands such as the recent report of 13,000 job loss by Chrysler workers.

Sampling such a small number of retail businesses is not a good way to
determine retail sales trends. Most specialty stores have different sales trends, and one region cannot be compared to another based on many variables.

I'll remain a skeptic.
 
 
May 15, 2003

Are Retail Sales Sailing Away?
by Chad Hudson

(UNEDITED)
April retail sales were weaker than economists expected. The Commerce Department's monthly report showed April sales declined 0.1%, while retail sales excluding autos fell 0.9%. Economists were expecting an increase of 0.4% and 0.2% respectively. The 0.9% decline in ex-auto sales was the largest decline since September 2001 and one of only eleven declines greater than 0.5% over the past ten years. Part of the weakness is due to the huge gains in March when retail sales increased 2.3%, with ex-auto climbing 1.5%. There are only two months since 1992 that ex-auto retail sales grew faster than in March 2003 (April 2002 matched the 1.5% increase). The weaker sectors of the economy according to the government report were clothing and accessories stores (-3.2%) and gasoline stations (-5.9%). The decline in gasoline station sales is almost purely due to the decline in gasoline prices, the average price in April was down 5.8% from March.

On a year-over-year basis, ex-auto retail sales increased 2.8%, which is the lowest year-over-year increase since February 2002. But here again it is compared to a very strong prior period. Last year, April sales were very strong (+1.5% month-over-month). April retail data was already cloudy due to the war and the shift of Easter compared to last year. The strong comparable periods only make Aprils sales that mush more difficult to analyze.

It is interesting that the government retail sales report is almost mirror opposite of the index of monthly sales that I maintain. While the government report showed March being much stronger than April, the retailers I track had a much bigger April than March. On a year-over-year basis, total sales for my retail basket increased 8.0% vs. an increase of 5.2% in March. Wal-Mart continues to dominate retailing. Wal-Mart accounts for almost half of the total sales of the combined 22 different retailers and accounted for over 70% in the total sales growth in April.
 
 
I don't at all disagree with you, ci, about your distrust of the statistical value of this thing I am participating in with the Richmond Fed.
Having said that, I see it as a very, very early warning system that something is going wrong or right in the economy before the more substantive data comes out later on. Very flawed data, but useless? I am not so sure.

Moving right along to today's news perhaps impacting "Where Is The US Economy Heading" was a story from the Associated Press (2/18/07 2:18 pm) entitled GROCERY INDUSTRY PREPARES FOR BIRD FLU.

I hope one of yall can find that and post it here, and then we can talk about it.

The telling line for me was the 3rd paragraph from the end: "The federal government and public health agencies are urging people to stock up on nonperishable food, like canned goods and dried fruit, to ensure they have... food to eat during a pandemic." Really? Have you been urged?
 
 
 
rjb, I'm a skeptic when it comes to government statistics on almost everything. The worst one put out by our government is the "unemployment" rate. There is no way that our unemployment rate is below five (5) percent when the creation of new jobs doesn't meet the demand for jobs by high school and college grads, and those losing jobs in manufacturing. I see new jobs created way below the 200,000 per month needed to just meet those coming into the work force after graduating from school. I never see any report of job replacements for those losing jobs by the thousands such as the recent report of 13,000 job loss by Chrysler workers.

Sampling such a small number of retail businesses is not a good way to
determine retail sales trends. Most specialty stores have different sales trends, and one region cannot be compared to another based on many variables.

I'll remain a skeptic.
 

You used this point as an argument in one of our past debates, cicerone. Perhaps a dumb question, but have you considered the number of people either retiring or dying on the job, thus leaving the active work force, but are not entering the unemployed ranks?

I think the unemployment rate is more dependable than the "number of new jobs created" statistic.
 
 
 
Buy low---Sell high.
Hi, Hamburger. I don't think I know you. Pleased to meet you.

When I talked to the lady from the Federal Reserve Bank of Richmond, I mused that the sample size was very, very small and the credibilility of the responses was suspect. She assured me that there were adjustments made to account for various things.
But, on the back of the one page newsletter from the Richmond Federal Reserve dated January 23, 2007 and headlined "Retail Sales Fall Sharply In January..." is data from "107 of 190 firms surveyed."

This is, I guess, a very quick snapshot of what might be going on in the economy. Perhaps people much smarter than us can discern a trend. I am, at this point, going to be one of the reporters of data.
 

Your posts are interesting, and I believe to really put any confidence in statistics, you need to look at how they are generated. Figures don't lie, but liars will figure. I have also been in business, and I have seen effects that generally pre-date actual economic trends as published. I saw the economy beginning to falter in Clinton's last year in office, I think in part because the dot.com bubble was bursting and just a general over playing of the actual strength of the economy, and 911 had its effect on top of that. I have seen it come back steady ever since, more or less.

I intended to post in response to your medical discussion, but have not gotten around to it.
 
 
okie, Of coarse there are people retiring and dying, but the simple math tells us that creating <50,000 new jobs a month (under Bush), falls short of the 200,000 new jobs needed to meet demand.

You probably haven't noticed, but more seniors are working after age 65, because they don't have enough savings for retirement; people are living longer; and the greatest number of new jobs are in the service industry (far from middle class wages).
 
 
the canadian government just established a website "be prepared" and is doing regular advertising on TV and in newspapers to read the information and "be prepared".

i know that physicians from our local hospitals are serving on committees that are meeting in toronto to establish action plans for "what if" situations. they do not just deal with birdflu preparedness but the whole range of "what if" scenarios.
hbg

 GET PREPARED - CANADIAN GOVERNMENT WEBSITE 
 
 
here is another - rather lengthy - bulletin issued by the government of canada on how to deal with "pandemics".
hbg

 HOW TO DEAL WITH A PANDEMIC 
 
 
 
okie, Of coarse there are people retiring and dying, but the simple math tells us that creating <50,000 new jobs a month (under Bush), falls short of the 200,000 new jobs needed to meet demand.

You probably haven't noticed, but more seniors are working after age 65, because they don't have enough savings for retirement; people are living longer; and the greatest number of new jobs are in the service industry (far from middle class wages).
 

I am not familiar with employment statistics, but something tells me your reasoning is flawed in a big way somehow. I could not seem to find good statistics on people that retire each month but the following site gives the fact that there are 18.4 million people between the ages of 65 and 74. Whether all of those were in the work force at 65, probably not, but the vast majority were likely in the work force sometime in their lives, so they become part of the statistics at some point, it really doesn't matter when. So if you took them all, that is 153,000 people retiring each and every month if they retired at age 65. And if they did not, they would retire later, and thus would eventually be part of the statistics. This does not include the numbers of people dying or being disabled and thus leaving the work force earlier.

So your logic that just because 200,000 people are entering the work force each month, and only 50,000 new jobs are created, then you claim the unemployment statistics have to be grossly wrong, that somehow the bureaucrats are lying big time. Well, their statistics are far from perfect but I doubt they are that bad. I think you are overlooking many factors here, one of which might be that many people are simply moving into existing jobs that are vacated by retirement and other factors. Obviously, I am speaking as someone unfamiliar with what goes into the numbers, but it strikes me that you are making unwarranted claims here, as you did in our previous arguments.

You said the simple math supports your claims, so if you have the simple math, I would be glad to see it.
 
 
okie, There is nothing that will convince you that Bush has been bad for our economy, and that the unemployment stats put out by the feds are unreliable.

FACT: Job creation under Bush has been one of the worst since Hoover.
 
 
 http://jec.senate.gov/Documents/Releases/jan07unemploymentrel.pdf 
 
 
Here's the overall participation rate, and it doesn't seem to support such a large change in estimate of the job growth needed to hold unemployment steady (to two-thirds of its previous value):
 

Participation has been increasing since the trough in January 2005, not decreasing (this graph ends at December 2005, but more recent participation figures do not alter the picture - see below). Furthermore, the scale of the graph is deceptive and the overall variation is small. Participation is 66.8% in January 1995 at the beginning of the graph, and 66.2% for the latest available observation for September 2006, only a.6% difference. The peak is 67.3% in January 2000, and the trough is 65.8% in January 2005. Here's a longer term view:

Labor Force Participation Rate
 

In addition, participation rates for workers over age 55 have been steadily increasing over the last ten to fifteen years offsetting some of the changes due to the changing demographic composition of the labor force toward older workers. See Cyclical and Long-Term Labor Force Participation Rate Changes by Gender, Age, and Education or the data at the BLS web site for more.
 
 
WILLIAM RODGERS, Former Chief Economist, Labor Department: Well, as you said, the number of new jobs over this last month came in well below what private-sector forecasters had anticipated, but also, Richard Friedman, my colleague from Harvard and I, we've been studying this labor market since the beginning of the recovery, as defined by the National Bureau of Economic Research, a nonpartisan think-tank out of Cambridge, Massachusetts.

And where they define the beginning of the recovery is November 2001. And when you do that, what you find is that we've only been averaging a little around 100,000 new jobs per month, clearly not enough to be able to absorb those people who have lost their jobs over the recovery.

Or in this past month, where we saw the unemployment rate stay still, but what happened was, people were leaving the labor force because they were having difficulty finding jobs. Again, we need to have 150,000 new jobs, roughly, just to keep our heads above water.

And also, we need to be well above that to be able to absorb young minorities, young people who have graduated from college. And so, again, this report didn't surprise me, because it's consistent with the trends that we've seen since the beginning of this recovery.

And now my colleague from the Hudson Institute, she's going to want to start writing history as beginning in January 2003, the beginning of the tax cuts. And even if you do that, you're still looking at an average job growth per month of about 118,000 new jobs per month, again, well below what we need to really extend opportunity broadly throughout this society.
 
 
 
Good evening from Johnboy in Virginia. I am going to try again to post something about the topic of Health Insurance in the US. It may be a bit long. All I can say is that these are my own thoughts. There is no cutting and pasting. I may, to try to avoid the "Critical Errors," do this in two or three successive posts. You might want to wait to see the whole thing before responding. I have numbered the paragraphs for easier refenence.

1) Last week, the leader of Wal-Mart and the leader of a labor union normally battling Wal-Mart appeared together and suggested that the notion of employer-paid health insurance was dooming American competitiveness versus foreign competitors as the globalization of the economy continues.
 

They have a point. By saddling employers with a personal expense is merely incorporating the cost of personal medical care into the pricing of the products sold by those employers. After all, we do not expect employers to pay for the food we buy or the tires we put on our car. If employers had to pay for everything else we bought for ourselves, can you imagine the effects on business and on the cost of their products? You essentially remove or seriously dampen the benefits you receive from a free enterprise system, when you skew the free market or saddle it with inappropriate burdens.

 
2) I have been in a Wal-Mart twice, and this company, the largest employer in the US, is much vilified for its employment practices. The union chief who appeared with the Wal-Mart guy has also been criticized by other unions. So be it. I would prefer that this not become a Wal-Mart bashing thread, but I can't control that.
 

Walmart has grown into the company it is because people like shopping at Walmart. And nobody has a gun held to their head to make them work at Walmart.

 
3) I am in the retail trade, and the health insurance premiums I pay as the employer amount to some $30,000 per year. That is a big chunk of money but it buys employee loyalty. And with that comes a certain longevity of employment. That leads to what I consider to be crucial in the management of any business: Institutional Memory. I watched one of my employees think on her feet the other day with a customer who came in thinking he might have a problem. But she had been here long enough. She resolved it quickly because she knew how I would have resolved it. But I digress.
 

Somehow, we've gotten ourselves into the mindset that employers have to buy health insurance, when it should never have progressed to that. Do your employees expect you to buy their auto insurance?

 
4) Debate #1 Question is this: Is the Employer-based Health-Care Insurance crippling US companies' ability to compete?
 

I think the answer is obviously yes.

 
5) Debate #2 Question is this: Is the rising cost of health care and the declining numbers of people (through jobs that don't offer health insurance) or through shut-downs and lay-offs going to bankrupt our system?

I realize the last two questions are worded awkwardly. I am sure someone can do better.

Anyway, that is my start at this. -rjb-
 

Ultimately I think we will go one of two ways, that of government health care, or measures to bring competitive pricing back into the system, which requires the people pay for it themselves. Since I am for freedom and as much personal responsibility as possible, I advocate the latter, while realizing the very poor will need some kind of extra measures to help them with insurance and medical care.

1. As Bush has proposed, we need serious tort reform, which malpractice lawyers seriously oppose, example Democrat John Edwards.

2. We need to give large tax deductions for people purchasing their own health insurance and their own medical care.

3. Perhaps for those people that are so poor or without jobs, perhaps a voucher or something of some sort needs to be set up for people to purchase their own catastrophic health insurance and minor medical care. We have Medicaid now, do we not, for the very poor? Perhaps keep some form of that?

Bottom line, we should want the people that receive the care to pay for the care or to pay for the insurance that pays for the care. This injects competition, which brings more quality, accountability, and efficiency into the system. I assume we all like quality, accountability, and efficiency.

I have paid my own care for many years, by purchasing a good catastrophic insurance plan, and paying for minor medical visits out of my own pocket. Therefore, I choose the doctor I want, and I only go when I am sick with more than a runny nose. When bills arrive, I personally review them, and have personally eliminated more than a thousand dollars or so, by finding charges for services that did not occur, and by offering to pay early and receiving a discount. I have personally experienced more quality, accountability, and efficiency, because of paying for my own health care, either directly or through my insurance policy.
 
 
 
Here's the overall participation rate, and it doesn't seem to support such a large change in estimate of the job growth needed to hold unemployment steady (to two-thirds of its previous value):
 

cicerone, take the labor force participation rate of about 2/3 and apply it to the 153,000, and you have 100,000 of your number of people needing jobs already accounted for, just to replace the people retiring from existing jobs each and every month. I wouldn't think these jobs would be classified as new jobs. If they are, then we really do have some screwed up figures for job creation.

The 100,000 jobs mentioned above does not even count the number of people dying before they retire. If I thought it was interesting enough or important enough, I would research it. Bottom line, you need to retract some of your statements about the unemployment rate being so dead wrong.

In one of your posts, a quote says:
"Or in this past month, where we saw the unemployment rate stay still, but what happened was, people were leaving the labor force because they were having difficulty finding jobs."
Where is the evidence for this statement, cicerone? Is this just someone's opinion or is it based on anything?

P.S. Another reason I think the unemployment figures are not so wrong, is that I do not currently know anyone personally that is unemployed. I would count maybe a couple dozen people I am talking about that I know well or are friends. I know more people than that but maybe not well enough to know their current situation. I certainly could not have said that I didn't know anyone unemployed at many points in the past. Virtually everyone I know is doing fairly well, economically. None of them rich, but they all live in decent houses, have enough food, transportation, decent clothes, and are paying their bills as far as I know.
 
 
okie, WILLIAM RODGERS, Former Chief Economist of the Labor Department wrote that article. If you think you have better info than the Former Chief Economist, please show it to us.

Your assumption that you know more than the Chief Economist shows how ignorant you are about the US labor.
 
 
Well, I may be somewhat ignorant of how their statistics are gathered and what they mean, but I also know that not all economists agree.

 http://www.pbs.org/newshour/bb/business/july-dec06/jobs_10-06.html 

That interview shows alot of personal opinions based on chosen statistics, cicerone. Proving that if you wish to be a pessimist, you can always find a statistic somewhere to support your view, and vice versa. Bottom line, unemployment remains at fairly low levels, and the economy is doing fairly well, much better than most places in the world. After all, people are beating the door down trying to get here.

And when I look at the friends and acquaintances of mine, they are doing better now than they have ever done in my entire lifetime. I want to be optimistic, that is my tendency, and I get real tired of people bellyachin, when those same people are eating steak, driving new cars, and living in nice homes. And if someone suffers misfortune, there is usually help available, but for many people that are destitute, it is because of irresponsiblie behavior and poor choices. Responsible people are not necessarily rich, but virtually all live a fairly comfortable life.
 
 
I quite agree that the economy is doing quite well (for some) and not so well for others. I live in a very middle class working neighborhood of teachers, firemen, policemen, retired folks etc. They are not doing so well and have not kept up with increasing costs of things like utilites, health insurance, fuel prices, food prices etc. Personally the stock market has done just fine for me and my income continues to improve but I don't quite make the equation that because i am doing ok most others (except the lazy ones) are also doing well.
 
 
okie, Quit attacking the messenger and challenge his opinion with evidence that can be supported by anything but your own opinion.

William Rodgers is one of the few people in the US who really understands the American labor situation - from first hand knowledge.

Your's is based on - oh yeah, your opinion.
 
 
I didn't attack the messenger. I simply pointed out there is a wide disagreement between the opinions of economists. Unfortunately, they mix politics with their views. And I seriously doubt that William Rodgers is one of the few people in the entire country that understand the labor market. I suspect there are hundreds, if not thousands of economists that study this all the time, and I fail to see why he has a lock on all the knowledge. That has to be one of your biggest whoppers, ci. If you read my link, you would have to admit the other person did not agree with him much, and she was an economist as well.
 
 
There are economists and there are those that have worked in the Labor Department. Guess which individual has more credibility?
 
 
okie, Name one economist that disagrees with William Rodgers' article posted above.
 
 
 
" for many people that are destitute, it is because of irresponsiblie behavior and poor choices. Responsible people are not necessarily rich, but virtually all live a fairly comfortable life.
 

I am not, okie, an agumentative person. I read your last few interactions with ci. But then I read this. Are you serious?
 
 
I am totally serious. No need to be politically correct here on this forum. I said, "for many people that are destitute," I did not say "for all people that are destitute." From what little I have gathered about the really destitute, I am talking about homeless mainly, they either have mental problems, drug problems, or alchohol problems. Obviously not all, but a fairly high percentage, a much higher percentage than exists in the general population. Hopefully, you would not wish to call this into question, as I think this is pretty much the fact and can be backed up with statistics if you require it. To break it down further, I believe drug problems and alchohol problems are a personal choice, at least at the outset.
 
 
okie, You are misinformed. Those with drug, alcohol or psyhological problems are illnesses like diabetes or cancer. It's not because those people are "lazy," make poor choices, or are irresponsible.

Please get informed about the subject before you make statements that are untrue.
 
 
cicerone, I think you are kidding but I can't be sure of it on this forum? Mental problems, I agree. Notice I did not include that, and I advocate helping those people as much as is needed.

Alcoholism and drug problems, no, I think you must be kidding? Either that or you really are way out in left field. Maybe I should also ask you if shoplifters have a disease too? Do burglars have a disease?
 
 
 
okie, Name one economist that disagrees with William Rodgers' article posted above.
 

Perhaps we should instead go back to this statement of Rogers:
"Or in this past month, where we saw the unemployment rate stay still, but what happened was, people were leaving the labor force because they were having difficulty finding jobs."

My question to you is, what does Rogers claim these people are doing? My personal guess is based on the people I know, which often includes one spouse in a two parent family has either quit a job or gotten laid off, and simply decided not to work for a while for a number of reasons. Reasons range from, they don't need the money, or its better to stay home with the kids by the time you pay for child care, or they quit to have a child, or they decided to retire..... maybe again. I know people that retired for a while, got tired of sitting around, and went back to work, but then retire again for various and sundry reasons. I think it is over simplifying the situation to say they all quit looking for work because they had difficulty finding jobs.

One thing most economists do have in common, is that they all sort of have a disconnect from the real world and what we out here really think. One thing I have always noticed is that many people think the economy is terrible and the future looks terrible, but when you ask them how they are doing and their friends are doing, the picture becomes much brighter. So I go back to my optimistic view of things. Overall, we are living pretty luxurious here.
 
 
That's always true irregardless of the time period of any developed economy. You must understand his opinion as a whole - which includes that one statement. Good try, but not coupie doll.
 
 
True, but there are such things as cycles in regard to demographics and many other things that impact the statistics.
 
 
okie, The demographics of the US is growing; the baby boomers will be retiring in droves during the next ten to fifteen years.

The US is fortunate in that our age group distribution is better than most developed countries (workers vs retirees).

These simple truths tell us that the demand for jobs in the US increase for the short-term and long-term.

What's your point?
 
 
Unless I've missed the bombshell, ci, I still have not seen you post any hard evidence that the unemployment numbers are blatantly wrong. You only post speculation, but that doesn't prove a thing.
 
 
Weak Jobs Growth

Before we go any further, here are some definitions to help clarify the Bureau of Labor Statistics terminology:

Unemployed persons. All persons who: 1) had no employment during the reference week; 2) were available for work, except for temporary illness; and 3) had made specific efforts, such as contacting employers, to find employment sometime during the 4-week period ending with the reference week.

Participation rate. This represents the proportion of the population that is in the labor force

The unemployment rate often quoted in the financial press only includes people who have looked for work in the past 4 weeks. So, if somebody hasn't looked for work, they're not included.
 
 
Good evening to Okie and ci, and that is about the population here.

Economic statistics are pretty amusing in that you can kind of make them prove anything.

If yall have the time, Google in "US unemployment layoffs 2006" and, lo and behold, okie will be happy. Mass layoffs hit a 10 year or so low, according to the Bureau of Labor Statistics.

But Mass Layoffs apply to companies with 50 or more employees. And, as near as I can tell the numbers do not include the fairly highly paid workers in, say, the auto industry who were paid to disappear.

They will not show up in the unemployed/underemployed statistics for awhile. I suspect that when they do come back in, they will working for less pay and with fewer benefits.

Finally, I thought I heard today that by 2018, according to some government (?) study one out of 5 dollars in our GDP will go for health care. And insurance premiums betwixt now and then will rise at 6% per year. I may have my numbers wrong there. If so, please tell me.

Thank you. -johnboy-
 
 
 
The unemployment rate often quoted in the financial press only includes people who have looked for work in the past 4 weeks. So, if somebody hasn't looked for work, they're not included.
 

Is that drastically different than it has always been? I guess my point is, maybe the apple isn't perfect, but as long as we are comparing apples to apples, then it tells us something credible in comparison to the past. If you try to alter the current apple into something more perfect, or bias the current apple, you end up comparing apples to oranges, which is not as credible. Cicerone, I have always known these statistics are not perfect, but if you could create something better to totally replace it, they would abandon this statistic, and that isn't going to happen soon.

And good points, rjb, also isn't it true that small business is growing in terms of percentage of employees accounted for in this country, so perhaps the impact on mass layoff statistics is affected that way. Good points about company layoffs. I had the same experience, and most got nice severance packages, and if old enough, nice golden parachutes, so they retired or at least took long vacations before picking up another occupation or job.

I think we are in danger of bankrupting the country with healthcare.
 
 
okie, No, it doesn't. It doesn't count the people actually looking for work beyond that four week period, and that number changes dramatically during periods of less new jobs - like the past six years of Bush's tenure. Bush's job creation is the worst since Hoover. Think about the impact of that to the unemployed ranks.

Now that I've provided the labor departments definition of the unemployed, you want me to develop a stats? Get real.
 
 
So you are going to count spouses that decided to stay home with the kids, and the people that have enough money to take a year off, and the people that don't need to work, and so on, cicerone? Again, show me where the unemployment statistics are counting differently than they once did, and when did it change?

If you guys are going to once again try to make the case that this is the worst economy since Hoover, I would suggest you go see a shrink.

Sorry about the sarcasm, but I thought that was a nice line, and you deserve it.  
 
 
Well, now... this doesn't look good at all... for the doomsayers -

 
 U.S. Leading Economic Indicators Index Rises 0.1% 

By Bob Willis

Feb. 21 (Bloomberg) -- A closely watched gauge of the future direction of the U.S. economy rose for a second month in January, the first back-to-back gain in a year, lifted by an increase in a measure of consumer sentiment.

The Conference Board's index of leading economic indicators rose 0.1 percent after a 0.6 percent gain in December that was twice as large as previously reported, the New York-based group said today. The gauge points to the direction of the economy over the next three to six months.

An expanding job market and higher stock prices are stoking consumer spending and helping the nation overcome the housing slump. The rise in the leading index bears out Federal Reserve Chairman Ben S. Bernanke's forecasts for ``sustainable'' growth.

``There is still plenty of life left in the economy,'' said Stuart Hoffman, chief economist at PNC Financial Services Group in Pittsburgh. ``It's a clear sign it's not headed into a downturn, that economic growth will remain solid.''

A separate report from the Commerce Department today showed consumer prices increased more than forecast in January. The consumer-price index rose 0.2 percent after a 0.4 percent gain in December. Excluding food and energy, prices rose 0.3 percent, the most since June of last year.

Economists projected the leading index would rise 0.2 percent, according to the median of 57 estimates in a Bloomberg News survey. Forecasts ranged from a decline of 0.1 percent to a rise of 0.4 percent.

Four of 10 components of the index of leading economic indicators had a positive effect on the overall number.

Jobless Claims

Money supply, consumer expectations for the next six months, initial jobless claims and stock prices boosted the index.

A decline in the factory workweek, falling building permits, a negative differential between shorter and longer-term interest rates, and faster supplier deliveries weighed the index down.

An expanding job market and rising wages are encouraging Americans to keep up the spending that accounts for two-thirds of the economy.

``Consumer spending continues to be the mainstay of the current expansion,'' Bernanke said in congressional testimony last week.

Weekly initial jobless claims averaged 305,000 in January, down from 318,000 in December, as unemployment hovered near a five-year low. The economy generated an average of 171,000 jobs a month between November and January, up from 164,000 in the prior three months.

The Reuters/University of Michigan gauge of consumer expectations for the next six months rose to 87.6 at the end of January, the highest since December 2004.

Share Prices

Consumer sentiment has also been lifted by gains in stock prices. The Standard & Poor's 500 Index rose 1.4 percent in January, extending its 14 percent gain in 2006.

Consumers are helping the economy maintain its expansion in the face of the worst housing slump in 15 years and cutbacks among manufacturers including Ford Motor Co. and General Motors Corp.

Building permits declined 2.8 percent to a 1.568 million annual pace in January, the government reported Feb. 16. That followed a 6.6 percent gain in December that was the first rise in 11 months.

``The weakness in housing market activity and the slower appreciation of house prices do not seem to have spilled over to any significant extent to other sectors of the economy,'' Bernanke said last week.

Manufacturing was also a source of weakness. The factory workweek fell to 40.8 hours in January, the lowest since December 2005, from 41 in December, according to the government payroll report for last month.

Growth Forecast

Economic growth may accelerate to a 2.9 percent pace by the third quarter of this year from the first quarter's expected 2.5 percent pace, according to the median forecast of economists surveyed by Bloomberg News the first week of February.

Richard Notebaert, chief executive of Denver-based Qwest Communications International Inc., is among executives forecasting steady economic growth this year.

``I think it is going to be a pretty steady state. I don't expect any major swings this year,'' he said Feb. 15 in Naples, Florida, where he was attending the Business Council meeting.

The Conference Board's index of coincident indicators, a gauge of current economic activity, rose 0.1 percent in January after a 0.2 percent rise in December. The index tracks payrolls, incomes, sales and projections.

The gauge of lagging indicators fell 0.1 percent following a 0.8 percent increase. The index measures business lending, length of unemployment, service prices and ratios of labor costs, inventories and consumer credit.
 

Sidebar:  An amusing flashback 

No wonder the doomsayers are (still) all bent outta shape (yet again); there hasn't been much going their way for years. Frustration and disappointment will do that to ya. Almost feel sorry for 'em.
 
 
timber, We were talking about the "unemployment rate." That you can cut and paste an article that shows that our economy looks healthy is good, but that doesn't change the fact that under Bush, job creation has been the worst since Hoover.

Most of us know that the US productivity rate has been healthy, but the average worker did not reap the benefits of those production increases.
Buying power for the middle class has been dropping, and more families lost health insurance coverage. Those are the facts under Bush Jr.

What makes you think I'm a "doomsayer?" I only provide personal opinion that is usually backed by evidence provided by the leading financial articles and our government.

I and my family have done very well, thank you. Our annual income in retirement is above the national average of per capita income - including San Jose which is one of the highest in the country.

BTW, FYI, economists future prognostications about our economy is not always correct. You're better off reading tea leaves.
 
 
Deja Vu, c. i. - you and I have been at this discussion for how many years now? I'think the economy's performance over those years speaks for itself.
 
 
The American economy is on acid
 
 
 
Deja Vu, c. i. - you and I have been at this discussion for how many years now? I'think the economy's performance over those years speaks for itself.
 

Sure - great for some at the top, flat for everyone else, 3 trillion extra dollars in debt for us all.

The average national savings rate is negative; lowest since the depression. That should tell you something about our economy, Timber.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Naw, timber is a Bush supporter, and he only sees the good stuff; blind to the realities.
 
 
Not so much a 'Bush Supporter", c. i. ; more like diametrically opposed to every Democrat-proposed economic, social, and defense initiative proposed over the past generation or so. The Republican platform hardly has been my ideal over those years, it merely has been the least objectionable of 2 unsatisfactory alternatives... Hobson's Choice, sorta.

As for the "good stuff" and the "realities", well, the numbers speak for themselves, as does my track record on these boards pertaining to discussions of the economy's progress.
 
 
 
Not so much a 'Bush Supporter", c. i. ; more like diametrically opposed to every Democrat-proposed economic, social, and defense initiative proposed over the past generation or so. The Republican platform hardly has been my ideal over those years, it merely has been the least objectionable of 2 unsatisfactory alternatives.

As for the "good stuff" and the "realities", well, the numbers speak for themselves, as does my track record on these boards pertaining to discussions of the economy's progress.
 

Which numbers 'speak for themselves,' Timber?

You don't think that the other numbers - the ones which make the economy look not so good - speak for themselves as well?

Cycloptichorn
 
 
I've never contended "all was rosy", Cyc - just that things ain't bad at all, and that things are in particular never have been anywhere near as bad as those afflicted with the Librul Disease and/or Bush Derangement Syndrome purport them to be.
 
 
timber, Your perceptions are way off target.
 
 
 
.... The first thing Bartels did was break down economic performance by income class. The unsurprising result is shown in the chart on the right.

......
 

What chart on the right, cicerone?

There are several big problems with your arguments here about Democrats are all great and Republicans are lousy.

Not all presidents have control of Congress, and their programs are not necessarily instituted.

When programs are instituted, perhaps Congress is either to blame or deserve credit. For example, I credit much of the budgeting success and other important initiatives, such as welfare reform, clearly was greatly influenced by a Republican Congress during the 90's.

Also, the economy does not turn on a dime, and also is obviously cyclical and has many influences beyond the control of a president. Even when a president does influence the economy, there may be small immediate impacts, but some impacts take years to experience the full effects. Some policies were instituted by a previous president, and when they begin to bear fruit, the next president that had nothing to do with it, can take credit for it, and of course they always take credit for anything positive.

Lastly, cicerone, unless you can point to a particular policy, such as a tax rate change or incentives instituted as part of a president's policy that can be shown to have impacted the indicators that you cite, this debate is rather pointless. You can cherry pick your statistics to show what you wish them to show, just as I can, and the argument will never be solved. I should remind you too that I have asked several questions that you haven't answered. You just go on your merry way pasting the stuff you must have archived.
 
 
That doesn't matter; the facts speak for themselves. You don't need a graph to translate the words.
 
 
okie, If you want to "attack" anything, attack the facts as delineated in the article, and show evidence or proof for what you claim.
 
 
Thanks to McG's new thread on European poverty, I did a search for poverty in America, and found the following:

Posted on Thu, Feb. 22, 2007

U.S. economy leaving record numbers in severe poverty
By Tony Pugh

McClatchy Newspapers

(MCT)

WASHINGTON - The percentage of poor Americans who are living in severe poverty has reached a 32-year high, millions of working Americans are falling closer to the poverty line and the gulf between the nation's "haves" and "have-nots" continues to widen.

A McClatchy Newspapers analysis of 2005 census figures, the latest available, found that nearly 16 million Americans are living in deep or severe poverty. A family of four with two children and an annual income of less than $9,903 - half the federal poverty line - was considered severely poor in 2005. So were individuals who made less than $5,080 a year.

The McClatchy analysis found that the number of severely poor Americans grew by 26 percent from 2000 to 2005. That's 56 percent faster than the overall poverty population grew in the same period. McClatchy's review also found statistically significant increases in the percentage of the population in severe poverty in 65 of 215 large U.S. counties, and similar increases in 28 states. The review also suggested that the rise in severely poor residents isn't confined to large urban counties but extends to suburban and rural areas.

The plight of the severely poor is a distressing sidebar to an unusual economic expansion. Worker productivity has increased dramatically since the brief recession of 2001, but wages and job growth have lagged behind. At the same time, the share of national income going to corporate profits has dwarfed the amount going to wages and salaries. That helps explain why the median household income of working-age families, adjusted for inflation, has fallen for five straight years.

These and other factors have helped push 43 percent of the nation's 37 million poor people into deep poverty - the highest rate since at least 1975.

The share of poor Americans in deep poverty has climbed slowly but steadily over the last three decades. But since 2000, the number of severely poor has grown "more than any other segment of the population," according to a recent study in the American Journal of Preventive Medicine.

"That was the exact opposite of what we anticipated when we began," said Dr. Steven Woolf of Virginia Commonwealth University, who co-authored the study. "We're not seeing as much moderate poverty as a proportion of the population. What we're seeing is a dramatic growth of severe poverty."

The growth spurt, which leveled off in 2005, in part reflects how hard it is for low-skilled workers to earn their way out of poverty in an unstable job market that favors skilled and educated workers. It also suggests that social programs aren't as effective as they once were at catching those who fall into economic despair.

About one in three severely poor people are under age 17, and nearly two out of three are female. Female-headed families with children account for a large share of the severely poor.

Nearly two out of three people (10.3 million) in severe poverty are white, but blacks (4.3 million) and Hispanics of any race (3.7 million) make up disproportionate shares. Blacks are nearly three times as likely as non-Hispanic whites to be in deep poverty, while Hispanics are roughly twice as likely.

Washington, D.C., the nation's capital, has a higher concentration of severely poor people - 10.8 percent in 2005 - than any of the 50 states, topping even hurricane-ravaged Mississippi and Louisiana, with 9.3 percent and 8.3 percent, respectively. Nearly six of 10 poor District residents are in extreme poverty.
 
 
Who knows, cicerone, I could be poverty stricken before I kick the bucket, the way they re-define the characteristics of poverty anymore.

 http://www.fullemployment.org/Understanding%20Poverty%20in%20America.pdf 

I happen to know a few people classified below the poverty line right now, and if you care to know anything about it, I could explain why, and also explain to you that they enjoy most of the modern comforts that everybody does.
 
 
okie, I'm sure there are as many stories behind the poverty as there are people in that group. What is important is the simple fact that more families have fallen into extreme poverty during Bush's presidency. We see the homeless in our city in the middle of Silicon Valley where many homes now cost over one million.

Don't knock yourself out to figure it out; it's probably beyond your comprehension level.
 
 
Yes, you're probably right. I am too dumb, after all, I am a stupid hick, an okie. Only statiticians have the right answers, only certain statistics that is, yours, right? And did you even read my link? Which I agree with wholeheartedly, including the fact that people under the poverty line are living better than they used to, and in my opinion they may live better than rich people did 50 years ago, certainly 100 years ago.

This generation is a bunch of cry babies, cicerone, if you want my honest opinion. And if worked minimum wage, I would find a way to get ahead, bank on it. If I had to do without a telephone or a car, I would, plus other things. Face it, even many bums carry around cell phones these days.
 
 
okie, you are dumber than you claim. Statistics only classifies groups into different scales of income and living standards. That's inclusive of all the stories behind the rich, middle class and the poor, and how they "got there."

If you want to challenge those statistics, show us what you have done to survey the people in our economy to show how and why those statistics are wrong. Not some babble about you know some people...

okie wrote: This generation is a bunch of cry babies, cicerone, if you want my honest opinion. And if worked minimum wage, I would find a way to get ahead, bank on it. If I had to do without a telephone or a car, I would, plus other things. Face it, even many bums carry around cell phones these days.

Not all are crybabies, okie. Some have made it; I have met many in my travels - all over the world, and in my own family (I've told this story often on Abuzz and on a2k). We're talking about "trends" here for the general population. Do you understand the concept?
 
 
 
Which I agree with wholeheartedly, including the fact that people under the poverty line are living better than they used to, and in my opinion they may live better than rich people did 50 years ago, certainly 100 years ago.
 

What you are talking about are technological contrivances, entertainments, and conveniences; these things are nice, but they aren't life.

You know what people who are living under the poverty line don't have? Security. They are one car accident or broken arm or 'downsized division' away from being on the street. This leads to all sorts of problems for themselves, their children, and society as a whole.

NO poor person lives better than ANY rich person did 50 years ago. It's a ridiculous thing to say, because that rich person has immense security in his life. The fact that the poor guy has color tv and a microwave doesn't change this fact.

 
Face it, even many bums carry around cell phones these days.
 

This is a ridiculous thing to say. We have a lot of bums in San Fran; something to do with the warm weather and abundant homeless shelters. I've never seen a single one with a cell phone, ever, and I see dozens if not hundreds of homeless people on a daily basis.

You seem to have a real misconception of the difference between poverty - poor - destitute. Bums and the homeless are destitute.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie sees one homeless with a cellphone and translates that into something ridiculous! Makes one wonder how he knows they guy or girl was homeless. Did he ask or just another one of his useless assumptions?
 
 
in canada, homeless women are often given older model cellphones by social services.
since the 911 feature works even when one has not signed up for cellphone service, it allows the women to call for help if needed - quite a reasonable thing to do rather than throwing the phones into the garbage bin imo.
hbg
 
 
Well, we weren't really talking about homeless, but on that subject, a large percentage are because of drug abuse, alcoholism, or mental illness.

cicerone and cyclops, have you ever heard of the poor houses of the past? Surely you have. And hopefully you won't claim that was a better time to go back to.
 
 
 
Well, we weren't really talking about homeless, but on that subject, a large percentage are because of drug abuse, alcoholism, or mental illness.

cicerone and cyclops, have you ever heard of the poor houses of the past? Surely you have. And hopefully you won't claim that was a better time to go back to.
 

I'm not at all sure how this relates to our current discussion.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie attempts at diversionary tactics that doesn't work. He needs to grow up.
 
 
We have to give okie credit for a good imagination.
 
 
 
Well, we weren't really talking about homeless, but on that subject, a large percentage are because of drug abuse, alcoholism, or mental illness.
 

Forgot - do you have stats on this being the cause of their homelessness? Or is this one of those percentages which is sort of made up on the spot?

You didn't respond to my point about Security being a critical factor for quality of life, Okie. Why not?

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie wrote: Quote:
Well, we weren't really talking about homeless, but on that subject, a large percentage are because of drug abuse, alcoholism, or mental illness.

okie just shows more ignorance about "drug abuse, alcoholism or mental illness." FYI, that's not a choice or desire; it was a mistake for many, but once hooked, they had no control as with any other disease. Some (very few who try it) do not get hooked. Mental illness strikes at least one percent (minimum) of the population - no matter what gender, race, class or country.
 
 
 
Mental illness strikes at least one percent (minimum) of the population - no matter what gender, race, class or country
 

I would think it is a disease (yes a disease--not a personal choice) much higher than 1%
 
 
 
also isn't it true that small business is growing in terms of percentage of employees accounted for in this country, so perhaps the impact on mass layoff statistics is affected that way.
 

Forgive me for interrupting ci and okie in the middle of assaulting each other. Your comment above, okie, may be true. I know of no way to prove it or disprove it. I can say that some 50 or 70% of small businesses fail within a year or two.

Can they afford to pay above minimum wages, much less provide health care benefits, vacation pay, sick leave pay? Probably not. But, okie, this is a sector of our economy that is seen to be growing. And we are supposed to get excited about that?

There is this big bubble in the middle, the so called middle class, who bought stuff like houses and anything else they could put on their credit cards. All of that debt, built on the illussion that great times would go on forever, is going to come crashing down.

And I haven't even mentioned the Whole Food Markets Inc. thing.
 
 
I borrowed the following from nimh's thread:

Quote:
America's hungry? They're just suffering from "low food security"

What do you call that phenomenon you feel when you need something to eat but can't afford to put any food on the table? We might call it "hungry," but then, we're not Bush administration officials who'd rather not acknowledge that the number of "hungry" people in America has increased over the last five years of "compassionate conservatism."

As the Washington Post reports this morning, Bush's Agriculture Department has struck the word "hungry" from its annual report on what it's now calling "food security."

The report measures the number of Americans who can't afford to put food on their table during at least some period of the year. The Agriculture Department's Mark Nord says "hungry" is "not a scientifically accurate term for the specific phenomenon being measured" in the report. Thus, people formerly described as suffering "food insecurity without hunger" -- meaning that they'll probably get something to eat, somehow -- and "food insecurity with hunger" -- meaning that they'll go without food for stretches of time -- shall henceforth be known as sufferers of "low food security" and "very low food security."

Oh, and then there's this. The hunger/food insecurity report usually appears in October. This year's version -- the fifth straight to show an increase in the number of hungry Americans -- was held for release until after last week's election.
 
 
 
 
Well, we weren't really talking about homeless, but on that subject, a large percentage are because of drug abuse, alcoholism, or mental illness.
 

Forgot - do you have stats on this being the cause of their homelessness? Or is this one of those percentages which is sort of made up on the spot?

You didn't respond to my point about Security being a critical factor for quality of life, Okie. Why not?

Cycloptichorn
 

I did not make it up, obviously. It is something most people would have heard by now, haven't you? Or simply walk through an area where homeless are sitting around and you could figure it out. I never quoted a percentage. I simply said a large percentage. This thread isn't really about homelessness, but if you haven't yet figured out what the homeless problem is about, you could look it up. If you can find statistics disproving my point, be my guest. I suppose if I said the sun came up in the east, you would accuse me of making it up?

About security, you have a point, but security is only one facet of the conveniences of modern life. However, are there more rich people now than 50 or 100 years ago, percentage wise? I could look it up, but don't feel like it now, but I suspect the percentage has grown.
 
 
okie, What in the world are you trying to say about drug abuse, alcoholism and the mentally ill?
 
 
 
 
also isn't it true that small business is growing in terms of percentage of employees accounted for in this country, so perhaps the impact on mass layoff statistics is affected that way.
 

Forgive me for interrupting ci and okie in the middle of assaulting each other. Your comment above, okie, may be true. I know of no way to prove it or disprove it. I can say that some 50 or 70% of small businesses fail within a year or two.

Can they afford to pay above minimum wages, much less provide health care benefits, vacation pay, sick leave pay? Probably not. But, okie, this is a sector of our economy that is seen to be growing. And we are supposed to get excited about that?

There is this big bubble in the middle, the so called middle class, who bought stuff like houses and anything else they could put on their credit cards. All of that debt, built on the illussion that great times would go on forever, is going to come crashing down.

And I haven't even mentioned the Whole Food Markets Inc. thing.
 

rjb, you are quite a mild mannered poster here. Thanks. As far as assaulting each other, I view cicerone as just a very staunch liberal Democrat, and he is not ever going to admit the Republicans can do anything right. He also likes to run down the country, which really is highly irritating. I want to say something not often heard on forums like this. I feel extremely grateful for living in such a wonderful country, where hard work is rewarded, where we have the freedom to pursue happiness. Happiness is not wealth in my view, but responsible living is part of happiness, and usually being responsible will bring us most of the comforts we want and need. Also, happiness is not a constitutional right, but the pursuit of it is. So if people want to sit around and feel sorry for themselves and constantly blame the country, or the system, or rich people, or something else, for their unhappiness, I don't know what will fix it.

Now, on to health care benefits. Contrary to what some politicians say these days, the constitution does not guarantee health care as a right. It is a problem, and we need to work on it, but I do not believe government health care will improve it. That is another debate subject all by itself.

In regard to buying houses and then cannot afford them, my parents taught me to live well within my means, and that means do not buy a house you can barely afford, or the one the real estate agent said you can afford. Buy something less instead. That applies to everything, cars, furniture, vacations, you name it. Unfortunately, I believe people are living beyond their means much more now than 50 years ago. Some of what we observe today is not altogether the economy. It involves the lifestyles, habits, and attitudes of this generation vs past generations.
 
 
 
okie, What in the world are you trying to say about drug abuse, alcoholism and the mentally ill?
 

I said what I meant to say. I feel sorry for those with that problem, and I have seen it personally. Mental illness is an illness, and we need to take care of those people. I believe that wholeheartedly. Drug abuse and alcoholism is a choice, at least initially. I also feel sorry for people with that problem, but you can only help those people if they want help, and often they have to hit bottom before they want it. Any help provided should have strings attached, otherwise you become an enabler instead of a helper. Dealing with such problems is not pretty, and like it or not, people can be their own worst enemy, and on top of that, true misfortune can strike any of us regardless of our choices. However, if we stay away from drugs and alcohol, and live responsibly, I believe we have only a very small chance of being destitute or homeless.
 
 
okie, You're wrong from the get-go. I'm not a "staunch liberal democrat."

I and over 65 percent of Americans agree that Bush has done a miserable job as president. Only about 35 percent still thinks he's doing a good job. Included in that 65 percent are many conservative republicans.

As for "making it," all my siblings and most of our children are doing just fine, thank you! We come from a very modest background, but my older brother was an attorney and was an administrative judge in California. My younger brother is an ophthalmologist with and MBA, and is now a state legislator. Our sister is an RN. Most of our children have college degrees, and many are in the "professions" such as medicine, dentistry, chemistry, and PhDs. Both our sons graduated cum laude.

We are not strangers to hard work; I barely graudated from high school, but eventually earned a degree and worked most of my (short) working career in management, retired early, and now travel the world about eight times a year.

I have volunteered at nonprofit organizations in their board, and also served on the Santa Clara County grand jury for the 2003-2004 year.

All my brothers and I served in the military.

I'm a proud third generation American.
 
 
Congratulations to you. My apologies about liberal Democrat if you aren't, but if you walk like a duck and talk like a duck, I figured you had to be a duck.

I do not say the following to argue. I simply want an honest answer. It goes like this. And I heard Rush say this, and I agree. All my life, I hear people complaining about how bad the economy is and how many people must be suffering. But when you ask them how they are doing, they are doing just fine. For some reason, everybody seems to think people other places are doing badly. But when you go there, you find out they are doing fine but think other people are doing badly.

So my conclusion is, as Rush concluded also, people have a false sense of how everyone is doing, and that really most people are doing pretty well. Do not mis-interpret this. I fully realize some people are poor and are unemployed, but my point is that the percentage of people suffering is really smaller than the popular perception is viewed to be, and especially in the media. Bad news sells, and that really is one of the roots of the problem.
 
 
okie, Your knowledge about drug addiction and alcoholism is lacking big time. Those people who become addicted to drugs or alcohol have an illness like mental illness. No difference; they all need help. Yes, it's a choice initially, but you must understand why kids try drugs or alcohol. It's more "normal" for kids to experiment with smoking, drinking and drugs. That some gets hooked is based on illness, not because they "love" the stuff. I'm one of the lucky ones that started smoking and drinking at a later age than most; about age 21. I've had my binges, and gotten sick from too much drinking, but still drink beer at lunch, and wine with dinner on many occasions. I can go without a drink for days or weeks, because I don't have the "illness."

Some of my friend's children are not so lucky; it often destroys the family in addition to their child.

I have very little patience for racial and homophobic bigots, and somewhat more patience for ignorance if they don't remain blind to the obvious. It's not that difficult to find resources today; especially because of the internet. Use it.
 
 
I used to be a registered republican because I believed in conservative socialism. All my siblings are still all republicans, but I changed my political affiliation to independent, because I will vote for the candidate I think best meets my ideal - whether democrat or republican. I believe in small government, less intrusion from our government, and self sufficiency. I also believe in universal health care. I also believe in helping those who cannot help themselves or have had some bad luck. That's the reason I only donate regularly to only two charities now; the Second Harvest Food Bank and Habitat for Humanities.

If I talk like a duck and look like a duck to you, you need glasses and a hearing aide.
 
 
I am quite aware of the modern trend of calling this an illness. Perhaps it is a form of illness after they are hooked, but not in the same sense as cancer or heart disease. It is demonstrated over and over again that for someone that truly wants to quit, there is help for them to overcome whatever it is. If you think I am not versed on this, you are wrong. Every family is touched by most things like this, and my family is no different.

There is peer pressure when young to start bad habits. I admit that. But that still does not remove the issue from being a choice. Man is a free agent. If we wish to blame everything on someone else or something else, then we are in for bigger problems. We must teach our children that they have choices to make, and that they will live with the consequences of their choices. To simply pass things off as Oh well, they are going to do it anyway, then they will. you are not going to convince me that alcoholism and drug abuse has no personal choice component in it.
 
 
By the way, small government and universal government health care is not consistent. You must be very conflicted in your philosophy, cicerone.

By the way, I know we disagree on many things, but I perceive you to be a good person and decent. Not so with a few others here. So thanks.
 
 
okie, No conflict in my mind; we are the richest country in the world and the only developed country without universal health care.

The following from Wikipedia on addition:

Decades ago addiction was a pharmacologic term that clearly referred to the use of a tolerance-inducing drug in sufficient quantity as to cause tolerance (the requirement that greater dosages of a given drug be used to produce an identical effect as time passes). With that definition, humans (and indeed all mammals) can become addicted to various drugs quickly. Almost at the same time, a lay definition of addiction developed. This definition referred to individuals who continued to use a given drug despite their own best interest. This latter definition is now thought of as a disease state by the medical community.[
 
 
 
 
au, Good article; it shows another aspect of our economy that should be included in the mix of variable to determine how our economy is doing for the long term.
 
 
 
okie, No conflict in my mind; we are the richest country in the world and the only developed country without universal health care.
 

Fine, if you think we can afford it and should, but I was simply pointing out that you just got through saying you were not a typical liberal Democrat because one reason being you believe in smaller government. Well, duh, what do you think universal government supported health care does to size of government? So there is a conflict in what you say you are for in terms of size of government and what you think government should do. Thats like saying you believe in staying trim, but also preach the practice of eating a half gallon of ice cream 3 times a day. If you favor smaller government, you must also advocate government doing less things and being involved in far fewer issues and programs.

In contrast, I am for smaller government. I believe the federal government should withdraw totally from k-12 education. I also believe they should minimize any involvement in health care. We could go into the many other things they should not be involved in as well, but those two are biggies.

Read this, cicerone.
 http://www.brusselsjournal.com/node/128 

A quote from the above:
"The American Republic will endure," Toqueville said, "until politicians realize they can bribe the people with their own money."
 
 
We are spending two billion every week in Iraq; tax money that should be spent to help our own needs first. If you could let go of your obsession to label me as a liberal democrat, you would understand why universal health care is important to all children. Over and beyond all that, there is much government waste that could well pay for universal health care.

I am also for smaller government, but there are areas of social needs that require government involvement; such as infrastructure, security, education, health care, and securing for our retirement through social security and medical. Our government has mismanaged these programs very badly - both democrats and republicans.

As for public education, that's what helped jumpstart our economy after WWII and all periods after that and transformed us into the economic superpower of the world. Many countries without education are mostly third world countries without much hope of moving out of poverty; many still earn under $1 a day income.

Those with the best educational system will be the leaders of tomorrow; unfortunately, the US is falling behind in math and science.
 
 
Look at the facts, cicerone. Social spending is growing in terms of percentage of the budget, and our federal budget continues to grow overall. Defense spending is down. Iraq is costly, but overall, the trend is down for defense spending as compared to social spending.

 http://mwhodges.home.att.net/fed_budget.htm 

 http://www.truthandpolitics.org/military-relative-size.php 

Did you READ my link? Full scale pribery of voters has been going on now for a long time. To heck with the constitution.

And you will never spend your way to educational excellence anyway, in my opinion.
 
 
okie, The BIG picture is obvious; the federal deficit is at it's highest peak which translates into more dollars going into defense; not the other way around. Did you know that a good part of the federal budget doesn't include defense? It's because the president asks for supplementals during the year. Do the math.

All that the graph shows is that the relationship of defense spending vs the overall budget; not the "value" of defense spending over that same period.
 
 
okie wrote: Did you READ my link? Full scale pribery of voters has been going on now for a long time. To heck with the constitution.

So now, you're willing to throw out the Constitution? That's the only protection we have from presidents that act like kings.

And you will never spend your way to educational excellence anyway, in my opinion.

Where do you think most people in our country get their education from?
A: Public schools.
 
 
The debate is jumping all over the place, so it is difficult to focus on one issue. Perhaps my fault as much as yours.

You cannot escape the fact, cicerone, that social spending is increasing, while military spending has decreased over the last few decades. I am talking about an overall trend that you cannot dispute.

My comment about the constitution was based on the fact that politicians are bribing the voters. The more they promise, the more they will get votes, regardless of whether it is constitutional or not. I am not talking about the leftists hollering about Bush wiretapping terrorist suspects, which is really a miniscule matter compared to the larger picture. These statements I make are based on my belief that originally senators and congressmen were intended for the purpose of representing their districts or states to vote their conscience for what was best for the COUNTRY, not for their districts in terms of bringing back pork. Pork projects are many times not what the federal government should even be doing in the first place. I often read where one of the biggest aims of house candidates is to look after their districts, translation, bring federal money to their districts. They will do this even though it might be a waste of federal dollars and not even a function of what the federal government should be doing, but no matter, there is no longer a conscience by these people when they swear to uphold the constitution. I don't think they even understand the concept. They do this so they can be re-elected time after time, and the people think this is wonderful, unfortunately.

Bringing money into the district is only one facet of the problem. They will also vote for unconstitutional social programs across the country because the people demand them and now think that is what government is supposed to do. And the sorry educational system does not educate the modern generation to think any differently.

Public schools are over-rated. I argued many pages with Parados about this. My mother learned more in a one room school house in 8 years than most high school graduates learn now. At least she writes legibly, can add and subract, and can balance her checkbook. DC spends more on education than most places and has the worst test scores, I think. I would need to look it up, but throwing money at education will not fix the problem.
 
 
You cannot escape the fact, cicerone, that social spending is increasing, while military spending has decreased over the last few decades. I am talking about an overall trend that you cannot dispute.

A: Here, try this: (simplified) $100 annual federal budget in 1950. Defense budget is 28% of $100 = $28.
In 2006, the annual federal budget is $20,000, and 12% for defense equals $2,400. Now, the question becomes what role inflation played in these two scenarios.

My comment about the constitution was based on the fact that politicians are bribing the voters. The more they promise, the more they will get votes, regardless of whether it is constitutional or not. I am not talking about the leftists hollering about Bush wiretapping terrorist suspects, which is really a miniscule matter compared to the larger picture. These statements I make are based on my belief that originally senators and congressmen were intended for the purpose of representing their districts or states to vote their conscience for what was best for the COUNTRY, not for their districts in terms of bringing back pork. Pork projects are many times not what the federal government should even be doing in the first place. I often read where one of the biggest aims of house candidates is to look after their districts, translation, bring federal money to their districts. They will do this even though it might be a waste of federal dollars and not even a function of what the federal government should be doing, but no matter, there is no longer a conscience by these people when they swear to uphold the constitution. I don't think they even understand the concept. They do this so they can be re-elected time after time, and the people think this is wonderful, unfortunately.

A: It's our fault that we continue to reelect the same people that continues to do us harm. We have met the enemy, and it's us.

Bringing money into the district is only one facet of the problem. They will also vote for unconstitutional social programs across the country because the people demand them and now think that is what government is supposed to do. And the sorry educational system does not educate the modern generation to think any differently.

A: Education requires that the majority in our society are provided with the means to learn how to read and write. Without this very basic skills, our economy will drop like a ten ton sinker.

Public schools are over-rated. I argued many pages with Parados about this. My mother learned more in a one room school house in 8 years than most high school graduates learn now. At least she writes legibly, can add and subract, and can balance her checkbook. DC spends more on education than most places and has the worst test scores, I think. I would need to look it up, but throwing money at education will not fix the problem.

A: Not all children learn at the same rate nor up to the same level. That's the failure of our school system.
[/s

ize]
 
 
$28.00 in 1950 is now worth about $229.00.

 http://www.westegg.com/inflation/ 
I will need to take off here, and will check your numbers later.
 
 
okie, Read this article from USA Today. It might give you a clue.
 
 
U.S. Govt Debt

Year US$ billions
1910 2.6
1920 25.9
1930 16.2
1940 43.0
1950 257.4
1960 290.2
1970 389.2
1980 930.2
1990 3,233.3
2000 5,674.2
2005 7,932.7
2006 8,506.9

okie, By your reckoning, inflation increased by 8Xs from 1950 to 2006.
However, the deficit increased by 33Xs during that same period (per above chart).

The defense expenditure in 1950 was 17%, and that translates to $43 billion. However, in 2006's budget, defense spending was 5% or $425 billion. Even with your 8Xs inflation rate, we're spending more today on defense than in 1950.
 
 
I have never defended bloated federal spending. You said you were for smaller government, but you implied we needed to spend more on social needs vs defense. You named "infrastructure, security, education, health care, and securing for our retirement through social security and medical." Now, the fact is, and I find myself repeating myself, expenditures on these things have grown far faster than for defense, so what you are advocating has already been happening, cicerone.

We created the most powerful and most industrialized nation on earth before social spending experienced the sharpest growth. One example is education. We were ahead of the world on many things before the federal government spent much of anything on education. It is my opinion that we are spending too much on social programs and I think it is directly related to politicians bribing voters. There is the very distinct possibility that we will eventually kill the goose that laid the golden egg. It will take a long time, but we are already seeing the trends. It is much like a sports team after winning, they become complacent, lazy, and take it easy, and before long, someone else is whipping them. We are no longer turning out engineers and scientists to keep us at the pinnacle.

I am tired of complainers that want the government to do more for everybody. It is doing too much now, and its time, as JFK said, for us to do something for the country, instead of the country doing for us, and I would add, something for ourselves. We have forgotten something called "citizenship." Do they even teach it in schools anymore?

By the way, Social Security is a Ponzi scheme, started by FDR, and someday such schemes will collapse like a house of cards, unless it is fixed. Bush tried but Democrats blocked the effort.
 
 
 
The defense expenditure in 1950 was 17%, and that translates to $43 billion. However, in 2006's budget, defense spending was 5% or $425 billion. Even with your 8Xs inflation rate, we're spending more today on defense than in 1950.
 

Some real quick math and I didn't double check, but if correct, defense grew by about 10 times, barely over the inflation rate, while everything else grew by over 38 times, almost 5 times the inflation rate. Your numbers aren't supporting your argument very well. I just took your numbers, but I need to double check given time. I need to quit this evening.
 
 
Our government spends money, because we let them; they get reelected to spend more and more.

There's a big difference between spending for necessities and pork barrel spending of our government.

If we are really interested about "security" for our country, our government needs to look out for our citizens to ensure our children have the best education and health care, our infrastructure of transportation and communication are the best, and our borders are secure. Instead, we're spending over 100 billion every year in Iraq. Per capita share of the federal debt amounts to almost $80,000 (if not more) for every man, woman and child - and continues to increase. This is dangerous to the future of our economy.

Bush is a spend, spend, spend republican, and cuts taxes for the wealthy while the federal deficit increases to new levels every day. Bush has increased our government (in staff and payroll), and also intruded more into our lives through No Child Left Behind - a responsibility best left to local control. His drug plan was so screwed up, most senior citizens failed to sign up. Many still don't understand how it works, because of the so-called donut hole.

As more Americans lose their health insurance, the premiums continue to increase by double-digits making it more difficult to purchase private plans and for companies to provide insurance. All this while we spend two billion dollars every week in Iraq. It's a sham and a shame; our government would rather spend money to support a war that kills and maims over the health of our citizens.

I speak for our children and all those families without health insurance. My wife and I have medical, and whatever co-pays we have is easy for us to pay. We're a few of the lucky ones.
 
 
WASHINGTON (AFP) - The gulf between rich and poor in the United States is yawning wider than ever, and the number of extremely impoverished is at a three-decade high, a report out Saturday found.

Based on the latest available US census data from 2005, the McClatchy Newspapers analysis found that almost 16 million Americans live in "deep or severe poverty" defined as a family of four with two children earning less than 9,903 dollars -- one half the federal poverty line figure.

For individuals the "deep poverty" threshold was an income under 5,080 dollars a year.

"The McClatchy analysis found that the number of severely poor Americans grew by 26 percent from 2000 to 2005," the US newspaper chain reported.

"That's 56 percent faster than the overall poverty population grew in the same period," it noted.

The surge in poverty comes alongside an unusual economic expansion.

"Worker productivity has increased dramatically since the brief recession of 2001, but wages and job growth have lagged behind. At the same time, the share of national income going to corporate profits has dwarfed the amount going to wages and salaries," the study found.

"That helps explain why the median household income for working-age families, adjusted for inflation, has fallen for five straight years.

"These and other factors have helped push 43 percent of the nation's 37 million poor people into deep poverty -- the highest rate since at least 1975. The share of poor Americans in deep poverty has climbed slowly but steadily over the last three decades," the report said.
 
 
Although off topic related to this increase poverty is the increase in religion.

 
Religion of despair
Chris Hedges
Published 29 January 2007
 http://www.newstatesman.com/200701290030 

Disciples of evangelism in the United States are often regarded with fear and suspicion. But for many it's seen as a route out of poverty and hopelessness

The engine that drives the radical Christian right in the United States - the most dangerous mass movement in American history - is not religiosity, but despair. It is a movement built on the growing personal and economic despair of tens of millions of Americans, who watched helplessly as their communities were plunged into poverty by the flight of manufacturing jobs, their families and neighborhoods torn apart by neglect and indifference. They eventually lost hope that America was a place where they had a future.

This despair crosses economic boundaries, enveloping many in the middle class who live trapped in huge, soulless exurbs where, lacking any form of community rituals or centers, they also feel deeply isolated, vulnerable and lonely. Those in despair are the most easily manipulated by demagogues, who promise a fantastic utopia, whether it is a worker's paradise, libert-galit-fraternit, or the second coming of Jesus Christ. Those in despair search desperately for a solution, the warm embrace of a community to replace the one they lost, a sense of purpose and meaning in life, the assurance that they are protected, loved and worthwhile.

During the past two years of work on the book American Fascists: the Christian right and the war on America, I kept encountering this deadly despair. Driving down a highway lined with gas stations, fast-food restaurants and dollar stores, I often got vertigo, forgetting for a moment if I was in Detroit or Kansas City or Cleveland. There are parts of the United States, including whole sections of former manufacturing centers such as Ohio, that resemble the developing world, with boarded-up storefronts, dilapidated houses, potholed streets and crumbling schools. The end of the world is no longer an abstraction to many Americans.

Jeniece Learned is typical of many. She was standing, when I met her, amid a crowd of earnest-looking men and women - many with small gold crosses on the lapels of their jackets or around their necks - in a hotel lobby in Valley Forge, Pennsylvania. She had an easy smile and a thick mane of black, shoulder-length hair. She was carrying a booklet called Ringing in a Culture of Life. The booklet had the schedule of the two-day event she was attending, which was organized by the Pennsylvania Pro-Life Federation. The event was "dedicated to the 46 million children who have died from legal abortions since 1973 and the mothers and fathers who mourn their loss".

Recruiting tool
Learned, who had driven five hours from a town outside Youngstown, Ohio, was raised Jewish. She wore a gold Star of David around her neck with a Christian cross inserted in the middle of the design. She stood up in one of the morning sessions, attended by about 300 people, most of them women, when the speaker, Alveda King, niece of Dr Martin Luther King, asked if there were any "post-abortive" women present.

Learned runs a small pregnancy counseling clinic called Pregnancy Services of Western Pennsylvania in the town of Sharon, where she attempts to talk young girls and women, most of them poor, out of abortions.

She speaks at local schools, promoting sexual abstinence, rather than birth control, as the only acceptable form of contraception. She found in the fight against abortion, and in her conversion, a structure, purpose and meaning that previously eluded her. The battle against abortion is one of the Christian right's most effective recruiting tools. It plays on the guilt and shame of women who have had abortions, accusing them of committing murder, and promising redemption and atonement in the "Christian" struggle to make abortion illegal - a fight for life against "the culture of death".

Learned's life before she was saved was, like for many in this mass movement, chaotic and painful. Her childhood was stolen from her. She was sexually abused by a close member of the family. Her mother periodically woke her and her younger sister and two younger brothers in the middle of the night to flee landlords who wanted back rent. The children would be bundled into the car and driven in darkness to a strange apartment in another town. Her mother worked nights and weekends as a bartender. Learned, the eldest, often had to run the home. Her younger sister, who was sexually abused by another family member, eventually committed suicide as an adult, something Learned also considered. As a teenager she had an abortion.

She was taking classes at Pacific Christian College several years later when she saw an anti-abortion film called The Silent Scream. "You see in this movie the baby backing up trying to get away from this suction tube," she said. "And its mouth is open and it is like this baby is screaming.

"I flipped out. It was at that moment that God just took this veil that I had over my eyes for the last eight years. I couldn't breathe. I was hyperventilating. I ran outside. One of the girls followed me. And she said, 'Did you commit your life to Christ?' And I said, 'I did.' And she said, 'Did you ask for your forgiveness of sins?' And I said, 'I did.' And she goes, 'Does that mean all your sins, or does that mean some of them?' And I said, 'I guess it means all of them.' So she said, 'Basically, you are thinking God hasn't forgiven you for your abortion because that is a worse sin than any of your other sins that you have done.'"

The film brought her into the fight to make abortion illegal. Her activism became atonement for her own abortion. She struggled with depression after she gave birth to her daughter Rachel. When she came home from the hospital she was unable to care for her infant. She thought she saw an eight-year-old boy standing next to her bed. It was, she is sure, the image of the son she had murdered.

"I started crying and asking God over and over again to for give me," she says. "I had murdered His child. I asked Him to forgive me over and over again. It was just incredible. I was possessed. On the fourth day I remember hearing God's voice: 'I have your baby, now get up!' It was the most incredibly freeing and peaceful moment. I got up and I showered and I ate. I just knew it was God's voice."

Weimar lesson
In the United States we have turned our backs on the working class, with much of the worst assaults, such as Nafta and welfare reform, pushed though during President Clinton's Democratic administration. We stand passively and watch an equally pernicious assault on the middle class. Anything that can be put on software, from architecture to engineering to finance, will soon be handed to workers overseas who will be paid a third of what their American counterparts receive and who will, like some 45 million Americans, have no access to health insurance or benefits.

There has been, along with the creation of an American oligarchy, a steady Weimarisation of the working class. The top 1 per cent of households in the US have more wealth than the bottom 90 per cent combined. As Plutarch reminded us: "An imbalance between rich and poor is the oldest and most fatal ailment of all republics."

The stories that believers such as Learned told me of their lives before they found Christ were heartbreaking. These chronicles were about terrible pain, severe financial difficulties, struggles with addictions, or with childhood sexual or physical abuse, profound alienation and often thoughts about suicide. They were chronicles without hope. The real world, the world of facts and dispassionate intellectual inquiry, the world where all events, news and information were not filtered through this comforting ideological prism, the world where they were left out to dry, abandoned by a government hostage to corporations and willing to tolerate obscene corporate profits, betrayed them.

They hated this world. And they willingly walked out on this world for the mythical world offered by radical preachers: a world of magic, a world where God had a divine plan for them and intervened on a daily basis to protect them and perform miracles in their lives. The rage many expressed to me towards those who challenge this belief system, to those of us who do not accept that everything in the world came into being during a single week 6,000 years ago because it says so in the Bible, was a rage born of fear, the fear of being plunged back into a reality-based world where these magical props would no longer exist, and where they would once again be adrift.

The danger of this theology of despair is that it says that nothing in the world is worth saving. It rejoices in cataclysmic destruction. It welcomes the frightening advance of global warming, the spiraling wars and violence in the Middle East and the poverty and neglect that have blighted American urban and rural landscapes as encouraging signs that the end of the world is close. Those who cling to this magical belief, which is a bizarre form of spiritual Darwinism, will be raptured upwards while the rest of us will be tormented with horrors by a warrior Christ and finally extinguished. The obsession with apocalyptic violence is an obsession with revenge. It is what the world, and we who still believe it is worth saving, deserve.

Those who lead the movement give their followers moral license to direct this rage and yearning for violence against all who refuse to submit to the movement, from liberals and "secular humanists", to "nominal Christians", intellectuals, gays and lesbians, to Muslims. The leaders of the Christian right, from James Dobson to Pat Robertson, call for a theocratic state that will, if it comes to pass, bear within it many of the traits of classical fascism.

All radical movements need a crisis or a prolonged period of instability to achieve power. We are not in a period of crisis now. But another catastrophic terrorist attack on American soil, a series of huge environmental disasters or an economic meltdown will hand to these radicals the opening they seek.

Manipulating our fear and anxiety, promising to make us safe and secure, giving us the assurance that they can vanquish the forces that mean to do us harm, these radicals, many of whom have achieved powerful positions in the executive and legislative branches of government, as well as the military, will ask us only to surrender our rights, to pass them the unlimited power they need to battle the forces of darkness. They will have behind them tens of millions of angry, disenfranchised Americans longing for revenge and yearning for a mythical utopia, Americans who embraced a theology of despair because we offered them nothing else.

Chris Hedges, a graduate of Harvard Divinity School and Pulitzer Prize-winning ex-foreign correspondent for the New York Times, is the author of "American Fascists: the Christian right and the war on America" (Jonathan Cape, 12.99)
 
 
 
xingu, Good article, and it is "related."
 
 
 
WASHINGTON (AFP) - The gulf between rich and poor in the United States is yawning wider than ever, and the number of extremely impoverished is at a three-decade high, a report out Saturday found.

Based on the latest available US census data from 2005, the McClatchy Newspapers analysis found that almost 16 million Americans live in "deep or severe poverty" defined as a family of four with two children earning less than 9,903 dollars -- one half the federal poverty line figure.

For individuals the "deep poverty" threshold was an income under 5,080 dollars a year.

"The McClatchy analysis found that the number of severely poor Americans grew by 26 percent from 2000 to 2005," the US newspaper chain reported.
.........
 

Even working a minimum wage job at $5.15 per hour earns around $10,712.00 per year. Subtract 7.5% for SS and Medicare, which is around $800.00, so round off to around $10,000. Then with a spouse and 2 children, they get over $4,000 in earned income credits, etc., thanks to George Bush, and the least any able bodied person should earn per year is around $14,000. By the way, they pay no income tax, so the $4,000 is money over and above what was paid in, again thanks to George Bush "who only takes care of the rich."

Now I can only guess why someone is earning $5,000 or $9,000 per year. But if they are disabled, somebody can perhaps fill me in on this, but they should draw anywhere from a few hundred per month to maybe a couple thousand per month or so. Also, unemployment benefits will earn less, but still should be a few hundred to over a thousand per month, I'm not sure about this, I am not familiar with it.

Add into the mix other programs, such as food stamps, wick, and other things, and equivalent income is more than the numbers show.

This all presumes just one wage earner, but if both spouses work, and each still work at just minimum wage jobs, they earn well over 20,000 after the tax credits are applied. Obviously this is not great if you live in New York City or San Francisco, but hopefully people with no skills have enough sense to go somewhere that has lower living costs.
 
 
 
xingu, Good article, and it is "related."
 

cicerone, the collapse of the family structure is hurting this country tremendously, in many ways, and one is economically.

 http://www.heritage.org/Research/Family/images/bg1283cht1.gif 

If a girl has 2 kids before hardly getting out of high school, maybe without a high school diploma, has no skills, and no spouse, how in the world does she expect to support and raise the children? This is what I am talking about when I mentioned the word, "citizenship." As a society, we need to once again recognize this as important. You have some parents trying to teach it. But you do not hear the drumbeat for this from society, in the media, in the schools, in movies, on tv. The messages heard are have fun, do your thing, and as xingu's article claims, religion is dangerous and only is meant to make you feel guilty. I have never heard more hogwash in my life than I am hearing recently.

Poverty rates among single parent families is far, far higher than for 2 parent families. So obviously the problem is as much or more cultural as it is economic. This site shows that as of 1998, single parent familes were more than 4 times more likely to be under the poverty line than 2 parent families.

 http://www.brook.edu/views/papers/sawhill/20010522_charts.pdf 

So some people on this forum can make fun of religion and morals all you want, but if a religion helps society hang together, I am all for it. I don't have to agree with the religion, but if it teaches responsibility, citizenship, and obeying the laws, I am in favor of it.

P.S. to xingu and cicerone, I believe women feel guilt over abortion whether anyone told them to or not. It is inescapable. It is in us as human beings, not to destroy our own offspring. Denial does not make natural feelings go away.
 
 
okie, Many people including grown ups make bad decisions about finances. That you wish to throw in the mix your rhetoric about "a girl with two kids" is not germane based on the simple fact that under Bush, the middle class and the poor lost buying power, and more fell into deep poverty.
 
 
It is very germane, cicerone. Look at the trends, and the statistics, especially the site I posted with the statistics on single parent families. And even the well to do, many, many people that make over 100,000 per year go bankrupt. So is the government supposed to give them enough money to live the lifestyle they want, even if it exceeds 100,000? At the same time, there are people that make almost nothing that end up millionaires. A couple of years ago, I remember an article about a woman that worked as a secretary, barely earning a little more than minimum wage all her life, she started with nothing, but when she died, her estate was worth over a million.

My point is that as a society, we are forgetting to appreciate what we have and to take care of what we have. I just talked to an elderly lady today that lived through the depression, and she emphatically says society is extremely spoiled, and most people have alot more money now than ever, we are living higher than ever, and that even the poor spend like drunken sailors, which explains why many don't have a dime.

The mindset on this forum for some is to complain, complain, and complain some more. Maybe its time to look in the mirror? After all, there has to be a reason why millions are coming to this country. I don't see millions migrating to Mexico or somewhere else.
 
 
Exactly how do you propose to change this trend?
 
 
I don't look for it to change any time soon. What I am talking about starts in the heart, and it isn't something that can be forced on people. More individual responsibility and citizenship, plus the moral gumption to accomplish it is what this country needs right now, and right now it isn't honored and respected as it once was. Instead, it is criticized, impuned, and made fun of.

 http://www.econlib.org/library/ENC/PovertyintheUnitedStates.html 

Another factor that may be influencing this problem, which we have not discussed, is the high school drop-out rate. And of course this factor results from other factors, such as the rise of single parent households. The truth is that high school dropouts cannot expect to escape poverty very easily or soon. Graduation rate in 1990 was 71%, which dropped to 67% by 2000, but is now back to 69.7% in 2004. Factors such as these may have a delayed effect upon poverty rates for the years following.

 http://www.higheredinfo.org/dbrowser/index.php?year=2000&level=nation&mode=data&state=0&submeasure=36 
 
 
 
So is the government supposed to give them enough money to live the lifestyle they want, even if it exceeds 100,000?
 

No. The government should provide them with a most mean and unpleasant lifestyle - one decided to keep them alive at the most basic level, no more.

The gov't has a specific interest in keeping people from starving to death (helps avoid crime), and that's it.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Oh, so you admit it can't be "forced" on people. Well, gues what? That's a world-wide problem, because it's a human problem.

What you don't seem to understand is that with five percent of the world's population, we are the "richest."

Humanity cries out for helping those that need help - especially the children in our country. If you don't understand these basic human needs, your politics only shows how blind you are. Helping all of our children today, helps the health and economy of our future.

The rich don't need any more money or luxuries; the country that offered them all the opportunities to create wealth also has a responsibility to return some of that wealth to help those in need. It will benefit their own children and grandchildren to live a healthier and prosperous life.
 
 
 
 
So is the government supposed to give them enough money to live the lifestyle they want, even if it exceeds 100,000?
 

No. The government should provide them with a most mean and unpleasant lifestyle - one decided to keep them alive at the most basic level, no more.

The gov't has a specific interest in keeping people from starving to death (helps avoid crime), and that's it.
 

Careful! "Keeping people from starving to death" means a beans-and-rice diet or similar, served in a mass canteen to people living in six-bed, 200 square foot rooms. This level of subsistence is cheaper than even the meager payments by the US welfare system.
 
 
 
 
 
So is the government supposed to give them enough money to live the lifestyle they want, even if it exceeds 100,000?
 

No. The government should provide them with a most mean and unpleasant lifestyle - one decided to keep them alive at the most basic level, no more.

The gov't has a specific interest in keeping people from starving to death (helps avoid crime), and that's it.
 

Careful! "Keeping people from starving to death" means a beans-and-rice diet or similar, served in a mass canteen to people living in six-bed, 200 square foot rooms. This level of subsistence is cheaper than even the meager payments by the US welfare system.
 

Yeah. It's better than letting people starve to death, and the contention seems to be that welfare equals socialism, so; the conditions you describe are significantly better than living on the streets...

I don't wish this on anyone, but advocate it as a last resort; I think that there are plenty on the other side of the fence who would argue that the state has no compelling interest in this matter whatsoever...

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
The gov't has a specific interest in keeping people from starving to death (helps avoid crime), and that's it.

Cycloptichorn
 

I wasn't aware that anyone is. In fact children are getting fatter aren't they? And if people are starving, bring back the "poorhouses." That should fix the problem.
 
 
okie wrote: In fact children are getting fatter aren't they?

okie is hopeless trapped in his politics.
 
 
 
 
The gov't has a specific interest in keeping people from starving to death (helps avoid crime), and that's it.

Cycloptichorn
 

I wasn't aware that anyone is. In fact children are getting fatter aren't they? And if people are starving, bring back the "poorhouses." That should fix the problem.
 

Getting fatter isn't a sign of health. It is a sign of poor health. You can get fat and starve to death, or more accurately suffer great health problems due to malnutrition, at the same time.

Surprising to me that you're still pushing this ridiculous line.

Define 'poorhouse.'

Cycloptichorn
 
 
c.i. wrote :

 
Many people including grown ups make bad decisions about finances
 

of course, and even large corporations make plenty of bad financial decisions. and it's often the ordinary citizens who are made to suffer for it. i believe i've heard some on a2k say : "the employer doesn't owe them anything ".
there are also plenty of cases - not restricted to the united states btw - where large and profitable corporations are lining their pockets with GOVERNMENT (read : taxpayers) money/subsidies.

i always get a thrill   when i hear :
"the canadian government (fill in as required : prime minister, ottawa etc.) has decided to contribute $ x,xxx,xxx to the project".
it should really be : "canadian taxpayers are subsidizing the project to the tune of $ x,xxx.xxx ".  
hbg
 
 
hbg, I tried to make my statement "all inclusive."   Thanks for expanding on that idea.

Some people see things in myopia; their ability to see the big picture is missing, and their sophistry to specifics seems to escape them. They think it supports their position.
 
 
 
Getting fatter isn't a sign of health. It is a sign of poor health. You can get fat and starve to death, or more accurately suffer great health problems due to malnutrition, at the same time.

Surprising to me that you're still pushing this ridiculous line.

Define 'poorhouse.'

Cycloptichorn
 

cyclops, I find your statement that you can be fat and starve to death rather humorous.

About poorhouses, look them up, as they used to be government supported places where people could go and live if they simply could not figure out how to make it on their own. They were usually farms with living quarters for a number of people where they could work and then receive the necessary food and clothing necessary to survive pretty well, of course without luxuries.
 
 
 
 
Getting fatter isn't a sign of health. It is a sign of poor health. You can get fat and starve to death, or more accurately suffer great health problems due to malnutrition, at the same time.

Surprising to me that you're still pushing this ridiculous line.

Define 'poorhouse.'

Cycloptichorn
 

cyclops, I find your statement that you can be fat and starve to death rather humorous.
 

I guess I'm sad to hear that you find death humorous. It is a real fact of life however that fat   healthy, and fat people cannot be considered to be healthy people.

 
About poorhouses, look them up, as they used to be government supported places where people could go and live if they simply could not figure out how to make it on their own. They were usually farms with living quarters for a number of people where they could work and then receive the necessary food and clothing necessary to survive pretty well, of course without luxuries.
 

I mean, it sounds crappy, but if there is no other option for you in life - due to your mistakes or others - would you want there to be a poorhouse, or not?

Keep in mind that I'd like to see Welfare done away with and the WPA brought back; I like the idea of paying people to do something over paying them to do nothing. In such a scenario, the 'poorhouse' isn't a terrible thing.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
Surprising to me that you're still pushing this ridiculous line.
 

Well, how many people are starving to death in the United States these days?
 
 
 
 
Surprising to me that you're still pushing this ridiculous line.
 

Well, how many people are starving to death in the United States these days?
 

To death? Some. I wouldn't say that it is a great percentage or anything.

Though, of course, if you asked the Feds', these folks are merely suffering from 'poor food security.'

I suppose a more pertinent question would be: how many folks are ill, or die prematurely, from a poor diet? We wouldn't say that they starved to death, but their diets don't help.

I am willing to admit that there aren't many starving to death in America right now and that Okie has a good point that fewer people starve than used to.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
In other thread-related news,

 
Greenspan Warns of Likely U.S. Recession
Alan Greenspan Warns That U.S. Economy May Slip Into Recession by End of Year
The Associated Press

HONG KONG - Former U.S. Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan warned Monday that the American economy might slip into recession by year's end.

He said the U.S. economy has been expanding since 2001 and that there are signs the current economic cycle is coming to an end.

"When you get this far away from a recession invariably forces build up for the next recession, and indeed we are beginning to see that sign," Greenspan said via satellite link to a business conference in Hong Kong. "For example in the U.S., profit margins... have begun to stabilize, which is an early sign we are in the later stages of a cycle."

"While, yes, it is possible we can get a recession in the latter months of 2007, most forecasters are not making that judgment and indeed are projecting forward into 2008... with some slowdown," he said.

Greenspan said that while it would be "very precarious" to try to forecast that far into the future, he could not rule out the possibility of a recession late this year.

The U.S. economy grew at a surprisingly strong 3.5 percent rate in the fourth quarter of 2006, up from a 2 percent rate in the third quarter. A survey released Monday by the National Association for Business Economics showed that experts predict economic growth of 2.7 percent this year, the slowest rate since a 1.6 percent rise in 2002.

Greenspan also warned that the U.S. budget deficit, which for 2006 fell to $247.7 billion, the lowest in four years, remains a concern.

"The American budget deficit is clearly a very significant concern for all of us that are trying to evaluate both the American economy's immediate future and that of the rest of the world," he said via satellite at the VeryGC Global Business Insights 2007 Conference.

Greenspan also said he has seen no economic spillover effects from the slowdown in the U.S. housing market.

"We are now well into the contraction period and so far we have not had any major, significant spillover effects on the American economy from the contraction in housing," he said.

Copyright 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.

Copyright  2007 ABC News Internet Ventures

 

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
I suppose a more pertinent question would be: how many folks are ill, or die prematurely, from a poor diet?
 

Not if the question came up about a point you made, and that point was about "starving to death".
 
 
 
 
I suppose a more pertinent question would be: how many folks are ill, or die prematurely, from a poor diet?
 

Not if the question came up about a point you made, and that point was about "starving to death".
 

 
In the United States, 60 percent of Americans are overweight or obese, and 39 percent say they do no physical activity in their leisure time. The U.S. Centers for Disease Control estimates that obesity will kill about 112,000 Americans in 2005
 
 
 
 
 
I suppose a more pertinent question would be: how many folks are ill, or die prematurely, from a poor diet?
 

Not if the question came up about a point you made, and that point was about "starving to death".
 

You're right - a review of the thread refreshes my memory.

Still that's probably a more pertinent issue, which I should have focused on

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
 
cyclops, I find your statement that you can be fat and starve to death rather humorous.
 

I guess I'm sad to hear that you find death humorous. It is a real fact of life however that fat   healthy, and fat people cannot be considered to be healthy people.
 

It wouldn't be humorous if people were dying like flies here due to starvation, but I have not heard of any for a good long time. You can bet that if there was even one that the press could pin on George Bush, it would be front page news for a month.

 
 
About poorhouses, look them up, as they used to be government supported places where people could go and live if they simply could not figure out how to make it on their own. They were usually farms with living quarters for a number of people where they could work and then receive the necessary food and clothing necessary to survive pretty well, of course without luxuries.
 

I mean, it sounds crappy, but if there is no other option for you in life - due to your mistakes or others - would you want there to be a poorhouse, or not?

Keep in mind that I'd like to see Welfare done away with and the WPA brought back; I like the idea of paying people to do something over paying them to do nothing. In such a scenario, the 'poorhouse' isn't a terrible thing.

Cycloptichorn
 

I agree with you in theory. But you are walking on thin ice here with your Democrat friends. I remember when Gingrich pushed through welfare reform, and one stipulation was that the recipients must show up in person and go through a personal review and interview, and in response to this I still remember the accusations of cruelty. Well, the result was that a significant percentage did not show up because the names were either fictitious, or duplicates, or they had died or something, but someone was still receiving benefits. Needless to say, Gingrich did something with government I could have sworn nobody could ever do, and that is actually do something about waste and corruption in the welfare system. But if you suggest welfare recipients actually have to work, cyclops, you are in big trouble with liberals.

I suggested poorhouses to my mother as maybe a valid idea to bring back again, and she protested vehemently, oh no, never bring those back. She remembered them, and knew people that had to live in them. So anyway, perhaps they are not practical now, I am not sure, but I am also in favor of work for able bodied welfare recipients.
 
 
One other point, cyclops, obesity or a poor diet is not a product of not having enough money for food. It is rather a case of eating junk food, which I would think is far more expensive. Things like chips, pop, doughnuts, pizza, and the like is quite expensive, as opposed to eating a balanced diet of fruit, vegetables, rice, potatoes, beans, etc. In fact the people that are the healthiest and live the longest generally do not overeat at all, so less money can translate into a healthier diet.
 
 
 
But if you suggest welfare recipients actually have to work, cyclops, you are in big trouble with liberals.
 

They can bring it on, then. I've never heard a good argument for why a healthy and able-bodied person can't do work.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
[/quote]

They can bring it on, then. I've never heard a good argument for why a healthy and able-bodied person can't do work.
[/quote]

The devil is in the details. For every x-mumber of folks working to earn their dole, there would have to be y-number of supervisors. Who is going to pay for them? And the unemployed are going to have to be transported to the jobsites? Who is going to pay for that? And insurance, both for the workers and for the public who might get injured by something the worker does. Who is going to pay for that? And what do you say to the Streetsweepers' Union when you deploy these people to sweep streets? And, well, you get the idea.
The WPA in the Depressiion was, I think, a great program. But I am not sure that it is a model that we can use today. I wish we could.

I get people coming into my store and the conversation goes like this: "You don't have any job openings, do you?" "Correct, I don't." "Sign this form saying that I applied."
If I did offer them a job, I suspect that some of them would run like hell
 
 
 
I get people coming into my store and the conversation goes like this: "You don't have any job openings, do you?" "Correct, I don't." "Sign this form saying that I applied."
If I did offer them a job, I suspect that some of them would run like hell
 

realjohnboy, thanks for the good laugh this morning.

I remember working for a farmer when a teenager. I worked every day for $6.00 per day plus room and board during the week in the summer. This was in the early 60's. I went home Saturday night for Sunday off, then went back to work Monday morning. Most of the time, I was plowing, or cultivating fields, not physically hard, but dirty and long hours, usually from about 7 or 7:30 in the morning to 7:30 or 8 in the evening. If harvesting, it would be later at night, sometimes midnight before we quit. We did not have air conditioned tractors with GPS, etc. in those days. Intermittently, our job was putting up hay. My boss continued paying me $6.00 per day, even though it was harder work.

Now, this is the interesting part I want to tell: When we put up hay, usually lasting 4 or 5 days at a time, we needed more help, so I would ride with my boss, drive into town to the unemployment office, where quite a few guys would be lollygagging around outside. The boss would ask anyone want work. There would not be an answer yes or no, but the first question from some would be "doing what?" "Putting up hay" would be the answer, at which time at least half or more would say they had a bad back, or they wanted no part of that. Second question by a couple of the remaining people would be "How much pay?" When the boss said $1.50 per hour, which was more than twice what I was making by the way, most of the remaining would say they had an appointment, or another job possibility, or something. Now, the possibilities would be down to maybe 6 guys out of maybe 2 dozen originally. A couple guys would have the third question "Can I get paid each day after work?" If the boss said no, I would rather pay after the 4 or 5 day job because he knew if he paid after the first day, nobody would show up the second day because they got drunk with the money. He might get 1 guy to agree to his offer to pay after the whole job, but usually he would have to agree to pay after the first day to get the 2 or 3 guys we usually needed. Sure enough, the second day, we would usually have to recruit at least 1, maybe 2 new ones, as maybe only 1 out of the 3 original would show up every day.

Another footnote to this, we had to have extra help, but 4 guys instead of 1 did not quadruple the rate of work, because they needed breaks twice as often, and of course the employment office stipulated that breaks were required, and usually this ended up sitting around and watch them smoke and look at their watch, to see how much time was left in the day. Breaks always stretched into 10 or 15 minutes longer than usual by the time the guys could get their cigarettes put away, 2nd and 3rd drinks of water, their gloves on, and everything else. Kind of like herding butterflies.
 
 
Where is the US economy going?

Here is a long post with a lot of graphs, but I feel it really really demonstrates our poor position as a nation:

 http://www.dailykos.com/storyonly/2007/2/27/71742/3815 

 
Central Banks Diversifying Away From the Dollar [/size]

by bonddad

Tue Feb 27, 2007 at 04:35:39 AM PST

 From Bloomberg: 

 
Central banks are increasingly diversifying their reserves, including cutting holdings of dollars, according to a survey sponsored by Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc, the U.K.'s second-largest bank.

Italy, Russia, Sweden and Switzerland have made ``major adjustments'' in foreign-exchange holdings favoring the euro and the British pound, according to the poll conducted by Central Banking Publications Ltd. between September and December. China also plans to manage its reserves more actively, the report said.

``Central banks are open to saying they've been diversifying to improve returns and reduce exposure to any single currency,'' said Sean Callow, senior currency strategist at Westpac Banking Corp. in Singapore. ``There's no doubt that when they say `diversification' they mean selling dollars.''

 

Why are they doing this? Simple. If a currency's underlying fundamentals are strong, you buy buy the currency. If a currency's fundamentals are weak, you sell or diversify away from the currency. The US' fundamentals are not that solid from a currency perspective.

First, we have a record trade deficit:

 

Because we have no national savings:

 

Foreigners have increased their share of US debt holdings:

 

The federal budget deficit is nowhere near under control (on the chart, notice the receipts scale is lower than the expenditures scale).

 

This increases US Gross Federal Debt at a strong and steady rate:

 

(NOte that the above graph only goes to '05. You don't even want to think about where that number is here in '07.)

The amount of interest we have to pay on our debt is increasing. Here is a chart of the year-over-year change in the amount of interest we have to pay:

 

 
Nineteen of 47 central banks surveyed had cut their share of dollars, while 10 said they had increased holdings. Twenty-one respondents said they had increased their reserves of euros, compared with seven who said they had reduced their holdings of the single currency. The 47 respondents in the survey hold a total of $1.5 trillion in reserve assets.
 

The short version is simple: The US is borrowing today hoping the growth rate will be fast enough to help us pay down the debt. However, there is nothing extraordinary about the current US growth rate compared to other expansions. Our current growth rate is on par with the growth rate of the last 25 years. Here is a chart of the year over year percent change in GNP:

 

In short, we are borrowing to achieve the same growth rate we have always had during an expansion.

 

Dow's off 150 today on the news, China dropped 9%.

Can anyone honestly say that they believe that the US economy is strong? Robust? Doing well? I would invite them to discuss why they believe this, in face of the numbers.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
How one views the economy depends on ones vantage point. For the wealthy it could not be better. For the middle class being squeezed from every side it is on the fast track to nowhere. IMO if the trend continues and the jobs continue to flow offshore. The US will begin to resemble a third world world economy, rich and poor and a very small middle class.
 
 
Cyclo, Good graphs, but unfortunately many don't know how to translate those graphs into the "realtiy." As au stated, the economy depends on ones vantage point; ignorant.

As for the stock market, it'll yo-yo all during the year. There's always an over-reaction by the market to bad news.

With our portfolio with a good mix of bonds, the past several days of the down market didn't hurt us all that much. With bond prices going up relative to the market downturn today, it will shield our portfolio from large swings in value. If you like, I can post a net change today after 3PM.
 
 
 
If you like, I can post a net change today after 3PM.
 

I like...

My gold has been doing better lately, which is nice. Of course, I bought a bunch of it back four years ago, so I have no complaints on that count.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Dow's down 380 now. Hell of a bad day for the market

Of course, this is the sort of thing that happens when you've been sticking your fingers in your ears for the last several years to avoid the bad news...

Cycloptichorn
 
 
It was down 500 at one point in today's trading. It'll make up some of the loss by the end of the trading day, because buyers are looking for good deals.
 
 
Mr. Greenspan's prediction of the possibility of a recession by years end I am sure had a hand in the sharp market drop. When Greenspan speaks the market reacts.
 
 
Here's the numbers for today's market: Dow down 416 pts or 3.3%, and the Nasdaq down 97 pts or 3.9%. Our funds lost 1.5% or less than half of the major market indeces, because bond prices went up.
 
 
Globally, securities markets have been notching successive record gains over the past several quarters, with "all time high" and "new 52 week high" headlines just about weekly fare... without significant consolidations, corrections, or pullbacks. News, or more correctly rumors, of impending Chinese Government tightening of economic reins (including interest rate increases, tax increases along with the institution of capital gains taxes, and securities trading restrictions aimed at inhibiting rampant speculation, among other things), coupled with indications of slowing growth for the Chinese economy, spooked retail investors, triggering a selloff that dragged in the big boys, the institutional investors, who quite understandably moved to protect the gains they've notched over the past year; the share value of the Singapore index alone, for instance, more than doubled in the preceeding 12 months (up 130% Jan '06-Feb '07), recording on Monday an all-time high above its psychologically important 3000 Point benchmark. The profit taking and position protection hitting the Chinese indexes naturally had a ripple effect throughout the Asian and Pacific Rim markets, the European bourses followed suite, Greenspan spoke (with what he said misrepresented by the media - see below), the US markets took a hit along with the rest. Perhaps what is most surprising about all of this is that significant market corrections haven't happened more frequently. And perhaps least surprising will be a few days of general market weakness, followed by strong runups more than recouping this correction's losses over relatively near-term.

What Greenspan actually did say:

 
... He said the U.S. economy has been expanding since 2001 and that there are signs the current economic cycle is coming to an end.

"When you get this far away from a recession invariably forces build up for the next recession, and indeed we are beginning to see that sign," Greenspan said via satellite link to a business conference in Hong Kong. "For example in the U.S., profit margins... have begun to stabilize, which is an early sign we are in the later stages of a cycle."

"While, yes, it is possible we can get a recession in the latter months of 2007, most forecasters are not making that judgment and indeed are projecting forward into 2008... with some slowdown," he said.

Greenspan said that while it would be "very precarious" to try to forecast that far into the future, he could not rule out the possibility of a recession late this year...

... Greenspan also said he has seen no economic spillover effects from the slowdown in the U.S. housing market.

"We are now well into the contraction period and so far we have not had any major, significant spillover effects on the American economy from the contraction in housing," he said...

 Source: AP via MSNBC 
 

From a related article:

 
 Many economists aren't predicting a recession 
Prevailing wisdom is that there is a one-in-five chance of it happening
 

timber's take: good time to do some bargain shopping - this correction is gonna turn around and markets will head back up a lot sooner than most folks think.
 
 
curious. To the best of my knowledge a drop of 300 pts is supposed to trigger a stop on sales on the DOW but it didn't happen today.
 
 
While our economy continues to expand at the cost of higher per person debt in the US, and wages losing ground to inflation, the only miracle I see in our economy is the projection of continued growth and/or stablization. Frankly, I'm not that worried about today's 416 point drop in the DOW, but I am worried about continued growth in our economy while consumer debt continues on its upward spiral.

 

I hope my tea leaves are wrong.
 
 
 
curious. To the best of my knowledge a drop of 300 pts is supposed to trigger a stop on sales on the DOW but it didn't happen today.
 

The trigger is percentage of change (up or down), not dollar price.

With the Asian markets well into the trading day, some updates:

 
 Shanghai shares rebound after opening lower; China says no plans to tax capital gains 

The Associated Press
Tuesday, February 27, 2007
SHANGHAI, China: Chinese regulators shifted into damage control, denying rumors of plans for a 20 percent capital gains tax on stock investments as share prices recovered modestly Wednesday following their worst plunge in a decade.

About an hour after trading began, the Shanghai Composite Index was up 1.2 percent to 2,804.28 after opening down 1.3 percent. On Tuesday, it tumbled 8.8 percent, its largest decline since Feb. 18, 1997.

Concerns about slowdowns in the Chinese and U.S. economies sparked Wall Street's worst drop since the Sept. 11, 2001, terror attacks. The Dow Jones industrial average lost 3.3 percent...

... Tuesday's "sell-off does not reflect any fundamental change in the outlook for China's economy," Yiping Huang and other Citigroup economists said in a report released Wednesday. "A sharp contraction in excess liquidity that would reinforce damage in the stock market remains unlikely," it said.

China's big institutional investors are all state-controlled and would be unlikely to sell so heavily as to completely reverse gains that more than doubled share prices last year. With a key Communist Party congress due in the autumn, the authorities have a huge stake in keeping the markets on an even keel.

"They are acting now to nip a nascent bubble in the bud," says Stephen Green, senior economist at Standard Chartered Bank in Shanghai. The challenge is how to do that given generally bullish sentiment and the massive amount of funds available for investment.

"So they have to somehow calibrate the rhetoric and policy actions to keep a lid on this, while not triggering a collapse," Green says.

Among one option is a capital gains tax on stock investments. Rumors that such a tax may be enacted are thought to have one factor behind Tuesday's sell-off.

But the Shanghai Securities News ran a front-page report denying those rumors. The newspaper, run by the official Xinhua News Agency and often used to convey official announcements, cited unnamed spokesmen for the Ministry of Finance and State Administration of Taxation...
 

 
 China shares stabilise after Tuesday's rout 
Tue Feb 27, 2007 11:25 PM ET

SHANGHAI, Feb 28 (Reuters) - Chinese stocks stabilised on Wednesday as buying by local funds in financial blue chips pushed up the main Shanghai index slightly after a plunge of nearly 9 percent on Tuesday unsettled markets around the world.

Many analysts and traders said that while investors were nervous, Tuesday's tumble was probably not the start of a long-term bear market in Chinese stocks, since factors behind last year's bull run remained.

These factors include strong corporate earnings growth and billions of dollars waiting to be invested by newly created mutual funds, they noted...
 

 
 HK shares trim losses as bargain hunting emerges 
Tue Feb 27, 2007 10:10 PM ET

(Adds quotes, details)
By Rita Chang
HONG KONG, Feb 28 (Reuters) - Hong Kong stocks pared earlier losses in Wednesday morning trade after China's main stock index moved into positive territory and investors saw value in battered shares such as China Mobile.

"This is a good correction, a good opportunity to buy," said Tat Auyeung, fund manager at APEX Capital Management who manages a number of Asia ex-Japan funds worth about $500 million. "At this level, we're going to pick up some good stocks," Auyeung said, adding that China Mobile, mainland financial and energy plays were among his picks. "If the market comes off even further, we'll buy more."...
 

Expect some European and US jitters - with consequent buying opportunities - to persist into Friday, but without broadspread significant downward pressure. By Monday, the bargain window likely will be closed.
 
 
The market drop today was the worst in 3.5 years, but personally it doesn't bother me all that much as a long-term investor. The DOW dropped 416 points or 3.3%, and the Nasdaq dropped 97 points or 3.9%. This kind of one day shifts are usually overreaction to external readings of foreign markets and activities, and I believe those looking for bargains will bring the market back up to some "balanced" level in the coming days somewhere between the highs and lows of the day.
Our personal investments have done fairly well during the past several years, so that a 3.3% swing in one day doesn't have too much meaning to long term individual investors.
Some pundits earlier in the year predicted that the market will be fine for the rest of this year, with some weakening in 2008, and we know how accurate they are! LOL
 
 
 
Some pundits earlier in the year predicted that the market will be fine for the rest of this year, with some weakening in 2008, and we know how accurate they are! LOL
 

Well, lets take a perspective look at that, c. i. - one day, nor even a week or so, does not a trend make. A year ago, Feb 27, '06, the DJI closed at $11,097.55. On February 27, '07, the close was $12,216.24. Off $412.66 from the open of $12,628.90, yes, but up $137.30 - in less than hour - from its intraday low of $12,078.85, which was set a bit after 3:00 pm. At 2:58 pm, the average was $12,346.02, at 3:01 pm, the day's bottom, $12,078.85 was reached - dropping $267.17, almost 2/3 of the day's total loss in 3 minutes - and by market close at 4:00 pm, the average had managed a solid triple-digit recovery from that bottom to close at $12,216.24 - a triple-digit pickup in less than an hour. Took a lickin', but kept on tickin', wouldn't you say?

Anyhow, back to Feb 27 '06; at market close, the average stood at $11,097.55, $1,118.96 lower than the Feb 27 '07 close, for a 1-Year gain of about 10.1% - spectacular? No, but not too shabby, either, particularly considering the pressures the economy has had to weather over that 1-year period.

The overall 52 week low for that period was $10623.20, set June 14 '07, against which the Feb 27 '07 close represents a nearly 15% gain, over a span of less than 9 months. BTW, 10 years ago, Feb 27 '97, the DJI close was $6,955.48, against which the Feb 27 '07 close represents pretty close to a 76% gain, or in average terms, 7.6% per year - a rate of increase about half that seen over the past 9 months.

Even taking into account some potential for continuation of the current correction, along with factoring in indicators of a "cooling" (or, as some prefer to view it, "stabilizing") economy, the trend doesn't look bad at all, and the trend is built on fundamentals - broad indicators which swing over months, not days, indicators which presently presently don't point to downturn.

A correction is not a cataclysm, its not even a decent trend indicator. Lets see how this plays out over the next 9 months before we score "The Pundits".
 
 
In reality, the manufacturing sector has already been in recession for a quarter or so. It began its decline in late 04.
I think that the concern that the Fed will have to raise rates is out the window. NYT was betting that a cut in the rates will be probable sometime this year.

The S&P had only returned to its pre 2000 levels in January, when it hit 1250 (+/-).
 
 
 
While our economy continues to expand at the cost of higher per person debt in the US, and wages losing ground to inflation, the only miracle I see in our economy is the projection of continued growth and/or stablization. Frankly, I'm not that worried about today's 416 point drop in the DOW, but I am worried about continued growth in our economy while consumer debt continues on its upward spiral.

 

I hope my tea leaves are wrong.
 

In all honesty, I share your concern, and any honest conservative must also share it. Old fashioned conservatism includes fiscal responsibility.

The problem I see is a disconnect between the two party's old philosophies, one being less government, less spending, and less taxes vs more government, more spending, and higher taxes. On top of this, the Democrats and Republicans cannot agree whether or not higher tax rates or lower tax rates will ultimately bring in more tax revenues, and which tact is more favorable to a healthy economy, which in turn influences the economy and tax revenues. The Republicans have a conflict of not going back to their core values of smaller government, as there seems to be a lack of confidence they can be elected if they don't submit to bribing the people as the Democrats do, so the debt continues to grow.

I don't see any way out of this, except for something akin to the "Contract with America" agenda pushed by Gingrich, wherein we can "grow" ourselves out of this hole. I think the changes have to be incremental, not too severe, wherein the shock could be counterproductive. I also think the people need to be awakened out of their attitude, especially government employees that expect raises all the time. I don't expect this to happen easily.
 
 
 
I don't see any way out of this, except for something akin to the "Contract with America" agenda pushed by Gingrich, wherein we can "grow" ourselves out of this hole.
 

We can't grow ourselves out of this debt. Compound interest ensures this.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
i see that the shares for "encana" (one of canada's large energy companies are moving upward again :wink: ).
they are up 1.12 % at noon - and not much below their 52-week high.
GO, ENCANA, GO !
hbg

EnCana Corp. ECA-T Last Trade:Feb 28, 2007 12:00 EST

Last: C$ 56.960 Net Change: C$ +0.630 % Change: + 1.12%
Open 56.010 Bid 56.960
High 57.200 Ask 56.980
Low 56.010 EPS 7.94
Volume 1,492,365 P/E 7.20
52-Week High 62.520 Indicated
Annual Div. 0.93
52-Week Low 44.960 Yield 1.64
 
 
All sound energy companies are doing great in the market, hamburger. Proving oil and gas reserves constitute real solid economic value that is not going to be replaced anytime soon by any faddish movement.
 
 
okie, Your concerns are unique; most Americans do not understand macroeconomics; unsustainable debt levels cannot be sustained in any healthy economy. The "I'm going to buy it today, and pay for it tomorrow" will eventually bite us in the rear end; it's only a matter of time.

Both the dems and repubs are at fault for not addressing this problem from decades ago, but if you see the economic trends between the two parties, you'll see that "everybody" benefited under democrats while only the wealthy gained during the republicans.

What surprises me most about these forums is the continued support by conservatives for their own party while they see the world destroyed around them. We now have over six million more Americans without health insurance; a fifteen percent increase during Bush's six years in office. Middle class income has lost buying power, and many more have fallen into poverty. These realities are a mystery for me when republicans continue to support their party that is doing them harm.

I'm not a liberal, but believe in universal health care. Other than that, I believe in small government, less government intrusions into our lives, and self-sufficiency. I don't believe in cutting taxes when our country is engaged in a war. Wars cost money, and we shouldn't mortgage our children and grandchildren for today's responsibilities.
 
 
 
 
I don't see any way out of this, except for something akin to the "Contract with America" agenda pushed by Gingrich, wherein we can "grow" ourselves out of this hole.
 

We can't grow ourselves out of this debt. Compound interest ensures this.

Cycloptichorn
 

We won't ever grow ourselves completely out of debt, but I believe we can grow ourselves into a position of less comparative debt or more manageable debt as a ratio to our future GDP and overall wealth. Also, I think it is more troublesome to owe a greater portion of our debt to other countries, as compared to owing ourselves.
 
 
 
 
 
I don't see any way out of this, except for something akin to the "Contract with America" agenda pushed by Gingrich, wherein we can "grow" ourselves out of this hole.
 

We can't grow ourselves out of this debt. Compound interest ensures this.

Cycloptichorn
 

We won't ever grow ourselves completely out of debt, but I believe we can grow ourselves into a position of less comparative debt or more manageable debt as a ratio to our future GDP and overall wealth. Also, I think it is more troublesome to owe a greater portion of our debt to other countries, as compared to owing ourselves.
 

We can't grow our society at a rate greater than the interest on the debt adds more to the principle; we've moved past that point.

This is especially compounded by the fact that we have to make ever-increasing service payments on the debt in real-time. This means that a greater and greater percentage of our GDP goes to paying interest, which hurts our chances of growth. Now, if we don't actually pay the interest, but take out more loans to cover it - we get the situation we have today, but worse.

There is no scenario for reducing the level of debt which does not involve raised taxes. You should get ready for them, Okie, because they are coming.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie, Not really. Other countries owning our debt makes it more secure, because they can't afford to flood the market with those bonds. If they try to rid themselves of those bonds, prices will drop, and the remaining bonds they hold will lose value. When that happens, the US currency also losses value, and the balance of trade benefits the US.
 
 
 
What surprises me most about these forums is the continued support by conservatives for their own party while they see the world destroyed around them. We now have over six million more Americans without health insurance; a fifteen percent increase during Bush's six years in office. Middle class income has lost buying power, and many more have fallen into poverty. These realities are a mystery for me when republicans continue to support their party that is doing them harm.

I'm not a liberal, but believe in universal health care. Other than that, I believe in small government, less government intrusions into our lives, and self-sufficiency. I don't believe in cutting taxes when our country is engaged in a war. Wars cost money, and we shouldn't mortgage our children and grandchildren for today's responsibilities.
 

I think you have more issues swirling around here than how you frame it, cicerone. First of all, most conservatives do not support increased domestic spending by Bush. Example, education. The reason I support Bush is not because of his budgetary policies, but I simply see him as the lesser of two evils. I could not buy Gore because I saw him as almost a nut on many counts, and Kerry I saw as an arrogant and naive New England snob. Neither of those guys understand the realities of the world in terms of the threats, energy, and economics, in my opinion.

I understand wars cost money, but I see national defense as the number one priority here. I have always explained I teetered on whether Iraq was wise, but now that we are there, I think it unwise to pull the rug out from under Bush for political purposes. I do not think wars will break us as much as I think our own domestic social spending plays a bigger part in breaking our economic backs. To balance that, I don't believe we can afford any more wars right now. We have our hands full, but we need to band together and see this through in Iraq, rather than beating each other up over it. After all, Congress voted for the authorization of force, and they should have the moral gumption to admit it instead of trying to frame Bush making it all up on his own, which is a crock. Such Democratic antics has and is continuing to be a huge turnoff, as it is nothing more than pure political posturing and hypocrisy.

Also, economic trends and buying power have alot more influences than who happens to be president. Industries going abroad was a trend that started decades ago. We live in a world market, and the truth is we are living higher here than the market justifies in a world of competition now. The trends we see are a product of this free market making adjustments to us and our lifestyle. We need to see the bigger picture instead of blaming a president for it.
 
 
 
There is no scenario for reducing the level of debt which does not involve raised taxes. You should get ready for them, Okie, because they are coming.

Cycloptichorn
 

Just remember there is such a thing as the Laffer curve, cyclops. We may still be below the peak, however a raise in tax rates may not bring in nearly as much increased tax revenues as expected by Democrats, and there is a real danger of tax increases throwing our economy into a tailspin.
 
 
 
 
There is no scenario for reducing the level of debt which does not involve raised taxes. You should get ready for them, Okie, because they are coming.

Cycloptichorn
 

Just remember there is such a thing as the Laffer curve, cyclops. We may still be below the peak, however a raise in tax rates may not bring in nearly as much increased tax revenues as expected by Democrats, and there is a real danger of tax increases throwing our economy into a tailspin.
 

Bull. We've been through this over and over. The 'laffer curve' is a theory which has nothing to do with the actuality of life at all. It's merely a cute number game.

Do you disagree with the statement that taxes must be raised in order to begin servicing the debt? If so, I'd like you to show how we can grow our economy faster than the debt service payments have been growing year-over-year.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
As a portion of our economy or worth, the national debt doesn't appear to be radically worse now than ever.

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:National_debt_as_a_%25_of_gdp.jpg 

And when I said we could grow ourselves out of the hole or to a better postion, I advocate reducing spending growth vs increasing taxes.

The Laffer curve was debated extensively on another thread I started, and I think I won the debate, although the opponents would not admit it.
 
 
okie, You have it all wrong; Americans want to pull the rug out from under Bush because our soldiers are getting killed and maimed for a goal long lost to too many justifications that have never come true. It's not about "politics." There has never been a "solution" for Bush's war except "more of the same." But for you, it's still "politics." You must learn to listen to the American People; something Bush fails to do.
 
 
Bull. The American people were heard. They elected representatives to go to Washington, and they voted for the authorization to use force. Cicerone, this country is not run by media polls or Hollywood, it is run by the government we elect, thankfully.
 
 
okie, You can't look at historical debt levels and say we can work outselves of of this "one." Today's economy is not the same as the past; world competition is upon us, and that's not going to change any time soon. Americans are earning less with more debt. If you look at income potential during past periods of debt vs today's income potential, you'll see that more middle class families are falling into poverty - with increased debt. Big difference - whether you wish to acknowledge that or not.
 
 
 
As a portion of our economy or worth, the national debt doesn't appear to be radically worse now than ever.

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:National_debt_as_a_%25_of_gdp.jpg 

And when I said we could grow ourselves out of the hole or to a better postion, I advocate reducing spending growth vs increasing taxes.

The Laffer curve was debated extensively on another thread I started, and I think I won the debate, although the opponents would not admit it.
 

You may think you won the debate, but you conclusively lost. You were trounced. As one of your opponents, I guess it's necessary to remind you that you couldn't provide any actual evidence to support the Laffer curve; only repeat the theory over and over again. When shown evidence that it wasn't true, you discounted it but did not discredit it.

Do we need to go through it again? I'd be more than happy to do so. I will state for the record that the Laffer curve doesn't exist outside of theory and has no utility in setting nor predicting the effect of rates of taxation whatsoever. You cannot show that it does, as evidenced in the other thread.

I understand that there are ways of looking at the debt that show our economy has risen as well; but the debt never, ever, ever, ever goes away, no matter how good or bad our economy is doing. That's the problem with the idea of 'growing out' of debt; you can't grow indefinitely, and surely not higher than the rate of interest payments. Your debt on the other hand most certainly does grow indefinately.

I'm sure that a fair and valid position on cutting spending to reduce the debt that we have includes major cuts to military spending, our number on budget item. Correct?

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie, Congress authorized the use of force after this administration provided lies about WMDs. After no WMDs were found, this admnistration changed their justification for the war from WMDs to get rid of Saddam and bring democracy to the Middle East.

Elections does not a democracy make. Can you spell "civil war?"
 
 
Only an absolute mathematical idiot would deny the Laffer curve. If tax rates are 0, you take in no tax money, and if it is 100%, you take in very little, and in the middle you take in more. You draw the curve, cyclops, if you are capable of simple thinking. This argument absolutely befuddles me because it is so simple. I am not asserting the curve looks exactly as Laffer drew it on a napkin, but neither did Laffer. The general concept has to be true, and all we need to argue about is where the peak is.
 
 
 
okie, Congress authorized the use of force after this administration provided lies about WMDs. After no WMDs were found, this admnistration changed their justification for the war from WMDs to get rid of Saddam and bring democracy to the Middle East.

Elections does not a democracy make. Can you spell "civil war?"
 

Cicerone, even Hillary says she personally talked to intelligence people to find out if Bush was misleading her, and she agreed with Bush. Do we have to re-plow this ridiculous field of controversy over and over. We will just need to agree to disagree.
 
 
 
Only an absolute mathematical idiot would deny the Laffer curve. If tax rates are 0, you take in no tax money, and if it is 100%, you take in very little, and in the middle you take in more. You draw the curve, cyclops, if you are capable of simple thinking. This argument absolutely befuddles me because it is so simple. I am not asserting the curve looks exactly as Laffer drew it on a napkin, but neither did Laffer. The general concept has to be true, and all we need to argue about is where the peak is.
 

I'm sorry, but you show your main error here:

 
The general concept has to be true
 

No, it doesn't. This false assumption is coloring your whole argument.

This has been shown to you many times, but I'll do it again - if it's necessary.

The secondary error - after assuming something MUST be true, but failing to actually have any real-world evidence to back it up - is in assuming that this non-existent curve tells us anything at all about the real world situation we find ourselves in.

Now, my earlier question: I'm sure that a fair and valid position on cutting spending to reduce the debt that we have includes major cuts to military spending, our number one budget item. Correct?

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie, How interesting that Hillary talked to the intel people, but failed to share that info with her democratic colleagues.

Here's first hand info from a CIA agent (reported by CBS News):

Drumheller was the CIA's top man in Europe, the head of covert operations there, until he retired a year ago. He says he saw firsthand how the White House promoted intelligence it liked and ignored intelligence it didn't:

"The idea of going after Iraq was U.S. policy. It was going to happen one way or the other," says Drumheller.
 
 
From the same CBS News report:

Meanwhile, the CIA had made a major intelligence breakthrough on Iraq's nuclear program. Naji Sabri, Iraq's foreign minister, had made a deal to reveal Iraq's military secrets to the CIA. Drumheller was in charge of the operation.

"This was a very high inner circle of Saddam Hussein. Someone who would know what he was talking about," Drumheller says.

"You knew you could trust this guy?" Bradley asked.

"We continued to validate him the whole way through," Drumheller replied.

According to Drumheller, CIA Director George Tenet delivered the news about the Iraqi foreign minister at a high-level meeting at the White House, including the president, the vice president and Secretary of State Rice.

At that meeting, Drumheller says, "They were enthusiastic because they said, they were excited that we had a high-level penetration of Iraqis."

What did this high-level source tell him?

"He told us that they had no active weapons of mass destruction program," says Drumheller.

"So in the fall of 2002, before going to war, we had it on good authority from a source within Saddam's inner circle that he didn't have an active program for weapons of mass destruction?" Bradley asked.

"Yes," Drumheller replied. He says there was doubt in his mind at all.

"It directly contradicts, though, what the president and his staff were telling us," Bradley remarked.

"The policy was set," Drumheller says. "The war in Iraq was coming. And they were looking for intelligence to fit into the policy, to justify the policy."
 
 
 
 
Only an absolute mathematical idiot would deny the Laffer curve. If tax rates are 0, you take in no tax money, and if it is 100%, you take in very little, and in the middle you take in more. You draw the curve, cyclops, if you are capable of simple thinking. This argument absolutely befuddles me because it is so simple. I am not asserting the curve looks exactly as Laffer drew it on a napkin, but neither did Laffer. The general concept has to be true, and all we need to argue about is where the peak is.
 

I'm sorry, but you show your main error here:

 
The general concept has to be true
 

No, it doesn't. This false assumption is coloring your whole argument.

This has been shown to you many times, but I'll do it again - if it's necessary.

The secondary error - after assuming something MUST be true, but failing to actually have any real-world evidence to back it up - is in assuming that this non-existent curve tells us anything at all about the real world situation we find ourselves in.

Now, my earlier question: I'm sure that a fair and valid position on cutting spending to reduce the debt that we have includes major cuts to military spending, our number one budget item. Correct?

Cycloptichorn
 

Okay, let us see if we can solve this once and for all.
How much tax is collected if the tax rate was 0%. Do not use the argument that there is no real world example. We don't need any. There is none because all governments realize they would take in no money, so the answer is what, cyclops? If you need a clue as to how to solve the equation, multiply any number by 0 and see what you get.

Now, what tax revenues result from a 100% tax of an economy does take a little bit of thinking and estimation, a little more than the first question, but not much more. There are pretty solid real world examples of what happens to an economy when a government allows no direct rewards to people according to how hard they work. A hint to this would be to check out what the gdp of North Korea is to South Korea, then compare the revenues extracted from the economy of North Korea to South Korea, and look at the tax rate of South Korea and the essential revenue extraction rate of North Korea, which would be roughly equatable to the tax revenues for South Korea. In very approximate terms as applied to a Laffer curve for any country, how does 50% of 100% compare with 100% of 10%? Are they even close? Is this even debatable?
 
 
 
Do not use the argument that there is no real world example. We don't need any.
 

WRONG! If you purport to use a theory to explain and predict real-world situations, you'd better damn well have real-world examples.

Otherwise, I'm sure you would agree that all the AGW theories are sound and built on good science. You are essentially arguing their side of the theory, but in economic terms.

My contention has never been that you couldn't do some math to come up with some numbers, Okie; it has been that this math and these numbers bear no relation to real life whatsoever, and are not useful at all in predicting or planning tax policy.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie wrote: How much tax is collected if the tax rate was 0%.

okie et al will never see the ridiculous statements they post that are not only ignorant, but removed from total reality. Where does these people come from?
 
 
Has anyone ever claimed it was feasible? You guys are hilarious.

Try this question. How much does somebody make if they work for free, or $0.00 per hour pay rate? After 8 hours, how much does that person make in wages? Try the math. It isn't that hard.
 
 
 
Has anyone ever claimed it was feasible? You guys are hilarious.
 

Claimed what was feasible?

Using the laffer curve to predict taxation rates and their effects? That's your claim, right?

 
Try this question. How much does somebody make if they work for free, or $0.00 per hour pay rate? After 8 hours, how much does that person make in wages? Try the math. It isn't that hard.
 

As I said above - which you refuse to acknowledge - it isn't that the math is hard, it is that the math has no utility nor resemblance to the actual economic situation in question, no matter what set of numbers you choose to use in your example.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
 
Has anyone ever claimed it was feasible? You guys are hilarious.
 

Claimed what was feasible?
 

You are playing dumb now. 0% tax rate is the "what."

 
Using the laffer curve to predict taxation rates and their effects? That's your claim, right?

Cycloptichorn
 

It is my claim that a curve exists with a peak tax revenue somewhere between 0% and 100% tax rate. I do not believe Laffer drew the curve to assert what exact shape or at what number the peak existed at, only that a curve existed in the general shape drawn. If people would get over their stupidity over such a simple concept, then perhaps we could intelligently argue about what the curve more exactly looked like at any particular point in time. I doubt we could ever agree on the details, but it would be far better than disagreeing over a general concept that is pretty much obvious to anyone with a brain.
 
 
 
 
 
Has anyone ever claimed it was feasible? You guys are hilarious.
 

Claimed what was feasible?
 

You are playing dumb now. 0% tax rate is the "what."

 
Using the laffer curve to predict taxation rates and their effects? That's your claim, right?

Cycloptichorn
 

It is my claim that a curve exists with a peak tax revenue somewhere between 0% and 100% tax rate. I do not believe Laffer drew the curve to assert what exact shape or at what number the peak existed at, only that a curve existed in the general shape drawn. If people would get over their stupidity over such a simple concept, then perhaps we could intelligently argue about what the curve more exactly looked like at any particular point in time.
 

Noone has ever claimed that the concept that you've described doesn't work neatly in theoretical terms - just that it has nothing to do with actual economic conditions.

It has no use as either an explanatory tool nor a predictive one. It cannot be replicated using any data set or any historical data set. So what's the point of talking about it?

Here you say -

 
perhaps we could intelligently argue about what the curve more exactly looked like at any particular point in time.
 

There is no intelligent discussion possible about 'what the curve looks like.' It doesn't 'look' like anything, and it doesn't change no matter what the real-world situation is. There is no way to provide any accurate data points to plug in and no way to model the actual effects of changing rates of taxation. It's a useless exercise.

You added this

[quoteI doubt we could ever agree on the details, but it would be far better than disagreeing over a general concept that is pretty much obvious to anyone with a brain.[/quote]

Tell me, why do no economists take this theory seriously? Why can't this theory be replicated by historical data sets? Why can't we use it as a predictive tool? Because the theory sucks, and it isn't the people who disagree with using it to discuss and explain taxation who are 'without a brain,' Okie.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
Noone has ever claimed that the concept that you've described doesn't work neatly in theoretical terms - just that it has nothing to do with actual economic conditions.

It has no use as either an explanatory tool nor a predictive one. It cannot be replicated using any data set or any historical data set. So what's the point of talking about it?
 

I think you are dead wrong. Politicians talk about this all the time, although in different terms. The debate rages, some predict lower revenues through lower tax rates while others predict higher revenues, and some predict lower revenues with higher rates while some predict higher. Some demonize Bush's tax rate cuts, while others praise it, obviously for different reasons and motivations, but behind it all is always how tax revenues are affected as one part of the issue. It isn't called the Laffer curve, but that is the concept this is all dealing with. Nobody is claiming the peak tax revenue point on the curve is established for sure, and nobody that I know of claims that point is static through time. The big point I am asserting here that if everyone would acknowledge the obvious, that a curve does exist, then we could all get on the same page and go to the next step, and argue over what is the optimum tax rate for both government and the economy, and us, the citizens, at any particular time.

It seems to me that politicians should graduate from kindergarten and openly admit to some simple principles, and this should be one of them.

 
Here you say -

 
perhaps we could intelligently argue about what the curve more exactly looked like at any particular point in time.
 

There is no intelligent discussion possible about 'what the curve looks like.' It doesn't 'look' like anything, and it doesn't change no matter what the real-world situation is. There is no way to provide any accurate data points to plug in and no way to model the actual effects of changing rates of taxation. It's a useless exercise.

You added this

 
I doubt we could ever agree on the details, but it would be far better than disagreeing over a general concept that is pretty much obvious to anyone with a brain.
 

Tell me, why do no economists take this theory seriously? Why can't this theory be replicated by historical data sets? Why can't we use it as a predictive tool? Because the theory sucks, and it isn't the people who disagree with using it to discuss and explain taxation who are 'without a brain,' Okie.

Cycloptichorn
 

The theory does not suck, and I would say that you are dead wrong when you say no economist takes the theory seriously. They may not call it the Laffer curve, but I would think any serious economist must take very seriously how tax rates may affect the economy, and ultimately tax revenues. If they do not, we are in bigger trouble than I ever thought possible. And you would then have to un-vindicate JFK's tax policies and Reagan's tax policies as well, which would not sit too well with the actual numbers.
 
 
"Lower tax rates" never equals to "zero (0)" tax rate - not even in any discussions by the government or the public. They all understand (except some people) that talking about a zero tax rate is a waste of time.

Show us evidence where any government has talked about a zero tax rate?
 
 
Okie,

 
The big point I am asserting here that if everyone would acknowledge the obvious, that a curve does exist
 

IT IS NOT OBVIOUS that such a curve exists. Stop repeating that it is!

Here's an extremely simple explanation of why not: a curve exists when you have two axes, X - Y, and a set of data which falls in them either over time or other changing conditions. When you plot those points, you get a 'curve' or a set of data points which do not scale linearly but non-linearly according to various factors.

But, when it comes to taxation, it isn't just X-Y that affects revenue. There aren't just two axises to look at. It's more like X-Y-Z-A-7-G-H-I-O-3-F. There are hundreds of different factors which effect the level of revenue that a certain level of taxation will bring in, each requiring its' own axis of measurement. It becomes impossible to graph, let alone understand, and impossible to use as a model for discussion and prediction of actions.

You are attempting to posit a simple way of looking at a problem which is unbelievably complicated. The problem with this approach is it leads to super-overly-simplified answers which are flat-out wrong.

The whole point of keeping the Laffer curve out of economic discussions isn't to keep anyone down, it's because the curve isn't an economic model for predicting anything. It's an economic model for rationalizing giving more money to the rich, and that's it. It is a theory with no actual use in the real world.

Like I said earlier - you are taking the same position as the AGW people you claim to dislike, except in economic terms. They can show you well-designed models which also don't happen to add up to reality. In fact, remember the 'hockey stick?' Can you say, hello Laffer Curve?

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
IT IS NOT OBVIOUS that such a curve exists. Stop repeating that it is!

Cycloptichorn
 

Well, we will just have to disagree. To say it does not exist is to assert the economy is static, no matter the tax rate, which I think is ridiculous. That is akin to saying the economy is static, no matter the interest rate, or no matter the price of oil, or no matter the inflation rate, or no matter lots of things.

Government has this arrogant and condescending attitude that they are above, or somehow apart from the rest of us that makes the economy what it is, and they can simply tax us at whatever rate they wish, and it has no effect on what we do and how hard we do it. And somehow they are exempt from the same principles that govern the economy. The fact is the government is a very big part of the economy, especially in terms of bleeding it, and to a smaller extent in providing things for us, such as police protection, defense, roads, and other things.

And like government, liberals have adopted a similar attitude, that tax rates, and whatever the government does is a world unto itself, apart from the realities of the free market, and it has no relationship whatever. Somehow, the root philosophy or idealistic view of the world places blinders on their mindset, so that they are unable to see reality for what it is. If you ever took calculus, you would understand that virtually every relationship can be defined by some kind of curve.
 
 
 
 
IT IS NOT OBVIOUS that such a curve exists. Stop repeating that it is!

Cycloptichorn
 

Well, we will just have to disagree. To say it does not exist is to assert the economy is static, no matter the tax rate, which I think is ridiculous. That is akin to saying the economy is static, no matter the interest rate, or no matter the price of oil, or no matter the inflation rate, or no matter lots of things.

Government has this arrogant and condescending attitude that they are above, or somehow apart from the rest of us that makes the economy what it is, and they can simply tax us at whatever rate they wish, and it has no effect on what we do and how hard we do it. And somehow they are exempt from the same principles that govern the economy. The fact is the government is a very big part of the economy, especially in terms of bleeding it, and to a smaller extent in providing things for us, such as police protection, defense, roads, and other things.

And like government, liberals have adopted a similar attitude, that tax rates, and whatever the government does is a world unto itself, apart from the realities of the free market, and it has no relationship whatever. If you ever took calculus, you would understand that virtually every relationship can be defined by some kind of curve.
 

Sigh, here

 
Well, we will just have to disagree. To say it does not exist is to assert the economy is static, no matter the tax rate, which I think is ridiculous. That is akin to saying the economy is static, no matter the interest rate, or no matter the price of oil, or no matter the inflation rate, or no matter lots of things.

 

The economy of course isn't static; the only argument I have made is that the data points with which you could plot the economy and how changes will affect it, don't make a 'curve' at all. It only makes a curve if you ignore many other significant factors and just focus on taxation, and that's it. But in doing so you lose any ability to see what's actually happening or predict what will actually happen.

The contention the entire time has never been that you couldn't do math, Okie, or that a curve of some sort couldn't be drawn according to a set of data points; the contention is that the resulting curve is useless for describing reality.

Cheers

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
The whole point of keeping the Laffer curve out of economic discussions isn't to keep anyone down, it's because the curve isn't an economic model for predicting anything. It's an economic model for rationalizing giving more money to the rich, and that's it. It is a theory with no actual use in the real world.
 

Judging by your confident statements about what is and what isn't a usable economic model, you must have worked through an economics textbook by now. May I ask which one it is?
 
 
cyclops, if there is a relationship between the sun's relative energy levels and earth's temperatures, scientists will attempt to quantify the relationship and draw curves and graphs to demonstrate the relationship. This does not preclude the fact that the temperature is also affected by many other relationships and factors. Just because there are many factors does not keep us from trying to determine the extent of the effect of a single factor, each one as we study it. Nobody is stupid enough to believe the science is perfect or the answer is static, but I believe it is stupid to ignore a relationship or not attempt to quantify it simply because there may also be other factors.

Another great example is medical studies, wherein new medications or treatments are evaluated. No two patients are the same, and each patient has other factors influencing the outcomes, but scientists still attempt to isolate and quantify single relationships between two factors, a disease and a treatment. Wake up. This is what science is about. The economy is not exactly science, but it does lend itself to numbers, and is defined by numbers that define relationships and effects, which is a science.
 
 
 
 
The whole point of keeping the Laffer curve out of economic discussions isn't to keep anyone down, it's because the curve isn't an economic model for predicting anything. It's an economic model for rationalizing giving more money to the rich, and that's it. It is a theory with no actual use in the real world.
 

Judging by your confident statements about what is and what isn't a usable economic model, you must have worked through an economics textbook by now. May I ask which one it is?
 

After our previous discussions on the matter, I found myself doing exactly that, and found this -

 http://gregmankiw.blogspot.com/2006/05/summer-reading-list.html 

 
Wednesday, May 10, 2006
Summer Reading List

A student emails me asking for a summer reading list. Here are ten very different books I like that are fun enough that you would not be embarrassed (well, not too embarrassed) reading them at the beach:

* Milton Friedman, Capitalism and Freedom
* Robert Heilbroner, The Worldly Philosophers
* Paul Krugman, Peddling Prosperity
* Steven Landsburg, The Armchair Economist
* P.J. O'Rourke, Eat the Rich
* Burton Malkiel, A Random Walk Down Wall Street
* Avinash Dixit and Barry Nalebuff, Thinking Strategically
* Steven Levitt and Stephen Dubner, Freakonomics
* John McMillan, Reinventing the Bazaar
* William Breit and Barry T. Hirsch, Lives of the Laureates
 

I've been going down the list; loved Friedman (though I don't always agree with his conclusions) and Heilbroner reminded me of my undergrad Econ. professor; I'm in the middle of Krugman right now which is a little cheating, as I'm quite familiar with his writing and arguments; feels more familiar than new. Oh yeah I've been studying up on ol' Adam Smith as well...

Any suggestions to add on to the reading list? I'm interspersing them with scifi novels, so it'll take a while to get to the end.

Cheers

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
cyclops, if there is a relationship between the sun's relative energy levels and earth's temperatures, scientists will attempt to quantify the relationship and draw curves and graphs to demonstrate the relationship. This does not preclude the fact that the temperature is also affected by many other relationships and factors. Just because there are many factors does not keep us from trying to determine the extent of the effect of a single factor, each one as we study it. Nobody is stupid enough to believe the science is perfect or the answer is static, but I believe it is stupid to ignore a relationship or not attempt to quantify it simply because there may also be other factors.

Another great example is medical studies, wherein new medications or treatments are evaluated. No two patients are the same, and each patient has other factors influencing the outcomes, but scientists still attempt to isolate and quantify single relationships between two factors, a disease and a treatment. Wake up. This is what science is about. The economy is not exactly science, but it does lend itself to numbers, and is defined by numbers that define relationships and effects, which is a science.
 

None of that is incorrect.

Now, answer the question: what predictive value do individual statistics add to models of complicated systems? How about on their own - can an individual statistic give you accurate predictions about a highly complicated system, regardless of knowing any other factors?

Cycloptichorn
 
 
42% increase in home loan defaults since one year ago.
 
 
 
Now, answer the question: what predictive value do individual statistics add to models of complicated systems? How about on their own - can an individual statistic give you accurate predictions about a highly complicated system, regardless of knowing any other factors?

Cycloptichorn
 

I would think they have tremendous and crucial value. In other words, what effect does the cost of rafters, or shingles, or siding, have individually on the overall effect of the total cost of a house. You must first attempt to quantify the effect of the rise in cost of shingles, or the rise in cost of siding, is first, then you can factor it in along with all the other factors in an attempt to see the overall picture.

I thought of another example to try to illustrate this debate. If you had 10 people thrown into a project, each one having his own skills, priorities, ambitions, and considerations in accomplishing a project. One of those people represents government. As those ten people meet, discuss, allocate, negotiate, and compromise in terms of what each one spends and does to accomplish the project, a workable and balanced solution comes together for the good of all. If in this case, you have one person that insists their skills, ambitions, job, and budget has no relationship to the others, so they stand outside the circle of the other 9 people, then after the other 9 come up with a balanced plan, the tenth guy comes in, grabs the plan and budget and says, okay guys, I am taking 30% of the budget to do whatever I need to do, now get lost and get started with the project, as if the 30% has no impact on the 9 other guys. The 9 other people will get started alright, but to the surprise of the 10th person, 6 months later the 9 people come back with only half of their job finished.

The problem arose because the 10th guy, which is government claims that it can take whatever money it wants and the rest of the money is not affected whatsoever. That is a huge problem, and I think it is one of the principle problems we have right now in government.
 
 
 
After our previous discussions on the matter, I found myself doing exactly that, and found this -
 

Congratulations! It's an ambitious, politically diverse, and (I think) enjoyable reading list.

 
Any suggestions to add on to the reading list? I'm interspersing them with scifi novels, so it'll take a while to get to the end.
 

Since Mankiw was too modest to put his own books on the list, I'd suggest his "Principles of Economics", particularly the first edition. I recommend the first edition for two reasons: 1) the current edition is the third, so the first one is pretty inexpensive (and not that different from the third). 2) The major difference to more recent editions is that in the first editions, he didn't need to worry about offending Republican politicians, so he was free to call supply-siders "charlatans and cranks" selling you "snake oil". Mankiv also debunks it with the right argument: he doesn't say there is no Laffer curve, but that it's foolish to believe that current tax rates put America on the wrong side of the curve. (Krugman makes the same point in Peddling Prosperity.)

I think you'd also enjoy Krugman and Wells's Economics. Comparing it with Mankiw gives you an idea where conservative and liberal economists disagree. And that's surprisingly little.

 
I'm interspersing them with scifi novels, so it'll take a while to get to the end.
 

This reminds me: A couple of weeks ago, you told me it was Asimov who said that the people who most want to govern are, by definition, the ones least suited to do it. You also identified the story in which he wrote that. Back then, I searched for the story on Amazon and didn't find it in a Book that contained it. Could you tell me the title of the story again, and the book you read it in?
 
 
 
 
Now, answer the question: what predictive value do individual statistics add to models of complicated systems? How about on their own - can an individual statistic give you accurate predictions about a highly complicated system, regardless of knowing any other factors?

Cycloptichorn
 

I would think they have tremendous and crucial value. In other words, what effect does the cost of rafters, or shingles, or siding, have individually on the overall effect of the total cost of a house. You must first attempt to quantify the effect of the rise in cost of shingles, or the rise in cost of siding, is first, then you can factor it in along with all the other factors in an attempt to see the overall picture.

I thought of another example to try to illustrate this debate. If you had 10 people thrown into a project, each one having his own skills, priorities, ambitions, and considerations in accomplishing a project. One of those people represents government. As those ten people meet, discuss, allocate, negotiate, and compromise in terms of what each one spends and does to accomplish the project, a workable and balanced solution comes together for the good of all. If in this case, you have one person that insists their skills, ambitions, job, and budget has no relationship to the others, so they stand outside the circle of the other 9 people, then after the other 9 come up with a balanced plan, the tenth guy comes in, grabs the plan and budget and says, okay guys, I am taking 30% of the budget to do whatever I need to do, now get lost and get started with the project, as if the 30% has no impact on the 9 other guys. The 9 other people will get started alright, but to the surprise of the 10th person, 6 months later the 9 people come back with only half of their job finished.

The problem arose because the 10th guy, which is government claims that it can take whatever money it wants and the rest of the money is not affected whatsoever. That is a huge problem, and I think it is one of the principle problems we have right now in government.
 

No offense, but that's a terrible example for what we're talking about. I understand that you have gripes about government, but we aren't talking about government at all; we're talking about the predictive ability of individual statistics on complicated systems.

Look at it this way - Let's say you saw a guy who was fat, and stated 'if he eats less food, he'll get thinner.' On the surface, it looks like a very pat answer.

But, what if he has thyroid problems which lead to his obesity?
What if he has digestive problems?
What if he eats only a little food, but it is high-fat and high-calorie food?

Any one of these factors will affect his weight. When charting the predictive effects of 'eating less food,' you can come up with a curve, sure; but without accounting for dozens of other factors, you cannot make an accurate prediction about the effects of any course of action you advocate!

It's a logical trap, Okie - attempting to explain highly complicated situations with very simple formulas, and what's worse, attempting to make any prediction based upon it.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
 
After our previous discussions on the matter, I found myself doing exactly that, and found this -
 

Congratulations! It's an ambitious, politically diverse, and (I think) enjoyable reading list.

 
Any suggestions to add on to the reading list? I'm interspersing them with scifi novels, so it'll take a while to get to the end.
 

Since Mankiw was too modest to put his own books on the list, I'd suggest his "Principles of Economics", particularly the first edition. I recommend the first edition for two reasons: 1) the current edition is the third, so the first one is pretty inexpensive (and not that different from the third). 2) The major difference to more recent editions is that in the first editions, he didn't need to worry about offending Republican politicians, so he was free to call supply-siders "charlatans and cranks" selling you "snake oil". Mankiv also debunks it with the right argument: he doesn't say there is no Laffer curve, but that it's foolish to believe that current tax rates put America on the wrong side of the curve. (Krugman makes the same point in Peddling Prosperity.)

I think you'd also enjoy Krugman and Wells's Economics. Comparing it with Mankiw gives you an idea where conservative and liberal economists disagree. And that's surprisingly little.

 
I'm interspersing them with scifi novels, so it'll take a while to get to the end.
 

This reminds me: A couple of weeks ago, you told me it was Asimov who said that the people who most want to govern are, by definition, the ones least suited to do it. You also identified the story in which he wrote that. Back then, I searched for the story on Amazon and didn't find it in a Book that contained it. Could you tell me the title of the story again, and the book you read it in?
 

Yeah! Let me search.

Noone ever wants to talk scifi in the books thread - but I am happy about the fact that I'm only 11 books away from a complete (mostly complete, I'm sure there's hidden stuff) Asimov print run! Whee!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
No offense, but that's a terrible example for what we're talking about. I understand that you have gripes about government, but we aren't talking about government at all; we're talking about the predictive ability of individual statistics on complicated systems.

Look at it this way - Let's say you saw a guy who was fat, and stated 'if he eats less food, he'll get thinner.' On the surface, it looks like a very pat answer.

But, what if he has thyroid problems which lead to his obesity?
What if he has digestive problems?
What if he eats only a little food, but it is high-fat and high-calorie food?

Any one of these factors will affect his weight. When charting the predictive effects of 'eating less food,' you can come up with a curve, sure; but without accounting for dozens of other factors, you cannot make an accurate prediction about the effects of any course of action you advocate!

It's a logical trap, Okie - attempting to explain highly complicated situations with very simple formulas, and what's worse, attempting to make any prediction based upon it.

Cycloptichorn
 

Thanks for a slow fastball right down the middle, cyclops.

Government is part of the economic system, whether they wish to acknowledge it or not, and the lack of acknowledgement is what this discussion is all about.

Sorry, but if someone is fat, I think it is a safe bet that eating less food will in fact make him thinner, as compared to recommending that he eat more food. I would put my money on that one. I would also find out from the doctor if he had a thyroid problem to factor into the graph of expected results, and if any other factors, I would do the same. After doing my homework, I could feel good about going to the person and making a fairly intelligent recommendation, probably it would include eating less food, probably especially high calorie food, which probably fits government.
 
 
 
 
No offense, but that's a terrible example for what we're talking about. I understand that you have gripes about government, but we aren't talking about government at all; we're talking about the predictive ability of individual statistics on complicated systems.

Look at it this way - Let's say you saw a guy who was fat, and stated 'if he eats less food, he'll get thinner.' On the surface, it looks like a very pat answer.

But, what if he has thyroid problems which lead to his obesity?
What if he has digestive problems?
What if he eats only a little food, but it is high-fat and high-calorie food?

Any one of these factors will affect his weight. When charting the predictive effects of 'eating less food,' you can come up with a curve, sure; but without accounting for dozens of other factors, you cannot make an accurate prediction about the effects of any course of action you advocate!

It's a logical trap, Okie - attempting to explain highly complicated situations with very simple formulas, and what's worse, attempting to make any prediction based upon it.

Cycloptichorn
 

Thanks for a slow fastball right down the middle, cyclops.

Government is part of the economic system, whether they wish to acknowledge it or not, and the lack of acknowledgement is what this discussion is all about.

Sorry, but if someone is fat, I think it is a safe bet that eating less food will in fact make him thinner, as compared to recommending that he eat more food. I would put my money on that one. I would also find out from the doctor if he had a thyroid problem to factor into the graph of expected results, and if any other factors, I would do the same. After doing my homework, I could feel good about going to the person and making a fairly intelligent recommendation, probably it would include eating less food, probably especially high calorie food, which probably fits government.
 

Right, you're getting it now!

Here's the money line -

I would also find out from the doctor if he had a thyroid problem to factor into the graph of expected results, and if any other factors, I would do the same.

In order to make an intelligent recommendation about the economy, do you feel it is necessary to add in additional factors to the equation?

This is 100% my contention - that without studying the additional factors, an examination of the rate of taxation is useless as a predictive tool.

Before you recommend to change the level of taxation one way or another, you must take other factors into account. These other factors can change the situation drastically; if taxation is at 30%, and other factors differ, then raising taxes will or will not necessarily lead to more revenues, and this can change quickly depending on the rate of change of other factors besides level of taxation.

Remember that my whole gripe is about the utility of single factors in predictions!!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Thomas,

The name of the story is Evidence, about a robot posing as a man who attempts to run for mayor, and the attempts to uncover him.

It is contained in the venerable I, Robot and also The Complete Robot, both still in print I believe.

Before you rush out and buy it, please let me re-read that story tonight - to make sure the wording actually matches as well as my memories suggest that it does!

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
Thomas,

The name of the story is Evidence, about a robot posing as a man who attempts to run for mayor, and the attempts to uncover him.

It is contained in the venerable I, Robot and also The Complete Robot, both still in print I believe.
 

Cool -- thanks a lot!
 
 
 
Right, you're getting it now!

Here's the money line -

I would also find out from the doctor if he had a thyroid problem to factor into the graph of expected results, and if any other factors, I would do the same.

In order to make an intelligent recommendation about the economy, do you feel it is necessary to add in additional factors to the equation?

This is 100% my contention - that without studying the additional factors, an examination of the rate of taxation is useless as a predictive tool.
 

Have we wasted how many dozens of pages over this issue to finally get to this? Where have I EVER suggested we ignore all other factors besides tax rates. All I have ever done here is to argue that the effect of tax rates on the economy, and thus ultimately on tax revenues, simply be added to the mix of factors to be considered. To this suggestion, I have been ridiculed and accused of being an idiot concerning economics.

 
Before you recommend to change the level of taxation one way or another, you must take other factors into account. These other factors can change the situation drastically; if taxation is at 30%, and other factors differ, then raising taxes will or will not necessarily lead to more revenues, and this can change quickly depending on the rate of change of other factors besides level of taxation.

Remember that my whole gripe is about the utility of single factors in predictions!!

Cycloptichorn
 

I do not disagree, and I have never disagreed with this to my knowledge. All I have ever done is argue that tax rates are not a zero sum game, that the effect of tax rates on the economy needs to be recognized as a real world factor, and it should be argued and considered in an intelligent manner instead of ignored as no factor at all, which is what I see some politicians apparently do. I have never claimed the Laffer curve was drawn perfectly or shaped perfectly. I have only claimed that a relationship does exist. I won't use the word, "curve," right now at the end of this debate, the dreaded word, because apparently some people cannot bring themselves to admit the word into evidence, so I will simply call it a "relationship."
 
 
 
I do not disagree, and I have never disagreed with this to my knowledge. All I have ever done is argue that tax rates are not a zero sum game, that the effect of tax rates on the economy needs to be recognized as a real world factor, and it should be argued and considered in an intelligent manner instead of ignored as no factor at all, which is what I see some politicians apparently do. I have never claimed the Laffer curve was drawn perfectly or shaped perfectly. I have only claimed that a relationship does exist. I won't say it is a curve, the dreaded word, because apparently some people cannot bring themselves to admit the word into evidence, so I will simply call it a "relationship."
 

Cool, closer to agreement.

The problem stems from the fact that people attempt to use the 'laffer curve,' or Voodoo economics, to explain why tax cuts for the rich help the economy and the poor. This is a terrible thing to do, because it is completely false.

If you read back, you'll see that the original sidetrack started from my statement that tax raises were coming, and that they were the only way to get out of our hole, to which you responded that raising taxes could hurt the economy more than it helps. But I think that's generally a position which is based upon the Laffer Curve and false premises, and should be avoided...

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Well, if you tax the rich too much, such that if you go back to 70% or more marginal tax rates above a high threshold, you very well would hurt the poor in the long run, in my opinion. The only thing left to argue is where the optimum tax rate is for all factors involved, actually is. I hope you are not going to go back to square one and start arguing again that there is no limit to which we can soak the rich without any negative consequences at any point of taxation. I can accept the fact that we all must argue where that point is, but I am simply trying to establish the agreeement that there is a point.

I maintain that a tax rate increase will hurt the economy to some degree. I do not assert however that if we insist on spending the money via government, perhaps the benefit of paying for the government we demand might outpace whatever negative consequences it may cause the overall economy.
 
 
 
Well, if you tax the rich too much, such that if you go back to 70% or more marginal tax rates above a high threshold, you very well would hurt the poor in the long run, in my opinion. The only thing left to argue is where the optimum tax rate is for all factors involved, actually is. I hope you are not going to go back to square one and start arguing again that there is no limit to which we can soak the rich without any negative consequences at any point of taxation. I can accept the fact that we all must argue where that point is, but I am simply trying to establish the agreeement that there is a point.
 

The point is so vague and dependent on other factors, that it's pointless to even try and pin it down.

I will say that during every expansionary period prior to our current one, we saw growth which either was even to our outpaced our current growth - and each and every period had higher marginal tax rates. Makes it kind of hard to believe that raising from our current low rates will have a negative effect.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Well, to be honest, I don't know how much effect it will cause. I just think we need to admit to the possibility and consider it. I differ from some Republicans, apparently including George Bush, that we can continue to institute new government programs, without paying for them. I am for lower tax rates, but I am also in favor of the federal government doing less, so that lower tax rates can be utilized. I am also unsure at what point, higher tax rates will actually lower revenues, and I suggest we are closer to that point than you believe. I think, however, that you have finally admitted that such a point may exist, but is probably much, much higher than where we are now.
 
 
 
Well, to be honest, I don't know how much effect it will cause. I just think we need to admit to the possibility and consider it. I differ from some Republicans, apparently including George Bush, that we can continue to institute new government programs, without paying for them. I am for lower tax rates, but I am also in favor of the federal government doing less, so that lower tax rates can be utilized. I am also unsure at what point, higher tax rates will actually lower revenues, and I suggest we are closer to that point than you believe. I think, however, that you have finally admitted that such a point may exist, but is probably much, much higher than where we are now.
 

We've never been in disagreement that raising or lowering the tax rates can have positive or negative effects on revenues; the disagreement arises around the concept of there being a single 'point.' Depending on a huge amount of different factors, I would describe it a little more vaguely - sort of a 'range' in which we just aren't sure what will happen, whereas in the extremes it's easier to predict.

Put it this way - tax rates which are inbetween 90-100% and 0-10%, it's easy to predict what will happen when you change the tax rate b/c the extreme nature of the statistics overwhelm most of the other factors in question. In the middle, though, it is very difficult to judge how much to weight different factors in the equation.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Maybe its a little like having a 460 v-8 as compared to a measly 4 cylinder under the hood? A little bit of a headwind or something else might affect one greatly while you hardly notice the other, so yes, I can agree that if we are in a time of a roaring economy, a very small tax rate hike might work as projected, but if the engine is already running a bit anemic, and is sensitive to the slightest effect, a tax rate hike, like loading lead bricks into the trunk, especially alot of them, might be the straw that breaks the camel's back.
 
 
 
Maybe its a little like having a 460 v-8 as compared to a measly 4 cylinder under the hood? A little bit of a headwind or something else might affect one greatly while you hardly notice the other, so yes, I can agree that if we are in a time of a roaring economy, a very small tax rate hike might work as projected, but if the engine is already running a bit anemic, and is sensitive to the slightest effect, a tax rate hike, like loading lead bricks into the trunk, especially alot of them, might be the straw that breaks the camel's back.
 

It's true that there is a lot of confusion about what the long-term effects of tax hikes are; but not about the short-term effects.

I like to think of it (in a massively oversimplified way, heheeh!) as the same thing as my student loan situation: what percentage of my income should go to paying off the debt? Obviously, just as in the 'macro' situation, there are a large number of factors involved in the decision; but it's easy to see that the more I pay in the short term, the less long-term interest there will be.

We need to be paying something off in the short-run. I don't advocate crippling our economy by bumping taxes 15% overnight, but there's no reason why we couldn't have more of a focus on fiscal sanity for a while. And yes, this may slow the economy down a bit. But imagine if I never paid any interest on my loans, choosing instead to funnel all the money I would have used to pay my loans off, back into my everyday life. While my income is higher in the short run, it drops in the long run due to the nature of compound interest.

Nations can get in the same sort of financial trouble as people; our nations' 'credit score' is important when it comes to the foreign investment we rely upon to stay afloat. We are close to the edge of serious problems right now with our international credit, and should take some action before things get worse.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
There needs to be a relationship between income/revenue and spending. Without considering the spending side, whatever happens to revenue will have very little meaning.
 
 
The problem I see, cyclops is which comes first, spending or paying for the spending? Many people get into the trap of seeing more money coming in, so they spend more before they even get it. This is the reason pay day loans, or rip off artists I call them, proliferate. And now we see people spending their income tax refunds long before they receive them. Irresponsible people always spend more than they make, no matter the amount.

And I think government is just like an irresponsible citizen, no matter the amount we give it, they will overspend it Once the politicians see the likelihood or hope of more government revenue, they are already busy instituting more programs to utilize the revenues before they even receive it. And once a program is instituted, it is rare to ever get it rolled back.

So, conservative Republicans see this effect, and so there is a great reluctance to see taxes raised. We instead cling to the hope that increasing deficits will encourage a reduction of spending increases to fight the problem of the fast growth of bloated government. In other words, if we refuse to give a higher percentage of our money, spending will have to be limited. We believe the government should be able to live on the percentage given it now. Unfortunately, there is a larger and larger percentage of people that pay no income tax, so they have no hesitation to continue to demand more services.

I agree with the philosophy of being responsible and paying more as we go, and to a degree, the Republican congress of the 90's was able to make some headway in this regard.
 
 
 
The problem I see, cyclops is which comes first, spending or paying for the spending? Many people get into the trap of seeing more money coming in, so they spend more before they even get it. This is the reason pay day loans, or rip off artists I call them, proliferate. And now we see people spending their income tax refunds long before they receive them. Irresponsible people always spend more than they make, no matter the amount.

And I think government is just like an irresponsible citizen, no matter the amount we give it, they will overspend it Once the politicians see the likelihood or hope of more government revenue, they are already busy instituting more programs to utilize the revenues before they even receive it. And once a program is instituted, it is rare to ever get it rolled back.

So, conservative Republicans see this effect, and so there is a great reluctance to see taxes raised. We instead cling to the hope that increasing deficits will encourage a reduction of spending increases to fight the problem of the fast growth of bloated government. In other words, if we refuse to give a higher percentage of our money, spending will have to be limited. We believe the government should be able to live on the percentage given it now. Unfortunately, there is a larger and larger percentage of people that pay no income tax, so they have no hesitation to continue to demand more services.

I agree with the philosophy of being responsible and paying more as we go, and to a degree, the Republican congress of the 90's was able to make some headway in this regard.
 

I agree that the Republican congress did a good job in the 90's, though you will admit that most of the savings came from a reduced military budget - something that Republicans wouldn't do in a million years today.

Spending. We're in a bind, where the vast majority of constituents in America don't want to see social security or Medicare/aid cut, and a significant majority don't want to see defense cut. But without cutting some of those, we can't balance the budget unless we raise taxes significantly. So I don't see any way around it; it isn't as if the public are going to change their minds about SS any time soon.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Not only that, all hell is going to break loose when the baby-boomers begin to retire, and they learn they're not going to get the benefits promised while paying into the system.

I personally don't have a problem, because I'm 71 years old, and we have enough personal savings to carry us through.
 
 
I support universl health care, and so does the majority of Americans.

From the NYT:

March 2, 2007
Most Support U.S. Guarantee of Health Care
By ROBIN TONER and JANET ELDER
A majority of Americans say the federal government should guarantee health insurance to every American, especially children, and are willing to pay higher taxes to do it, according to the latest New York Times/CBS News poll.

okie, It's not, I repeat, it's not a liberal issue.
 
 
We already have universal health care, cicerone, although it isn't the kind you want. If you want to debate this issue, I would suggest starting a new thread, or is there one already? I am for important changes in the system we have, but I am not in favor of the government forcing their health care down the throat of every man, woman, and child in this country.

I would like to see a poll and see how many Americans want the government to provide a minimum form of housing to every American. If a majority wants it, is that also a good idea, cicerone?
 
 
okie, It's obvious you do "miss the point." Universal health care directly affects our economy; one of the reasons the big three automakers are no longer the "big three." International competition for goods and services is an important issue to our economy;
 
 
I know it obviously affects the economy, but I think it is a side issue to the economy, as it is really a major issue by itself. Go ahead and debate the point, but do you really think we need another bureaucracy to break the bank even further. After all, I thought you were concerned the country was going broke.

Bush's stupid prescription drug plan was another bad idea that will cost the country trillions before it is over.
 
 
 
Go ahead and debate the point, but do you really think we need another bureaucracy to break the bank even further.
 

The question is, will it break the bank more than the current system is breaking the backs of our citizens and companies?

The profits of the health insurance industries are another thing which I'm not really too concerned about, though it plays a huge role in this. I've long held the opinion that health insurance should be required to be non-profit.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
Should we also make the oil companies non-profit, or the hardware store non-profit, or whatever non-profit? Good grief,cyclops, have you lost your marbles?
 
 
okie, You are making claims that are being challenged by those who support universal health care as being "more efficient." It takes away the "profit motive" from insurance companies, and transfers those same monies to actually help people who need medicare care. It cuts admininstrtative and profit costs, and spreads the benefit of health care to all of our citizens.
 
 
The profit motive saves all of us money. Why would you want to eliminate the very thing that helps us?
 
 
okie, Oil companies has nothing to do with universal health care.

If you want to talk about the cost of energy, that's the failing of our government for not demanding better fuel efficiency and aternative fuels.

It's also about the speed limits in our country that guzzles more fuel.

Oil is a international commodity with international market supplies and demand. You're talking through your hat. US universal health care is about the US quality, supply and demand on our medical care that has very little impact internationally. Those who can afford it may come to the US for their health care, but that will not effect our quality, supply and demand internally - like oil.
 
 
 
okie, Oil companies has nothing to do with universal health care.

If you want to talk about the cost of energy, that's the failing of our government for not demanding better fuel efficiency and aternative fuels.

It's also about the speed limits in our country that guzzles more fuel.

Oil is a international commodity with international market supplies and demand. You're talking through your hat. US universal health care is about the US quality, supply and demand on our medical care that has very little impact internationally. Those who can afford it may come to the US for their health care, but that will not effect our quality, supply and demand internally - like oil.
 

One of the reasons the cost of health care is already out of control is because it is not sufficiently subject to the free market system as other goods and services are. Going to a 100% government system is only going to increase cost, and probably decrease quality.
 
 
 
 
okie, Oil companies has nothing to do with universal health care.

If you want to talk about the cost of energy, that's the failing of our government for not demanding better fuel efficiency and aternative fuels.

It's also about the speed limits in our country that guzzles more fuel.

Oil is a international commodity with international market supplies and demand. You're talking through your hat. US universal health care is about the US quality, supply and demand on our medical care that has very little impact internationally. Those who can afford it may come to the US for their health care, but that will not effect our quality, supply and demand internally - like oil.
 

One of the reasons the cost of health care is already out of control is because it is not sufficiently subject to the free market system as other goods and services are. Going to a 100% government system is only going to increase cost, and probably decrease quality.
 

I believe that what you have written here is 100% false.

Can you provide proof that part of the reason that costs of health care are out of control being 'too much regulation?'

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
I believe that what you have written here is 100% false.

Can you provide proof that part of the reason that costs of health care are out of control being 'too much regulation?'

Cycloptichorn
 

I did not say it was due to too much regulation. I said it was due to not being sufficiently subject to the free market.
 
 
 
 
I believe that what you have written here is 100% false.

Can you provide proof that part of the reason that costs of health care are out of control being 'too much regulation?'

Cycloptichorn
 

I did not say it was due to too much regulation. I said it was due to not being sufficiently subject to the free market.
 

wowzer.
 
 
It's no use trying to discuss a topic with anyone who refuses to understand what he/she is talking about.

okie wrote: I did not say it was due to too much regulation. I said it was due to not being sufficiently subject to the free market.

Show us why it's not "sufficiently subject to the free market?"
 
 
 
 
 
I believe that what you have written here is 100% false.

Can you provide proof that part of the reason that costs of health care are out of control being 'too much regulation?'

Cycloptichorn
 

I did not say it was due to too much regulation. I said it was due to not being sufficiently subject to the free market.
 

wowzer.
 

Right?

That's the same thing, Okie. Honestly.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
I did not say it was due to too much regulation. I said it was due to not being sufficiently subject to the free market.
 

Whichever nomenclature you prefer, how do you explain that Canada, with its single payer, universal healthcare, spends less money per citizen on health care, yet enjoys better health care by every objective measure -- life expectancy, infant mortality, you name it?
 
 
 
It's no use trying to discuss a topic with anyone who refuses to understand what he/she is talking about.

okie wrote: I did not say it was due to too much regulation. I said it was due to not being sufficiently subject to the free market.

Show us why it's not "sufficiently subject to the free market?"
 

I would hope you guys could understand the difference between regulation and other factors that are also included in the set of circumstances that limit the workings of a free market.

Simply put, the people that pay for health care are generally not those that receive the health care. That is a biggee, but not everything involved.
 
 
 
Whichever nomenclature you prefer, how do you explain that Canada, with its single payer, universal healthcare, spends less money per citizen on health care, yet enjoys better health care by every objective measure -- life expectancy, infant mortality, you name it?
 

It looks like this thread is becoming a health care thread now. I didn't start it.

Thomas, you have a totally different population, including lifestyles and other factors, so that greatly diminishes how meaningful the debate about that can be, but I will research this more. Your assertion flies in the face of everything we know about the efficiency of free markets vs government operations, but if proven wrong, I will admit it. You will need to provide much more proof than a sentence or two.
 
 
 
Your assertion flies in the face of everything we know about the efficiency of free markets vs government operations, but if proven wrong, I will admit it.
 

Maybe in the face of everything you believe, Okie.

Surely a person of intelligence such as yourself realizes that sometimes free markets will be more efficient, and sometimes they won't.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
okie wrote:
would hope you guys could understand the difference between regulation and other factors that are also included in the set of circumstances that limit the workings of a free market.

Having studied economics in college including macro and micro, and reading business mags and newspapers, most of us are aware of "the workings of a free market." You still haven't answered my question about your statement "show us why "it's not sufficiently subject to the free market?"

Simply put, the people that pay for health care are generally not those that receive the health care. That is a biggee, but not everything involved.

Prove this statement; use any resource you please?
 
 
Are you guys deaf and dumb? Sorry about the sarcasm, ciclerone, but get serious. If this was a math class, if you studied it in school, as you have claimed you did economics, why do you ask me to prove that 2 + 2 = 4?
 
 
okie, Learn to respond to the q; not attack the messenger, because you fail to answer questions.

You still haven't answered my question about your statement show us why "it's not sufficiently subject to the free market?"

You made the statement, now prove it.
 
 
Some things should be obvious to the most casual observer. This is one of those things.
 
 
CLUE: The question is not what is the answer to 2+2?
 
 
Your "causal" answer is no answer. Please answer the question posed.

It's obvious to you, because it's still in your head. Share that with us!
 
 
 
Your assertion flies in the face of everything we know about the efficiency of free markets vs government operations, but if proven wrong, I will admit it. You will need to provide much more proof than a sentence or two.
 

Well, I once recommended to Cycloptichorn that he read an economics textbook; it only seems fair that I recommend the same to you. It will show you that while markets usually get things right, there are a few specific exceptions to this rule. Since this is obviously a difficult idea for you to accept, I recommend that you read a conservative economist's textbook: Gregory Mankiw,  Principles of Economics . (Mankiw served as Bush's chief economic adviser before he returned to Harvard.)
 
 
An economic tip - make sure you get one of  these  copies; there's no need to plunk down 120+ shipping on a brand new one.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
I was going to say Okie need a recent edition in this case. The explanation of the market failure in healthcare involves asymmetric information, and Mankiw didn't include this concept until Akerlof, Stiglitz, and Spence won a Nobel Prize for their work in the field.

But Amazon's "Search inside" feature that while Mankiw does discuss asymmetric information, he doesn't discuss it in the context of healthcare. I'll keep looking for material.
 
 
Cicerone, how do people generally pay for health care in this country, as compared to buying a car, or groceries, or something from the hardware store? This is not a hard question. Try it.
 
 
 
Cicerone, how do people generally pay for health care in this country, as compared to buying a car, or groceries, or something from the hardware store? This is not a hard question. Try it.
 

Most get it through their business. Back in the day a benefits package was actually something that made businesses MORE competitive.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
 
I was going to say Okie need a recent edition in this case. The explanation of the market failure in healthcare involves asymmetric information, and Mankiw didn't include this concept until Akerlof, Stiglitz, and Spence won a Nobel Prize for their work in the field.

But Amazon's "Search inside" feature that while Mankiw does discuss asymmetric information, he doesn't discuss it in the context of healthcare. I'll keep looking for material.
 

Fine, explain it in a paragraph. That should be sufficient, and much faster. We already know the market is failing the health care system.
 
 
 
 
Cicerone, how do people generally pay for health care in this country, as compared to buying a car, or groceries, or something from the hardware store? This is not a hard question. Try it.
 

Most get it through their business. Back in the day a benefits package was actually something that made businesses MORE competitive.

Cycloptichorn
 

There is a clue to one problem, which Bush recognizes already, by the way.
 
 
 
 
 
Cicerone, how do people generally pay for health care in this country, as compared to buying a car, or groceries, or something from the hardware store? This is not a hard question. Try it.
 

Most get it through their business. Back in the day a benefits package was actually something that made businesses MORE competitive.

Cycloptichorn
 

There is a clue to one problem, which Bush recognizes already, by the way.
 

Bush? He's irrelevant to this discussion. Any changes will have nothing to do with him at all.

 
We already know the market is failing the health care system.
 

You have it 100% backwards. It's the system which is failing the market.

Cycloptichorn
 
 
This might be pertinent, even though Bush is nearly a lame duck.

 http://www.whitehouse.gov/stateoftheunion/2006/healthcare/ 
 
 
